

The Supreme Reality-The Brahma Tatwa ,which is dense concentrated Bliss, which is of the nature of the Pure Consciousness, which is without parallel or comparison, and is totally free of time and space limitations, and is always free (of Maya) which hundreds and thousands of the Upanishadic statements seek to explain, and yet, is not clear. This Brahma Tatwa which is not easy to grasp in the beginning, but the realisation of which, is the highest purusharth (i.e. liberation), that (very Reality) shines right in front (in concrete form), (as an Image of Shri Krishna) in the Guruvaayur temple. Oh (wonderful indeed) is the good fortune of the people (who seek Thy Grace).


In this manner, such rare things are so easily accessible to all. Alas, people, pursue other wordly things with their body speech and mind. This, is pitiable indeed. However, we Thy devotees, surrender , to Thee, O Lord of Guruvaayur who is the embodiment of the entire soul of all beings of the universe, with fully resolved minds for the eradication of all wordly sufferings.





That Satva Guna, which compared to the other two Gunas (Rajas and Tamas) is absolutely pure and not tainted by them. From such pure Satva guna,Thy form was born, constituted of subtle elements and organs of senses and actions. It is thus stated by sage Vyaasa, again and again, in many scriptures.Thy form, because of such purity, totally reveals the Supreme Bliss and Conciousness within (which is the resplendent Brahman) without any obstruction. In that form, the fortunate ones (who have good deeds to their credit) revel. That form is delightful to the mind and ears, which the devotees can easily grasp in Thy image.

Oh Infinite Lord! Thou are the pure Brahman like the mighty ocean, changeless, ever full, and of the nature of unlimited nectarine bliss. Like many pearls in the ocean, innumerable liberated souls are absorbed in Thy Brahmic bliss and hence it is extremely resplendent. Just like the waves rise in the ocean, it is said that Thy Shuddha Satwa form has risen from the Brahman. Since the term Ansha-avataar (Sakalaa) is meant only for Thy other part incarnations. Hence why cannot Thou be called as Poorna-avataar (Nishkalaa)?




Oh Birthless Lord! Even though Thou are not bound by any activities, and Thou are without any motive,Thou do resort to that activity known as 'eekshanaa' - the will to create. Because of that only 'Prakriti' manifests itself. Prakriti, which is latent in Thee, as if non existent in the beginning of a new cycle of creation. Then, from the pure Saatvik portion of 'Prakriti' (Maya) which does not in any way obstruct Thy Brahmic effulgence, Oh Lord of Vaikunth, Thou manifest Thyself, in full glory, with a Divine form.

Thy form excels in the beauty of the fresh rain bearing clouds, and of a beautiful bunch of blue lotuses. Thy form is an embodiment of beauty, in the eyes of the people who have done meritorious deeds, and is a complete incarnation of all their good deeds. Thou are the abode where Goddess Laxmi delights without inhibition. Thou are the source of a torrential flow of nectarine Bliss, soaking the hearts of people who meditate. On that form of Thine I continuously meditate, O Lord of Guruvayur!




O Invincible Lord! Thy activity of creation is indeed a tragic sport, as it causes a lot of sufferings to the living beings. This is what I used to think, but now I do not think so. For if there were no creation, how could human beings enjoy the beauty and sweetness of Thy form which is so delightful to hear and ecstatic to behold, and thus revel in the ocean of Supreme-Bliss-Conciousness.

O Lord Vishnu! for the devotees who surrender to Thee, Thou always confer, unasked for, not only wealth and other desires, but also liberation.Thus being accessible to every one and bestower of unlimited boons, Thou are the unique Paarijaata tree [parijaata: a heavenly flower]. Alas, the desire prompted hoards of people, in vain, long for trivial blessings from the Kalpaka tree of the garden of Indra. [Kalpaka: a wish fulfilling tree]




O Lord Shri Krishna! while other gods out of compassion, fulfill the desires of their devotees, Thou out of Thy unique compassion, offer Thyself (liberation) to Thy devotees. While other gods rule over the world with the powers invested in them, Thou are the very inner controller of all and rule over all beings and other gods as well as Thyself. Hence all fortunate jeevas [souls] take immense delight in the inexhaustible bliss that Thou are. As for Thee, Thou are ever satisfied in Thyself and are the abode of incomparable attributes. O Lord! prostrations to Thee.

O Lord of Guruvaayur! Thy lordliness consists in being the controller of all gods from Lord Shankara onwards.Thy prowess overcomes that of those who excel the whole world in prowess. Thy pure fame is sung by even the most desireless sages. Laxmi Devi always resides in Thy bosom. Thou are omniscient and there is not the slightest trace of attachment in Thee. Therefore, the term 'Bhagavan' is applicable to Thee alone.




O Lord! I meditate upon Thy form: wearing a crown that rivals the sun in brilliance, the forehead adorned with the upright sandal paste mark (tilak), the all merciful eyes, the sweet smile, shapely nose, with cheeks reflecting the fish shaped pendents adorning Thy ears, the neck shining due to the lustre of Kaustubha gem, Thy chest bedecked with the Vanamaala, necklaces of gold and precious stones and the auspicious mark of Sreevatsa.

O Lord! Thy four sacred arms are adorned with ornaments namely, Keyur (epaulets) Angada (armlets) Kankana (bracelets) and finger rings studded with gems. The arms holding in each hand the Gadaa (mace), Shankha (conch), Chakra (discus),Padma (lotus); and Thy waist adorned with the yellow silk fastened by a golden waist-band. Lord, Thy feet are like beautiful pure lotuses. I seek refuge in this, Thy enchanting form, which is the remover of all sorrows.




O all pervading Lord Vishnu! Will there be any one in this world who will not be enchanted by this splendid form of Thine; which is superior to what is considered the most glorious in all the three worlds; which is charming than the most charming entities; which is more attractive than the most attractive; whose sweetness excels the sweetest; whose beauty rivals the most beautiful and is a wonder of all wonders.

O changeless One! what a pity. Thy consort Laxmi Devi, the Goddess of prosperity and auspiciousness,having attained Thee in marriage, became so attached to Thy enchanting form, and was so much in love with Thee, that she was not inclined to be with even her own devotees. Alas, O Lord! due to her attachment to Thee, she acquired the reputation of being fickle minded towards her own devotees.




O Lord! Consort of Laxmi! In support of my statement that Laxmi being attached to Thy enchantment is fickle with others, I will now give another proof. She stays permanently with those devotees (of Thine) who always meditate and blissfully sing Thy glory. She remains there because she is keen to listen attentively to the praises of her beloved Lord.

O Lord! Thy captivating form which continuously showers pure nectar, which is itself the Supreme Bliss-Conciousness holds the minds of those who hear Thy glories. Their minds are immediately stimulated and filled with joy. They experience horrippilation all over their body and are bathed in the cool tears produced from ecstacy of joy.




O consort of Goddess Lakshmi! Thy enchanting form automatically captures the minds of the devotees. Hence Bhakti yoga is considered a far easier path compared to the other two paths of Karma yoga and Gyaana yoga. It has thus been extolled by the great sages. All human beings can effortlessly attain Thee through Bhakti, which is intense love to Thee.

O All pervading Lord! The path of Karma yoga which consists of performing one's duties without expectation of fruits, needs to be practiced for a long time to get results.The path of Gyaana yoga which consists of knowing the Brahman, as explained in the Upanishads, is very difficult for the mind to pursue because of its abstract nature.Therefore, O Lord! Bhakti yoga which is of the nature of pure love to Thee is the sweetest and the noblest and hence most beneficial.




O Lord! Some people follow the path of Karma Yoga,and perform the various disciplines for long and attain mental purity. This only entitles them to become fit for the practice of Gyaana or Bhakti yoga. Some others strive hard pondering over the attributeless Supreme Brahman, based on logic and reason. They, wihout melting their hearts in love for Thee, take a long time to reach their goal of perfection.

O all pervading Lord! Devotion to Thee is easily attainable just by submerging oneself in the nectarine flood of Thy stories. This can be done without much effort and it instantly leads to pure Knowledge - Bliss. O Lord of Guruvaayur! May I soon experience that state of melting of the heart in intense love for Thy lotus feet.




भक्तस्वरूप-वर्णन तथा भक्ति-प्रार्थना 
O Bestower of Boons! I consider those devotees of Thine most fortunate, who always chant Thy sacred names, and so revel in the ocean of Bliss. Contemplating on Thy divine form they are engaged in narrating Thy divine stories. Moving about freely, they are immersed in the joy of Thy thoughts. They, indeed, have fulfilled all their desires in life.

O Lord Vishnu! tormented by this painful disease, what a pity, my mind is not inclined to revel in the joy of worshipping at Thy lotus feet. Be merciful to me, so that I may retire to a secluded beautiful place and enjoy the bliss of meditating on Thy lotus feet immersed in chanting Thy innumerable names.




O Lord! if Thy grace is present, is there anything in this world which man cannot attain? The curing of my disease is just a very insignificant matter for Thee. There are many devotees of Thine, in this world, who having been liberated from sufferings and are moving about freely without any attachment.

O Lord! Great sages like Naarada move about freely at will without being noticed. They are free of all sorrows because of their constant contemplation on Thy lotus feet. They have attained the eternal knowledge and are always immersed in Thy non-dual Self,which is of the nature of supreme Bliss-Consciousness. What more can one desire to attain in life?




O Lord! May my devotion to Thee grow intense, so that all my sufferings may automatically subside. I do not have the slightest doubt in my heart that devotion to Thee will bear this fruit. For if it were not so, the words of sage Vyaasa, Thy own words and the declarations of the Vedaas would prove to be untrue, like the casual mutterings of street urchins.

O Lord! devotion to Thee is sweet right from the beginning because of Thy glorious attributes. When such devotion becomes intense, it removes all sorrows of the devotee. At the final stage of devotion, the devotee experiences pure absolute Bliss coupled with knowledge of the Self. What more is there for one to seek?




O Lord! Be graceful to remove all my afflictions so that my two feet will take delight in reaching Thy temple, my hands in performing worship to Thee,my eyes in seeing Thy enchanting form, my nose in enjoying the fragrance of the Tulsi leaves offered at Thy feet and my ears in hearing the stories of Thy glories and great deeds.

O Lord! In my mind, which is now very agitated due to mental and physical afflictions, may Thy beautiful form manifest, which is of the nature of Knowledge-Bliss absolute. This will excite me with supreme devotion causing horripilation all over the body and tears flowing in ecstacy and in such a thrill, my endless sorrows will melt into insignificance.





O Lord of Guruvaayur! I find that even those who are indifferent toThee are leading a happy life. O Bestower of boons! Even though I am an ardent devotee of Thine, I am undergoing various sufferings. Why is this so? O Lord! Will this not bring disrepute to Thee? Hence, O slayer of Kamsa! Kindly eradicate my diseases and soon make me one of your foremost devotees.

O Lord! What is the use of my mere prattling? O Bestower of boons! I have resolved that till Thy Grace descends on me, giving up all my lamentations, I shall do prostration at Thy holy feet which are in front of me, sing Thy glories and do service to Thee as best as I can. Thus worship Thee.




O Lord! Bestow on me just that much of health necessary to worship Thee. Then I shall practice the eight-limbed yoga (Ashtanga Yoga) and earn Thy grace.

O Lord!I (we all (the devotees) will strictly follow the discipline of Yama (self control) by practice of Brahmcharya etc. and also the discipline of Niyama (rules of right conduct) through routines of daily bath etc. and attain purity of body and mind. I (we) will then practice steady postures (Asanaa) like Sukhaasanaa and Padmaasanaa etc. for meditating on Thee.

O Lord! by regulating my breath through Pranayama and having purified myself I will continuously chant the Pranava (Om) mantra mentally. Thus, withdrawing my senses from the sense objects, and being purified, I will prepare myself for meditation on Thee.




O Lord! I will then start meditating on Thee. Initially with great effort I shall try to fix my mind on Thy form, which will be vague in the beginning. Practicing thus again and again I shall attain bliss of devotion and tenderness of heart.

O Lord! I, Thy devotee, by long practice will be able to visualize in my mind Thy beautiful form with all limbs clear and vivid. So I will devote myself to meditation, without any effort, always surrendering to Thee.

O Lord! By thus performing dhyaana on Thee and getting captivated by the sweetness of Thy formful aspect (Saguna), I shall enjoy the concentrated bliss of Thy impersonal aspect (Nirguna), which shines as the Brahman.




O Lord of the Universe! When I have attained that state of experiencing Thee as the Brahman, i.e. Nirvikalpa Samaadhi, if I slip down from that state, I shall again start the meditation process from Dhaarana onwards.

Thus having attained the joy of experiencing Thy Supreme Blissful state, O Lord! May I be the foremost of the liberated devotees and move about freely like Sri Shuka, Naarada and others.

O Birthless Lord! After one achieves Thee in Samaadhi, he can opt for immediate liberation or gradual liberation. Accordingly through the power of yoga he raises up his vital breath through the six centres along the Sushumnaa Naadi.




One who is desireless of visiting the other heavenly worlds, gives up (through his Aagyaa chakra) his gross body as well as the subtle bodies and merges in Thee. The one who desires to visit the heavenly regions before attaining liberation, goes out through the orifice in the crown of the head ( the Brahmarandhra).

O Lord! Thy devotee who follows the Krama Mukti path is led by the presiding deities of fire, day time, the bright fortnight, and Uttaraayana to the plane of the sun and enjoying in each of these spheres reaches the realm of Dhruva.

eaching the abode of Dhruva, he proceeds to Maharloka. When, at the approach of cosmic dissolution, fire eminates from the mouth of Aadishesh, and when he is tormented by the fire, he takes refuge in Thee and goes to the world of Brahma. He may choose to go to the world of Brahma even before the fire starts.




Residing there in Brahmaloka or in Thy abode, Vaikuntha, he is liberated at the time of Maha Pralaya. Or, if he so desires, he is liberated even earlier by piercing through the Brahmaanda and releasing himself by his yogic power.

O All Pervading Lord! Thy devotee enters each of the seven sheaths of the cosmic sphere,i.e. earth, water, fire, air, space, the cosmic intelligence, and primordial nature. He enjoys the bliss thereof and transcends them to reach Thy unobstructed state -the merger in Thee, The Supreme Brahman.

O Lord of the Universe! The devotee who thus goes through the luminous path does not fall any more to the netherworlds. O Lord of Guruvaayur! The embodiment of pure conciousness absolute, please protect me, Thy devotee, who is ever singing Thy glories.




विराट पुरुष की उत्पत्ति का वर्णन 
This world consisting of the manifest and the unmanifest worlds (gross and the subtle) did not exist at all, before and during the total dissolution.The three Gunaas (Satwa, Rajas and Tamas) of Maya were in equilibrium, preventing any modification and so had become latent in Thee. At that time neither death nor liberation existed. Day and night also did not exist. Thou alone remained at that time as the Supreme Bliss Conciousness.

O All pervading Lord! Then, Time, Karmas (effects of good and bad actions), Gunas (Satwa, Rajas and Tamas), all the Jivas and the entire universe (born out of Mayaa) were all merged in Thee and Thou were absorbed in Thy own nature of pure Consciousness Bliss. However, O Lord! the Srutis do not declare them as being non existent. They remained in causal form. Otherwise, like the non existence of the flowers in the sky, how could they come into existence again




Thus when a period of two Paraardhaas ended, Thou cast Thy glance, which was with the will to create the three worlds. Then Maayaa (Thy creative power) got activated and from it emerged the power of time, the impressions of karma and the resulting tendencies. These supported Maayaa by disturbing the balance of the three Gunaas and diversified as the manifested universe.

O Lord! Thou has Maayaa by Thy side, but are not influenced by it. The scriptures declare Thee as mere witness. Thy appearences in the diverse forms of Maayaa are mere reflections called Jivas which are not different from Thee. Maayaa being aroused by time and prompted by Thee, projected the principle of Intelligence, which is called Mahat.




O All pervading Lord! Even though this Mahat Tatwa is made up of three Gunaas, it is predominated by Satwa. Hence it recognizes the collective Jivas as macro "I". (As cosmic whole and not as individual entities). But the same Mahat Tatwa, when predominated by Tamas and Rajas, creates by Thy will the feeling of individual "I" called Aham Tatwa.

This Aham Tatwa (Ahamkaara) further categorized itself,based on the three Gunaas as Vaikarika (Satwa), Tejas (Rajas) and Tamas (Tamas).From Satwa were created the presiding deities of : Gyanendriyaas -(organs of knowledge) which are Dik Devata (of hearing), Vaayu (of touch), Soorya (of seeing), Varuna (of taste) and Ashwini Devatas (of smell). Karmendriyaas - (organs of action) which are Agni (of speech), Indra (of hands), Vishnu (of the legs), Mitra (of excretion) and Prajaapati (of reproduction). Antahkarana -(Inner equipment consisting of Mana, Buddhi, Ahankaara and Chit) which are Moon (of mind), Brahma (of Buddhi- the intellect), Rudra (of Ahamkaara) and Kshetrajna (of Chitt -memory).




O Infinite One! By Thy will, from the Saatwic aspect of Ahankaara, the inner equipment of Antahkarana was born, consisting of, Manas, Buddhi, Ahankaara and Chitta. From the Raajasic aspect of the Ahankaara the ten Indriyaas were born (5 Karmendriyaas and 5 Jnanendriyaas). O Lord! by Thy will, from the Taamasic aspect of the Ahankaara was born, the sound (Sabda) which is the subtle essence (Tanmaatra) of space (Aakaash).

O All pervading Lord! From the Tanmaatra of (Shabda) the subtle element of sound, came the element (Aakaash) Space and from it touch (Sparsh). From touch (Sparsh) came the element Air (Vaayu) and from it form (Roopa). From form (Roopa) came the element Fire (Agni) and from it Taste (Rasa). From the Tanmaatra of Taste (Rasa) came the element Water (Jala) and from it smell (Gandha). From smell (Gandha) came the element Earth (Bhoomi). O Maadhava! By Thy will, thus from the Tamasa aspect of Ahankaara, were born the five Tanmaatras and the five Pancha Bhootas each element having the qualities of the preceeding one.




O Lord! Even though all these elements, sense organs , the organs of action, and their presiding deities came into existence, they could not by themselves create the Brahmaanda. Then the presiding deities glorified Thee by various hymns and Thou entered into all of them, activated them and combining them, created the Hiranya Andam (the Golden Egg).

This Golden Egg or Brahmanda remained in the already created cosmic waters for a thousand years. Thereafter, breaking it Thou made it into 14 spheres (worlds), which is known as Thy Viraat Roopa (cosmic form); in which Thou shone as all beings with thousands of hands, feet, heads etc. O Lord of Guruvaayur, who thus manifested in cosmic form, please protect me from all my ailments.




विराट् शरीर जगत्स्वरूपत्व का वर्णन 
O Lord! Thou took the wonderful form of the fourteen worlds as Thy Viraat Swaroopa : The lower worlds - Paataala -is the lower portion of Thy feet. Rasaatala - is the upper portion of Thy feet. Mahaatala is Thy two ankles. Andam (the Golden Egg).

O Wielder of the discus! Talaatala is Thy shins (lower part of leg between knee and ankle). Sutala is Thy knees. Vitala and Atala are the two thighs. The higher worlds: Bhoomi (earth) is Thy hip; Bhuva (sky) is Thy naval; Swarga (heaven) is Thy chest which is the abode of Indra.




O Lord! Thy body is the whole universe. Maharloka is Thy neck. Janaloka is Thy face. Tapoloka is Thy forehead. Satyaloka is Thy head. Of all the other things of which the universe is made, Thy body is also conceived of being made up of all that. O Lord! salutations to Thee.

O Lord! The very cause of the universe,O Keshava! Thy Brahmarandhra are the Vedas. The clouds are Thy beautiful locks of hair. The abode of Brahma are Thy two eyebrows.Thy eyelashes are the night and the day, and Thy eyes is the Sun.




O Lord! The whole of the creation is the extention of Thy one glance. The different directions are Thy ears. The Ashwini devataas are Thy two nostrils. Greed and modesty are Thy lower lip and the upper lip.The stars are Thy teeth, and Yama (death) is Thy molars.

O Lord! Maayaa is Thy charming smile and Thy breath is the wind. Water is Thy tongue. The birds' chirpings, as they fly in formation, are Thy speech and Thy voice are the Sidhdhaas and divine artists. Fire is Thy mouth and the gods are Thy arms. Thy breasts are the Dharma devas.




O Lord! Adharma is Thy back and the moon is Thy mind. O lotus eyed One! The unmanifest is Thy heart lotus and the oceans are Thy abdomen. The sandhyaas are Thy garments , Prajaapati is Thy generative organ and Thy testicles is god Mitra.

O Ocean of mercy! The animal world is Thy lower-back and the elephants camels and horses are the nails of Thy feet. Time is Thy movement. The four varnas -Brahmins, Kshatriyaa, Vaishyaa and Shoodraas originated from Thy lotus face, hands, charming thighs and feet, respectively.




O Thou wielder of the discus! Thy activity is the wheel of Samsaara and the host of Asuras are Thy prowess.The mountains are Thy bones, the many rivers are Thy blood streams and the trees are Thy hair. May this indescribable form always shine in me.

Human beings who are bound by the law of Karma should remember this Viraat (cosmic) form of Thine, which is of the nature of pure Sattva, at the end of all rituals, and when desirous of liberation and at the time of death. O Lord of Guruvaayur! My salutations to Thee. Please eradicate my ailments.




Thus O Lord! Thou who manifested in the form of the fourteen worlds, again by Thy own will, manifested as Brahma, in Satyaloka, which is the highest and loftiest of all the worlds.This Brahma is known as Hiranya Garbh (the golden egg) the cosmic intelligence of all the beings of the three worlds. With the upsurge of Rajoguna, Thou as this Hiranya Garbha became desirous of creating various beings.

O Lord of the universe! Brahma intent on creating, wanted to have the knowledge of creating. In spite of his best efforts he could not do so on his own and hence he got worried. Then O Lord! willed by Thee, Brahma heard two pleasant words 'Tapa,Tapa' coming from nowhere, which prompted him to do penance.




Brahma looked around in all the directions to look for the revered person who spoke those words. The world was engulfed in water and there was no one to be seen. Then the meaning of the words dawned on him and for a thousand divine years he did penance and worshipped Thee. Thou , then revealed Thy wonderful abode Vaikunth to Brahma.

O All pervading Lord! Where Maayaa has no influence and which is located beyond the fourteen worlds, where the modifications of the mind, like sorrow,anger delusion fear are left far behind,such is Thy abode Vaikunth. It is full of supreme bliss and is engulfed with the constant flow of bright effulgence. That shining divine abode Thou showed to Brahmaa.




In Thy abode which is known as Vaikunth, live the divine beings who have four arms and their complexion is like deep blue lustre of sapphire. They are adorned with various jewels which are studded with gems which enlighten the quarters. They reside in aerial cars. They have achieved this high state by the merit of intense devotion to Thee. Hail to that abode of Thine which is pure and sinless.

O Lord! That abode of Thine Vaikunth, where Laxmi Thy consort resides, is attended to by various celestial damsels. Her, Laxmi's, slender and beautiful form is like the streak of lightening which enchants and captivates the whole world and enlightens the quarters. She being deeply attached to the fragrance of Thy lotus feet is herself always there, in Vaikunth, which abounds in astounding divine riches. O Lord that abode of Thine grant to me.




There thus revealed to Brahma, he saw Thee seated on a gem bedecked throne, adorned with golden crown, bracelets and other ornaments which were shining like innumerable suns.Thy chest bore the Shrivatsa mark, and the kaustubh jewel's lustre gave Thy form a crimson hue. O All pervading Lord! the source of all creation, may that divine form be revealed to me.


O Lord! Beautiful like the dark clouds, with a hue like that of delicate blue lotus flowers, and with a splendid halo, Thy form enlightens all the quarters. A charming benevolent smile is sported on Thy pleasant face. Thy four arms are adorned with the sacred conch, discus, mace and lotus. That form of Thine gave immense pleasure to Brahmaa. May that form deign to eradicate my ailments.




O Lord of the Universe! Brahmaa was wonderstruck by Thy vision. He was overwhelmed with the ecstacy of joy and with love and a sense of fulfilment . He fell at Thy lotus feet and prostrated. He prayed to Thee that Thou surely knew his desire to create, and so he asked for the requiered knowledge. He also prayed to be given the knowledge of the unique dual and the non-dual aspect of Thee. I pray to That Thee.

Brahmaa was with full humbleness prostating at Thy crimson feet. Thou touched his hand with Thy hands and said to him that he would get the knowledge requiered for creation, and also that he will not be tainted by the act of creation.Giving him this assurance and pleasing him extremely, Thou ,remaining in his heart, prompted him in the act of creation. O Lord! of such benevolence, kindly hasten my recovery.




प्रलयान्तर जगत् की सृष्टि का वर्णन 
At the end of the Prakrit Pralaya, in the first Kalpa which is known as Braahma Kalpa, Brahmaa came into existence. He got the knowledge of the Vedas from Thee alone and began creation in the same way as in the previous Kalpas.

One thousand Chaturyugaas make one day for this Brahma, and an equal duration is his night. During his day time he creates and at night he sleeps. His night is called the Naimittika Pralaya, when along with his creation he merges in Thee. Thus he spent many days and nights.




Brahmaa, by Thy grace performs creation every day just as humans like us wake up in the morning and start our daily duties. For those who were born before the Braahma Kalpa, and for the eternal souls, being born in the new Kalpa is like getting up from sleep.

O Infinite Being! Brahmaa ruling over the present cycle has now completed fifty years of his life,which is known as one paraardha. I shall now narrate Thy sportive activities during the previous night of Brahma and at the beginning of the next morning of the present paraardha.




O Lord! At the end of a creative day of Brahmaa, desirous of sleep, he along with the world merged in Thy abdomen in subtle form. At that time the whole universe became one big ocean.

O Lord! At the time when the whole universe was reduced to causal waters, Thou reclined on Aadi Shesha, the king of serpents who is also one of Thy menifestations. Thou were absorbed in yoga nidraa, in a state of pure bliss.

Thou commanded Thy power which is called Time to awaken Thee at the end of the deluge (Pralaya). Then, at the beginning of the Pralaya Thou resorted to sleep with all the various energies and the jeevas merged in Thee.




O Unparalleled Lord of the universe! When thus during the Naimittika Pralaya consisting of a thousand chaturyugas, Thou had slept, the power of time (Kaala Shakti) woke up first and awakened Thee from Thy slumber.

O Lord! Thou who were reclining in the causal waters, on waking up saw all the worlds merged in Thyself in subtle form. Thou then cast Thy glance on all of them.




Then, O Lord! There emerged from Thy naval hole a wonderful divine lotus in the form of a bud, containing in subtle form all the worlds that remained merged in Thee.

O Lord! that divine lotus bud, which originated from Thy body, rose above the causal waters and with its brilliance, removed the surrounding darkness completely.




O Lord! In the fully blossomed petals of the wonderful lotus, which was supported by Thy yogic prowess, the lotus born Brahmaa (the creator) appeared with all the Vedas self manifested in him.

O Supreme Lord of incomprehensible powers, in this age known as the Paadma Kalpa, Thou thus brought into existence the Creator Brahmaa. O Lord Vishnu! who has manifested in the temple of Guruvaayur, please eradicate my ailments.




जगत की सृष्टि का वर्णन 
Brahma sitting on the full blown lotus emerging from Thy lotus-like navel, and wondering about its origin looked all around by turning his face in all the directions. He was thus endowed with four faces and lotus-like eight beautiful eyes.

Brahmaa found himself to be all alone in the huge lotus which was tossing about in the vast ocean of causal waters. He saw the stem supporting the lotus but was unable to see Thy body and wondered as to who he was helpless and all alone and also of the source of the lotus.




Brahmaa who was of mighty intellect, decided that there must definitely be some source of this lotus. Using his yogic power he descended through the hollow of the lotus stem to look for the cause. He, however could not not see Thy most enchanting form.

Brahamaa spent a hundred divine years strenuously searching through all the orifices of the lotus stem but he could not see anything. He returned to the lotus and sat calmly with one pointed concentration and resorted to deep samaadhi solely desirous of Thy grace.




The lotus born Brahmaa was absorbed in undisturbed samaadhi for a hundred divine years.The knowledge of Reality then dawned on him. He then had the vision of Thy wonderful form which humans cannot easily see, resting on a part of Aadishesha's (the great serpent's), body. So he was full of happiness and contentment.

O Lord! That divine form of Thine with the golden crown, with a brilliant blue complexion like the beautiful Kalaaya flower (blue lily), with the shining Kaustubh jewel adorning Thy neck, with shoulder ornaments and bracelets , and with studded golden waistband and beautifully wearing a yellow silk garment (Peetaambara). This Thy form was revealed to the lotus born Brahmaa , on which I meditate.




"O Consort of Laxmi! Thy abundant glories have been sung of in the Vedaas. Hail O all-powerful Lord and remover of sorrows! It is my good fortune that Thou have revealed Thy sacred form to me. O Lord! Make my intelligence capable of creating the world." Thou, whose innumerable excellences were thus praised by Brahma, please be merciful to protect me.

O Brahmaa, may you be endowed with unending capability and expertise in the creation of the three worlds. May your devotion excel. Do penance again by which you will accomplish everything.' So saying Thou made Brahmaa's mind immensely happy.




Brahmaa then did penance for another hundred divine years, by which he attained spiritual and mental powers even more than before. He saw the lotus on which he was seated, swaying in the causal waters. He, with the powers given by Thee, drank the wind and the waters.

Brahmaa, then, by Thy grace created the three worlds out of that lotus itself and got engaged in creating the various species of beings. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Full of such compassion please cast Thy glance overflowing with great mercy on me and protect me soon.




सृष्टि-भेद-वर्णन 
O Lord of Vaikuntha! by Thy grace, with increased spiritual powers, Brahmaa started creation. He created varieties of beings, those that grow on earth and are non-moving like trees etc., as well as the moving, like animals birds etc., human beings and various divine beings. These serve as bodies for the jeevas to enter into.

Brahma then created the five-fold effects of ignorance,which are wrong apprehension, egoism, attachment, anger and fear. Having created these extremely negative qualities and repenting for doing so, he resorted to meditate on Thy lotus feet for self purification.




Brahmaa then from his mind created Sanaka, Sananda, Sanaatana Muni and Sanat Kumaras.Even though they were directed by Brahmaa to engage in the work of creation, they did not heed his words because they were highly devoted to Thy feet.

A great anger arose in Brahma, because he was refused his bidding by his mental sons, which he tried to suppress. This caused the birth of Mrida from between his eyebrows, who is a part incarnation of Thine. Mrida at once cried out and told Brahmaa to provide him with names and abodes. Thus Mrida came to be known as Rudra.




Brahmaa then prompted by Thee, gave Rudra eleven names, forms, abodes and as many wives and humbly requested him to help in the creative process.

Rudraa's creation consisted of fierce looking Rudras,which were filling up the three worlds. Brahmaa was frightened by them, and from within being prompted by Thee, told Rudra not to create any more beings, and asked him to do penance for the benefit of the world.




Brahmaa, who was intent on creation, from his own body created (the sages) Mareechi, Atri, Angiraas, Kratumuni, Pulaha, Pulastya, Bhrigu, Vasishtha, the Dakshas and also Shri Naarada, who is a devotee of Thy lotus feet.

Brahmaa further created Dharmadeva, sage Kardama and then Saraswati. He was then overcome with desire for her, his own creation. However, prompted by Thee, Sanaka Daksha and his other sons enlightened him and he gave up desire, being disillusioned.




Brahmaa then brought out the Vedas and all the Puraanas and all the other branches of learning, from his four faces and taught them to his sons. He then found himself unable to further the process of creation and so he took refuge at Thy lotus feet.

Then prompted by Thee and knowing the technique Brahmaa, from the two sides of his body created the male and the female, named Manu and his wife Shataroopa. Through them he then multiplied the human race. Thou O Govinda! Lord of Guruvaayur! kindly eradicate my ailments.




O Lord of Guruvaayur! as creation progressed, the divine sages Sanaka and the others wanting to pay their respects to Thee went to Vaikuntha loka.

Crossing the six ramparts, the sages reached Thy unmatched abode with the Naishreyasha garden, many lakes and many mansions studded with gems.

The sages were about to enter Thy abode to see Thee, when two gatekeepers, Jaya and Vijaya stopped them. This made the sages angry. All this happened by Thy prompting only.




The two gatekeepers were cursed by the sages that as their conduct was not bifitting for them to be in Vaikunthloka, they may be embodied as Asuraas. Jaya and Vijaya, Thy sevants, beseeched the sages that their devotion to Thee may not falter. So saying, they prostrated to the sages.

O Lotus-eyed Lord! Knowing all what had happened, Thou came out along with Laxmi, with Thy charming arm resting on Garuda. The sages were delighted to see Thy beautiful form.

As the sages were praising Thee with pleasing words, Thou told the two attendants, who had no refuge but Thee, to confront three lives as Asuras on earth. Overcome by compassion, then Thou granted them Thy attainment.




Thereafter,Thy two attendents took birth as great Asuras through Diti and her husband sage Kashyapa. They being begotted in the evening twilight, the twins became cruel in nature as if they were the gods of death for the world.

One son was known by the name of Hiranyakashipu and the other was known as Hiranyaaksha.They tormented the whole world, which has Thee as the master, in anger and blinded by their inherent evil tendencies.




Of the two of them, Hiranyaaksha, the great Asura, seeking a fight and not getting an opponent, immersed Thy dear earth into the water. He then roamed about roaring arrogantly, carrying a mace.

Then coming to know from the god of the waters, Varuna, that Thou are the only match for him, Hiranyaaksha roamed about searching for Thee. O Thou, who can be attained only by Thy devotees, Thou the abode of Compassion, kindly eradicate my ailments, O Lord of Guruvaayur!.




Then Swaayambhuva Manu who was engaged in the work of creation, saw the earth emerged in water, untimely (when there was no Pralaya). He went to Satyaloka, in supplication to Brahmaa, the creator, whose heart delighted in the service of Thy lotus feet, along with the other sages.

Swaayambhuva Manu told the lotus born Brahmaa that it was a pity that the earth was submerged as he was creating beings. He asked for a place to be created for the beings. Hearing this Brahmaa started to contemplate on Thy two lotus feet, for a solution to the problem.




Brahmaa took rafuge at Thy pair of lotus feet saying that he had earlier also drunk the waters and that the earth was still submerging and he did not know what to do. From Brahmaa's nostrils, who was saying thus, Thou emerged in the form of a child boar.

At first Thy size was of a thumb, then it gradually grew to the size of an elephant. Brahmaa and his sons were wonder struck seeing Thy huge form in the sky.




Brahmaa was wondering as to who the glorious boar was which had come out from his nostrils. As he was trying to reflect if it was the work of the Invincible Lord's Maayaa, Thee in the form of the boar became the size of a mountain and roared fiercely.

Hearing that fierce roar of Thine, the resident sages of the Jana, Tapa and Satya loka praised Thee. Pleased by their praises, Thou assumed a huge form and roaring again jumped into the ocean.




With Thy twitching and erect reddish hair, tail lifted up and the fierce snout pointing down and the eyes rolling, delighting the sages who were praising Thee, Thou easily broke through the clouds and jumped.

Thou entered the insides of the waters where the crocodiles were moving about, whales were whirling around and which was full of turbulent waves. The inhabitants of the nether worlds shook with fear as with a fierce roar Thou searched for the earth.




O Lord! Then seeing the earth concealed at the bottom of the Rasaatal, by the wretched Asura, Thou hastily lifted it up with the tip of the tusk of the boar, a form which Thou had asummed by Maaya. Treating the Asura with disdain who was rushing at Thee. All this was a mere sport for Thee.

Thou who had sportingly assumed the body of a boar, lifted the earth from the frightening turbulent waters of the ocean. On Thy gigantic body, the earth looked like a blade of grass stuck on the tip Thy tusk. O Lord! Save me from the disease.




O Bestower of Boons! Then Thy devotee, the sage Naarada who is skillfully diplomatic in furthering Thy purposes, approached Hiranyaaksha, who was running about searching for Thee, in the cosmic waters which barely reached his knees. Naarada calmly spoke to him, praising him and undermining Thy prowess.

When Naarada told the mighty Hiranyaaksh that the deceitful Vishnu was stealing away his own earth and how was it so , Hiranyaaksha with a roar asked where he was, where he was. Thus, following the direction given by the sage, he reached Thee, as Thou were rising up from the waters with the earth.




O Lord! Thou ignored the ridiculing words of the Asura that this is only a wild animal and the many abuses hurled by him. Thou saw the earth trembling in fear at the tip of Thy tusk and so placed her firmly on the ocean by Thy power. Then Thou at once were ready for a fight.

As the Asura was armed with a mace, Thou too flourished a mighty mace and sportingly gave him battle. As the clang of the clashing maces resounded in the sky, the hoasts of gods assembled eagerly to see the dual. Brahmaa cried out requesting Thee to kill the Asura before nightfall.




During that combat, the Asura's stroke suddenly knocked down Thy mace to the ground. With a smile on Thy face Thou invoked Thy discus (Sudarshana) which is well known for slaying of the race of the Asuras. Thou looked magnificent as the invoked discus placed itself in Thy hands.

The Asura who was angry as the Destroyer Rudra, threw his trident at Thee, and Thou broke it with the discus in Thy hands.Greatly enraged he hit Thee with his fist and also employed tricks of Maya against Thee,which may deceive the whole world but does not effect Thee who are above all Maya.




When the illusions created by the Asura were all dispersed being hit by a powerful spark of Thy divine discus, the Asura's mind was overcome by intense rage. He then attacked Thee with strong blows of his heavy fists, whereupon Thou struck him with a powerful blow with Thy big toe at the base of his ear.

That gigantic Asura crushed by the powerful blow of Thy foot, fell down with blood flowing out of his mouth. The sages praised his slaying. O Thou! Who are the embodiment of Yajna! As they did so their hearts were full and brimming with joy. They sang hymns with deep meaning.




O Infinite Lord! In Thy skin are the Vedic Mantras, Thy hair are the 'kush' grass, Thy eyes are the ghee, Thy feet are the four sacrificing priests, Thy face is 'sruk',( the ladel for sacrifice) and Thy stomach is the 'Ida' (the vessel which holds the sacrificial ingredients), Thy tongue is the soma pot. O Lord! Thy ears are the chamasas (the vessel which holds the sacrificial remnants) and Thy virility is soma. O Bestower of Boons! in Thy neck are the sacrifices called Upasat, (the subsidiary rites). Thou are the embodiment of the holy Yagna.

O Lord of Guruvaayur! O Destroyer of Madhu! Delighted with the hymns of the sages Thou shone with Thy huge and adorable form and taintless glory and retired to Thy abode of Vaikunth, revelling in Thy innate Bliss. May Thou be pleased to eradicate all my ailments.





That Swayambhuva Manu, the son of Brahmaa, spent his own Manvantara peacefully, free from all hindrances, meditating on Thy pair of lotus feet and recounting Thy glories.

During that time the Prajaapati named Kardama who was born from the shadow of Brahmaa, following his (Brahmaa's) words became keenly interested in creation. He worshipped Thee who are naturally charming, for ten thousand years.

O Lord! Thou manifested Thy form for Kardama, sitting on Garuda, as beautiful as a dark rain-bearing cloud, holding a lustruous lotus in Thy hand, with your face lit up with a smile.




Kardama was praising Thee thrilled with devotion. Thou blessed that he would have Manu's daughter Devahooti as wife. Thou also blessed that he would have nine daughters, that Thou Thyself will be born as his son Kapil and also that he (Kadarma) would finally attain union with Thee.

Manu along with his queen wife Shatarupa and the virtuous daughter Devahooti, as advised by Naarada who was prompted by Thee, approached Kardama who was awaiting their arrival.

Devahooti who was a gem among women was respectfully given by Manu to Kardama. Kardama, though solely delighted in worshipping Thee, was pleased with her by her dedicated service to him.




Thereafter Kardama by the glory of worshipping Thee, to fulfill the desires of his loving wife, took on a new body, got an aerial vehicle made, which was full of female attendents, and sported in the garden of the gods along with Devahooti.

After spending a hundred years thus and begetting nine very beautiful daughters, Kardama wanted to take up the ascetic life and retire to the forest. Yeilding to his wife's wishes and eagerly awaiting Thy birth as their son, he continued to stay on at home.





O Lord! To Devahooti who, on the advise of her husband was ever engaged in worshipping Thee, Thou were born as Kapil in order to teach mankind the means for the attainment of the Supreme Reality.

O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who were incarnate as Kapil, when Kardama left for the forest with a sense of fulfillment, Thou imparted the whole of Thy philosophy to Thy mother. Deign to hastily save me from my many ailments.




In this world when the intellect gets attached to the sense objects, which are the product of the three Gunas, it becomes the cause of bondage. Otherwise, it leads to liberation. The path of devotion indeed prevents attachment. Devotion which arises from following holy men alone should be saught after. Thou incarnate as Kapila thus instructed Devahooti.

Prakriti, (Primordial Nature), Mahat-tatva (the great Spirit),Ahankaara (I sense), the five Tanmaatraas (sound, smell, touch, form, taste), the five Bhootaas (subtle elements- space,air,fire, water, earth), Antahkarana (mind and its various modes), the ten Indriyaas (Organs, five of knowledge-hearing, seeing, touch, taste smell, and five of action-speech,hands,legs,anus,genitals), and Purush (Atman), these are the twentyfive categories. When the Purusha realizes the distinctiveness of these categories, he is liberated from the bondage of Pakriti.Thus Thou incarnate as Kapila, instructed Devahooti.




The Purusha, by itself, is free from the attributes of Prakriti, but if he identifies himself with Pakriti, then the attributes of Prakriti attach themselves to him. Prakriti will leave its hold on Purusha if he constantly worships Me and enquires into My real nature. Thou incarnate as Kapila thus instructed Devahooti.

Having purified the mind by control of the senses and by meditative postures, one should constantly meditate on My form, adorned with divine ornaments and weapons, seated on Garuda and blue and lustruous like the Tamaala tree. Thus ,Thou instructed Devahooti incarnate as Kapila.




By regularly listening to My excellences and My sportive deeds and by chanting My name, the supreme devotion is born. This devotion in which the mind flows in an uninterrupted stream towards Me, like the Ganga flows towards the sea, alone can conquer the cycle of birth and death. Thus, Thou incarnate as Kapil, instructed Devahooti.

Alas! Men acquire wealth by unfair and cruel means for the support of their own families and are in subservience to women's charms and love of children. Being devoid of devotion to Me, intensely attached to the worldly possessions, they are led to the sufferings of hell. Thus, Thou instructed Devahooti, as Kapil incarnate.




Repeatedly entering the womb for rebirth, the Jiva though retains the memory of the Supreme Reality, he loses it during the travails of birth. After going through various sufferings of childhood, he enters the stage of youth, when he once again is overcome by the infatuation of sense life. Thus, Thou incarnate as Kapil, instructed Devahooti.

A virtuous householder who makes sacrificial offerings to forefathers (Pitris) and gods (Devas), goes by the Southern path after death, and is born again when he has enjoyed the fruits of his meritorious deeds.Those who live by performing desireless actions as offerings to Me, go by the Northern path, after death. Thus Thou instructed Devahooti, incarnate as Kapila.




O Lord! Having thus known all that was to be known, Thou blessed Devahooti, who was singing Thy praise. She had attained the purity of mind and was liberated by following the path of devotion. Thou also left with a group of ascetics and Thou do stay even now, in the North East for the good of the people.

O Supreme Lord! What more do I say? Thou have firmly declared that devotion to Thy lotus feet removes all fears and fulfills all desires. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Therefore, eradicating all my ailments, endow me with devotion to Thee.




Daksha Prajaapati, the son of Brahmaa married Prasooti, the daughter of Manu and begot sixteen daughters off her. He gave thirteen of them to Dharmaa deva, Swadhaa to the Pitris, Swaahaa to Agni and Sati to Shiva who is an aspect of Thyself.

Murti the wife of Dharmadeva gave birth to Thee as her most glorious son Naaraayana, along with Nara as inseperable companion. The gods in the heavens rejoiced at this birth, they sang hymns in Thy praise, in accomponiment of musical instruments, and showered heaps of flowers.




The Asura known as Sahasrakavacha, had one thousand coats of armour. One who did penance for a thousand years and also fought with the Asura for a thousand years, simultaniously, only could pierce the armours. Thou as Naaraayan along with Nara did the required in turns and all the coats of the Asura were destroyed but one remained. Then Thou killed him effortlessly, as a sport.

Practicing and teaching the path of disciplines, leading to liberation, Thou with Nara Thy brother, dwelt in Badarikaashrama. Indra who was jealous of Thy spiritual powers, which Thou had acquired by penance and discipline, sent cupid along with celestial beauties to disturb Thee.




Cupid accompanied by spring season and the Malaya breeze, tried to attack Thee many times by the arrows consisting of the damsels' sidelong glances and their amorous movements. Finding Thee unaffected, they were frightened. Thou then smilingly spoke to them.

Thou told Cupid and others who were standing around Thee struck with wonder, and praising Thee -" O Kaamdeva, Spring and damsels! Do not fear. Look at these products of my mind." So saying Thou revealed to them the beautiful handmaids attending on Thee.




Seeing Urvashi and hearing about Thy achievements, Indra was perplexed, and thus realized Thy glory. O Bestower of Boons! This incarnation of Thee as Nara Naaraayana which is so gentle and beautiful, is excelled only by Thy incarnation as Krishna.

Thou told Cupid and others who were standing around Thee struck with wonder, and praising Thee -" O Kaamdeva, Spring and damsels! Do not fear. Look at these products of my mind." So saying Thou revealed to them the beautiful handmaids attending on Thee.




Owing to the extreme indulgence given to him by Brahmaa, Daksha was blinded with hautiness and overpowered by Rajoguna. Alas! He had no respect for Thee and had lost his mental calmness. So he became antagonistic to Shiva who is Thee alone in another form. He performed a sacrifice to show his enemity towards Shiva and also slighted his own daughter Sati.

Enraged, Shiva disrupted the sacrifice of Daksha and also cut off his head. However on being propitiated by the gods, Shiva restored Daksha to life again. His sacrifice was then completed by Thy grace, and he also achieved mental peace. O Lord of Guruvaayur! O Bestower of calmness! deign to protect me.




To the king Uttaanpaada, the son of Manu, his wife Suruchi was extremely dear. The other wife Suneeti being ignored by her husband, was helpless and took shelter in Thee alone who are eternal refuge of the helpless.

Seeing Uttama, Suruchi's son, seated on his father's lap, Suneeti's son Dhruva also tried to get up. But as a result, the child was severly scolded by Suruchi. Indeed, jealousy cannot be given up, by those who are not devoted to Thee.




The hen-pecked king who was under the influence of Thy Maayaa, silently looked on as Dhruva was scolded by Suruchi. Hurt for being scolded, Dhruva then went to his own mother Suneeti who advised him that the only way to overcome the evils of ones own past actions is to seek shelter at Thy feet.

The self respecting Dhruva, who was only five years of age, hearing his mother's words, became determined to worship Thee, and so left the town. In the forest of Madhuvana, he propitiated Thee by penance, following the method of Mantra japa and the Mantra given to him by Naarada, whom he had met on the way.




The king who was full of remorse, was pacified and consoled by Naarada who had gone to the town. Dhruva, the boy with his mind fixed on Thee, spent five months in severe penance, with increasing intensity.

Then, when all around in all the directions there was suffocation by the power of Dhruva's penance, the devas were seeking relief. Then, Thou surging with compassion, appeared seated on Garuda, in front of Dhruva, whose mind was absorbed in contemplation of the Supreme Consciousness Bliss which had assumed Thy form.




At Thy divine sight, Dhruva was completely overwhelmed and was full of the the waves of Bliss and ecstasy. As his eyes were submerged in the nectar of Thy entrancing form he was desirous of singing Thy praise. Realising his incapability of finding words, Thou with great affection touched his cheek with the conch.

He then sang Thy praise profusely, having been purified and enlightened by pure knowledge. Knowing what he had in mind, Thou blessed him to enjoy the kingdom for long and then attain the loftiest of states, that of Dhruva, from where there is no return to lower states.




When Thou disappeared after having said so, this prince Dhruva came back to town delighting all people. When his father had gone to the forest, taking over the administration of the kingdom, with all his aspirations fulfilled by Thy grace, he lived happily for a long time.

When Uttama, Dhruva's brother was killed by Yaksha, Dhruva battled with Yaksha, but withdrew on Manu's advice. Pleased with Dhruva's peaceful nature, Kuber came and offered him a boon, but the great soul asked only for firm devotion to Thee.





Finally, leaving along with his mother in the celestial car brought by Thy attendents, he is even now living happily in Dhruvaloka. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who are ever intent on protecting Thy devotees, cure my hoards of ailments.





In the line of Dhruva was the very famous king Anga whose son was Vena. Distressed at the evil nature of his son, the noble king took to the forest with his mind fixed on Thy lotus feet alone.


Though evil minded, Vena who was of great prowess was made the king by the leading citizens for the governance of the country. He always boasted of his strength and prohibited the practice of all forms of Thy worship and sacrifices.





When a group of sages approached him to advise him as to the right conduct, he indulged in abusing Thee declaring that there was no other ruler on the earth other than himself. The enraged sages cursed him. In the flame of the curse Vena was destroyed like a moth.


After his distruction, the sages feared that the absence of a ruler would lead to the tyranny of wicked people. So they took the body of Vena from his mother who had preserved it for a long time and churned the thighs. Thus his body became sinless. Then when his arms were churned, from there Thou appeared (in the form of Prithu).





This was the famous incarnation of Thee as Prithu, the sages declared thus. The minstrels and others sang in praise of Thy future achievements. The Earth who had withdrawn all her resources into her interior because of the oppression of Vena, was attacked by Thy bow and arrow, and was made to yeild back the resources.


Thou then made the gods and other species of beings to freely milk the Earth who had become like the celestial cow Surabhi. The leaders of the different groups of gods and others acted as calves milking their desired requirements in appropriate special vessels.




O Lord of the three worlds! As Thou (as Prithu) were performing sacrifices to Thyself, and were to begin the hundredth Ashwamedha Yanjya, Indra became jealous. In the guise of a lowly person he stole the Yanjya horse. He was then defeated by Thy son (Vijitashwana).

Indra who was again and again trying to steal the sacrificial horse, was about to be offered into the fire by the sacrificing sages, but they were restrained to do so by Brahmaa. When the sacrifice was completed Thou as Prithu saw Thyself manifested in Thy real form as Vishnu, the slayer of the demon Madhu.




O Lord! After getting firm devotion alone as a boon from Him (Vishnu), Thou established Thy residence on the banks of Gangaa. Once as Thou were expounding Dharma to the sages who had assembled there for Yanjya, Thou saw the Sanaka and other sages before Thee.

Receiving the ultimate knowledge imparted by Sanaka and other sages, and living in the forest, Thou realised Thy own self. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who embodied Thyself as Prithu! Be pleased to quickly cure me of all my ailments.




Prithu's great grand son Praacheenbarhis, who was reputed for his undertakings for the good of the world had the young lady Shatadruti for his wife. From her, as though sprouts of Thy compassion ,ten noble minded sons were born to him known by the group name of Prachetas.

Commanded by their father to multiply the species, these ten brothers, being firm believers in the importance of Thy worship, went to the western sea to meditate. On the shore of that sea they saw a beautiful lake.

Then, Thy greatest devotee, Lord Shiva who is always eager to see Thy devotees, came to this holy lake of Thine and appearing before the Prachetaas, taught them a great hymn in praise of Thee.





These devotees chanting the hymn, spent ten thousand years in water, in Thy worship and meditation on Thee. For the attainment of the bliss of Thy realisation, they had to spend this long period in austerities unlike Dhruva who got it very quickly.

By the increasing strength of their penance, their father Praacheenbarhis also became purified who had slain many animals in the sacrificial fires. Naarada who had gone to his house, gave him the knowledge of Aatman by which he attained a form like Thine.




By virtue of Thy compassion alone, Thou appeared before the Prachetas. Thou were seated on Thy vehicle Gaduda, having eight arms, holding the resplendent discus and other divine weapons and spreading lustre all around.

Out of Thy infinite compassion, Thou gave the Prachetas boons,even without their asking. May even Thy thought be for the benefit of the humans and confer welfare on them, and may the Rudra hymn be the fulfiller of all desires.

Being highly pleased with the Prachetas Thou blessed them that they would get the daughter of the trees as their wife. They would lead a happy life with her for ten lakh of years. Also that they would have a son named Daksha and soon thereafter they would attain Thee.




Then the Prachetas who were angered by the dense growth of the trees which were covering the surface of the whole earth and causing obstruction, started to burn them. They were dissuaded by Brahmaa to do so. Obligingly the trees gave them their daughter in marriage and they lived with her happily for the time specified by Thee.

After begetting the son Daksha and performing several sacrificial rites and having received the highest knowledge from Naarada they attained liberation. O Lord! O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who are of such merciful nature, grant protection to me.




King Priyavrata had a dear son named Asgnidhra king, of whom Naabhi was born. While Naabhi was performing a Yanjya, for propitiating Thee, he had a vision of Thee, the bestower of desired boons to devotees.

O Lord of the whole universe! The sages sang Thy praises and the king prayed to Thee for a son like Thyself. Thou then declared that Thou would Thyself be born as his son and then Thou disappeared in the sacrificial fire.

Then Thou were born as a part incarnation with the name Rishabha to Merudevi the wife of Naabhi. Thou delighted everyone with sublime virtues and glory not commonly seen in the world.




Naabhi entrusted the administration of the kingdom to Thee, who are the ruler of the three worlds and went away to the forest with his wife Merudevi to lead an ascetic life. Worshipping Thee there, he attained to Thy state of Supreme Bliss.

Owing to jealousy at the prosperity of the world generated by Thy (Rishabha's) greatness, Indra withheld rain from the continent Ajanaabha. Thereupon Thou by Thy yogic power brought enough rain on this Thy continent.

Thus defeated, Indra bestowed beautiful Jayanti on Thee as Thy wife. Though Thou were ever absorbed in the Aatman, Thou begot in her one hundred sons, the eldest of whom was king Bharat.





Nine of them became great yogis, and another nine ruled over the various regions of Bhaaaratavarsha. Thy remaining eightyone sons attained Braahminhood by the power of their austerities.


Afterwards Thou instructed Thy sons along with the great ascetics in the path of salvation through renunciation and devotion. Then adopting the life of a total renunciate Thou moved about behaving like an idiot, a mad man or a ghost.





Though Thou had attained complete identity with the Brahman, Thou continued to impart knowledge to others. Thou were free from attachment and aversion, though Thou were treated with indifference.Thou wandered all over the earth completely absorbed in the bliss of the Supreme self.


Observing the ways of the life of a python, a cow, a deer, and a crow, Thou wandered about for long, attaining identity with the Supreme Brahman. Thy body then perished in the forest fire in the Coorg mountains. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Deign to eradicate my afflictions.





In the middle of the earth is the region called Ilaavrata which is inhabited exclusively by women with Gauri as their chief. I seek refuge in Thee O Lord! Who are present there as Sankarshana and are worshipped with holy chants by Sharva (Shiva) in his 'man-woman' form known as Ardhanaareeshwara.


In the region known as Bhadraashva, situated to the east of Ilaavrata, O Lord! Thou resides as Hayagreeva. I meditate on this horse-necked form of Thine which is famed as the restorer of the Vedas lost in the deluge at the end of the cosmic cycle. This Hayagreeva form of Thine is worshipped by the Rishis Bhadraashwara with hymns of praises.





To the south of Ilaavrata is Harivarsha. There Thou are worshipped by Prahlaad and other leading devotees as Narahari, whose body is tall and white and who is calm and bestows the knowledge of Supreme Brahman. O Lord! I meditate on that form of Thee.


To the west of Ilaavrata, in the beautiful region of Ketumaalaa, Thou resides as Kaamadeva, for the pleasure of Lakshmi. Thy form is resplendent with a divine sportive and charming smile. Thou are worshipped by Lakshmi and the sons of Prajaapati. I worship Thee.





In the beautiful region of Ramyak to the north of Ilaavrata whose ruler Vaivaswata Manu worships Thee in Thy form of a fish. Thou who are very benevolent to Thy devotees and who shine in the hearts of those who are free from attachments, I worship Thee in the form of the fish.


The region called Hiranmaya which is to the north of Ramyak, Thou reside there in the form of the huge tortoise that could bear the Mandara mountain on its back. There Thou are worshipped by Aryamaa the famous chief of the Pitris. O Lord! O Supreme Pure Conciousness! I worship Thy that form.





To the north of Hiranmaya, Thou are worshipped by Thy dear consort the Earth, with the utterences of holy Mantras and hymns of praise. Thou are adored by the wise in the form of Yanjya Varaaha (the divine boar) whose gigantic body rose so high that the tusks' edges rubbed against the clouds. Do protect Thy devotees.


Towards the south of Ilaavrata, residing in the region known as Kimpurusha, Thou are worshipped by Hanumaan with firm and unwavering devotion. O Lord Vishnu! Thou as Raama do shine with a wonderful and resplendent form form that captivates Sita and is made more charming by her presence. Do protect us, O Vishnu!





Along with Naarada, by the leading devotees of Bhaarata region Thou are meditated upon and praised with hymns based on Saankhya and Yoga. In Bhaaratavarsha as Naaraayana with Nara as companion, Thou do reside till Pralaya (deluge) time,for the protection of the virtuous. Deign to protect all devotees.


O Lord! Thou are worshipped by the people in the form of the sun in Plaaksha, as the Moon in Shaalmala, as fire in Kushadveep, as water in Kraunch, as wind in Shaaka and as Brahmaa in the place named Pushkara.





Dhruva - the Pole star, and all the groups of stars and planets who are imagined as forming the limbs and tail of the great Fish Shinshumaar, in that form , Thou are meditated upon by the enlightened ones, at the three Sandhyaas. O Lord! Reposing on the Milk Ocean! deign to eradicate my suffering and my sins.


I worship Thee as Aadishesha the great serpent. Thou residing at the bottom of Paataal, having a thousand heads, which shine with a single ever quivering earing, wearing a blue garment, and having a plough as weapon, are worshipped by Naaga (serpant) damsels. May Thou O Lord of Guruvaayur be pleased to relieve me of my ailments.





O Lord! Long ago there was a Braahmin householder named Ajaamil who led a virtuous life. He went to the forest (for collecting sacrificial fuel) at his father's request. There he met an immoral, immodest woman who was given to drinking.


Though by nature a man of self control his mind was attracted to her. He gave up all his duties and revelling in her company led a sinful life. As he became old, he became very much attached to his son who bore Thy name - Naaraayana.





At the time of death, he saw before him three fierce looking emmissaries of Yama - the god of death. He called out in frieght the name of his son Naaraayana, induced by the strength of the memory of his past devotion to Thee.


In spite of his evil nature, by the glory of the letters of Thy name uttered by him, there appeared before him, Thy emmissaries.They had four arms and were wearing yellow robes and were of enchanting appearance.





Seeing Ajaamil tied up with ropes and being dragged by the messangers of Yama, they were obstructed by Thy emmissaries by force and were stopped to do so. Then the emmissaries of Yama narrate all his sins.


O Lord! Thy emissaries told them that even if there were sins, how was it that there was punishment when atonement had been made. Did people like them who were learned, not know what atonement was?





O Lord! Thy emissaries told them that in the Srutis and Smritis as per the vows which are laid down, they absolve a person from sins, but do not curb the sinful tendency. Whereas, the service of the Lord! Destroys both - the sins and the sinful tendencies.


O Lord! Thy emmisaarries told the messengers of Yama that though overcome by fear, Ajaamil had uttered the Name of Hari. By that alone he had atoned for all the sins committed by him in innumerable lives.





O Lord! Thy emissaries told them that even if the chanting of The Name of Mukund is done unknowingly, by the human beings, it burns up all their sins. Its glory is like that of fire burning the fuel and like the medicine curing the diease.


The messangers of Yama left when they were told thus. The group of Thy emissaries also disappeared. Ajaamil remembered and worshipped Thee for some time and then attained Thy abode led by Thy emissaries.


Yama was very much concerened at the report of his messengers. He strictly instructed them not to go to the devotees of Thy feet. O Lord! O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who are such, protect me.





The son of one of the Prachetas, another Daksha, indeed, desirous of multiplying the progeny, worshipped Thee. Then Thou appeared with eight resplendent arms and gave him a boon and also Asikni as wife.



His eleven thousand sons, on the advice of Shree Naarada took to the path of devotion to Thee, to attain liberation. Daksha was displeased with Naarada and so pronounced a curse on him that he would not have any fixed place of residence. Sage Naarada, the highest of devotees, considered it only as blessing.





Then Daksha multiplyied the species through his sixty daughters. His daughter's son's son named Vishwaroopa made Indra win the battle against the Asuras. Indra was provided protection and victory by learning from Vishwaroopa the hymn addressed to Thee (Naaraayana Kavacha). O Lord! Thy glory can indeed conquer all.



Once upon a time, in the kingdom named Shoorsena the king Chitraketu was desirous of getting a son. By the blessings of sage Angirasa he got a son. The child was killed by his other wives out of jealousy. The king fainted with grief owing to the power of Thy Maayaa.




The merciful Naarada and sage Angirasa went to Chitraketu and showed him the soul of his dead son. The soul asked 'whose son am I?' These words dispelled the king's delusion. The sages then instructed him in the ways of Thy worship.


Then receiving hymns and Mantras from Naarada, he practised austerities for propitiating Thee who were in the form of Aadishesha. Wthin seven days he obtained the leadership of the Vidyaadharas. Still dissatisfied, he continued to worship Thee with the same fervour.





Presently Thou revealed Thyself to him in Thy form of Aadishesha, with a thousand hoods and white like a lotus stalk,surrounded by bands of Sidhdhaas singing hymns of praise. Pleased with the hymns, Thou blessed him and imparted to him the knowledge of the self and then Thou disappeared.


This great devotee Chitraketu for many many years wandered about happily in all the worlds without much attachment. He led the troupe of beautiful Vidyaadharis and also caused Thy glories and excellences to be sung, to his hearts content.




To rid himself completely of all sensuous hankerings, prompted by Thee, he once went to Mount Kailaash. There he saw the destroyer of Kaamadeva , Shankara, sitting in the assembly of sages with his consort Umaa seated on his lap without any concern. Chitraketu mocked at him and in turn was cursed by Umaa.



Unperturbed, Chitraketu did not ask for relief from the curse, and was born as Vritraasura. By his devotion, while fighting in the battle against Indra, he imparted the knowledge of the self to Indra and he removed the delusion of even his enemy. Thereby he reached Thy abode. What a wonder!




Diti, the mother of the Asuras, worshipped Thee in order to have a son who would kill Indra, but instead gave birth to Maruts who became friends of Indra. By worshipping Thee, even an evil minded person receives good only. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who are like that, deign to protect me.




O Lord! Slayer of Madhu! When Hiranyaaksha was killed by Thee, incarnate as the Divine Boar, his brother named Hiranyakashipu was smitten with sorrow and anger. In the assembly of the Asuras he swore to kill Thee.

He quickly compelled Brahmaa to appear before him by performing severe austerities and made him give a boon that he would not be killed by god, man or beast etc. As a result of the boon he became arrogant and tormented the whole world which has Thee as its Lord. Disregarding Thee, he even snatched the heavens from Indra.




To kill Thee, he even went to Thy abode Vaikuntha. Thou disappeared from his gross vision and entered into his heart in a subtle form. Roaring aloud he searched for Thee in all the three worlds, and not finding Thee, he thought that Thou had fled in fear. Considering himself the winner he returned home.

To him was born a son named Prahlaad. Even when he was in the womb, he had learnt the glory of devotion to Thee from sage Naarada. Though by birth he was an Asura, and just a child, O Bestower of Boons! He had intense love for Thee, and became the most outstanding example for all Thy devotees.




The evil minded Hiranyakashipu had Prahlaad brain washed by competent instructors for long, because he saw signs of devotion to Thee and also the ridicule of the Asuras in his son. He however rejected all their teachings as leading only to evil and grew up with his devotional zeal.

On being asked about what was the best that he had learned, he answered that devotion to Thee was the greatest. Agitated at this, Hiranyakashipu was very angry with the teachers, but they told him that this was his son's natural inclination. At this he started planning ways to kill Prahlaad who was Thy great devotee, having taken refuge at Thy feet.




O All Pervading Supreme Being! What a wonder! Though he was pierced with tridents many times, trampled again and again by herds of huge elephants, bitten by great serpents, starved, poisoned and thrown down from the mountain peaks,he did not feel any suffering as his mind was completely fixed on Thee.

The very cruel father was frightened at this. At the advice of the teacher, Prahlaad was tied up with ropes at the teacher's house. But whenever the teacher was away, Prahlaad began to teach the Asura boys, who were with him, the doctrine of love for, and knowledge of Thee.




Hearing that all the boys were now singing Thy praise, Hiranyakashipu became blind with rage. He shouted at Prahlaad that the traitor that he was, who was his strength? That courageous boy replied that Lord Vishnu was his strength, in as much as He was also his (father's) strength and of the whole universe. Also that the three worlds were his manifestation indeed.

O where is he? Where is he? The soul of all the worlds who is known as Hari? The son of Diti asking struck the pillar brandishing the sword. O Vishnu! O Lord! What happened then I am unable to describe immediately. O All Merciful! O All pervading One! O resident of Guruvaayur! Deign to make me whole.




As Hiranyakashipu struck at the pillar, he heard a terrific sound which split his ears.Thy roar was so fierce that it made everything inside the vessel of Brahmaanda tremble. Hearing this sound which was never heard before, the Asura king felt an awesome and incredible shiver within. Even the lotus born Brahmaa was shaken from his throne.

As the Asura cast his eyes all around in great confused excitement, from the pillar emerged, O Lord! Thy form which was neither of a beast nor of a human being. While the Asura in an agitated state of mind wondered as to what this terrific wonderous being might be, Thou expanded into a form with a shining body on which sharp hair was bristling.




O Hail unto that form of Thine with fierce rolling eyes shining like molten gold, with quivering mane overcasting the skies, with a wide open cave like mouth, with a sword like huge tongue lolling out, revealing a pair of huge extremely fierce molars.

I salute Thy Man-Lion form with chin rendered forbidding due to the folds of the skin drawn upwards (while roaring), with a short stout neck, with a hundred powerful arms projecting ferocious lustruous claws, with a terrific burst of roaring voice, resounding the skies and driving away the hosts of rivals in fright.




The Asura king rushed towards Thee, whirling a formidable mace and saying that this must be Vishnu and that he would kill him. He was caught hold of by Thy two stout arms. The mighty Asura slipped out from Thy clutches. Then grabbing a sword and shield, he displayed astonishing feats of swordsmanship and rushed towards Thee, who were in a mood to swallow all the worlds. O what a wonder!

Catching hold of the wicked Asura quickly with two hands, who was circling around, Thou threw him flat on Thy lap in the doorway, deeply embedded Thy nails in his chest and tore it open. Thou then with great glee drank again and again the blood that gushed out of the Asura's body,fiercely roaring with lion roars which were powerful enough to shatter the whole universe.




Abondoning the dead Asura, Thou sprang up hastily with Thy gigantic body bathed in blood and started eating up the entire host of Asuras. O What a wonder! All the worlds whirled, the oceans got turbulent, the mountains trembled, the stars and celestial luminaries and all animate and inanimate things got scattered. A state of total and unbearable chaos took over.

Thou sat in the assemblage roaring again and again in great wrath with Thy body forbiddingly terrific being smeared with flesh and fat and garlanded by the intestines (of Hiranyakashipu). Overwhelmed with awe no one dared to approach Thee, and stood far away. Even Shiva, Brahmaa, Indra and others kept at a distance, singing Thy praises individually (and tried to pacify Thee).




Even then, when Thou were still in a state of unabated rage, by Brahmaa's instruction the boy Prahlaad free of fear prostrated at Thy feet. Thou calmed down being overcome by love and compassion and placed Thy hand on Prahlaad's head. He burst into a hymn in praise of Thee and unasked for received a boon from Thee which was for the benefit of the whole world.

In this way Thou enacted a drama of ferocity. O All Pervading Lord! As described in the Shruti named Taapaneeya, as per the hymns of Thy excellences sung therein,Thou are absolutely pure and free from anger. Thou who are thus, superceding everything else, O Lord! who can overcome Thee? O Thou who are fond of Prahlaad! O Lord of Guruvaayur! be pleased to cure me of all my ailments.




Indradyumna, Thy great devotee and the king of Paandya land was once engrossed in worshipping Thee on the Malaya mountain. He was so absorbed that he did not even notice sage Agastya who approached expecting his hospitality.

Agastya who was overcome with anger cursed the king that as he was of such haughty nature he would be born as an elephant and departed. Indradyumna got the form of a lordly elephant with the good fortune of retaining a clear memory of Thee.




On the Trikoota mountain, which is in the centre of the milk ocean, this leader of the elephants sported with female elephants excelling all other creatures in strength. Where don’t Thy devotees attain superiority?

Owing to his strength and by the power of the divine region, where he lived, the elephant king did not face any hardships of life. One day, roaming on the mountainious region, unable to bear the heat of the sun, he sought relief in a lake and sported therein with his herds, indeed prompted by Thee.




At that time, in the waters of that lake, there lived a Gandarva named Huhu, who had become a crocodile because of the curse of sage Devala. He caught the elephant king by the leg. Indeed Thou do give sufferings to Thy devotees for their ultimate welfare.

Supported by the power derived from the glory of Thy worship, the elephant king was invincible and went on fighting for a thousand years. When the time for his redemption had come, and he was fit for one-pointed devotion to Thee, Thou subjected him to this situation.




Under the stress of suffering, his inherent devotion and pure knowledge unfolded and he began to offer Thee worship with white lotus flowers plucked with his trunk. Relating to the attributeless Brahman, he sang continuously a great hymn which he had learnt in the past life.

On hearing the hymn, Brahmaa, Shiva and other gods did not proceed towards the elephant king, as they felt that the hymn was not addressed to them. The Soul of All Beings! Thou moved by boundless flow of mercy, mounted the Garuda and appeared in front of him.




Thou with Thy lotus hands caught jold of that elephant king and cut asunder the powerful crocodile with Thy discus. The crocodile was thus released from the curse of sage Devala and got back his Gandharva form. The elephant was, by Thee, then endowed with a brilliant form similar to Thy from.

"He who praises you and Me with the recital of these incidents will attain liberation". O Vishnu, Thou said thus to him and then along with him departed to Thy abode Vaikuntha. O Lord of Guruvaayur! May Thou be pleased to protect me.




The sage Durvaasaa once gave a celestial garland to Indra, which he had got from heavenly nymphs. When he saw the garland being crushed by Indra's elephant, he cursed Indra. Where can forebearance be seen except in those born of and blessed by Thee.

O Bestower of Liberation! Indra known as the unaging one, became aged as a result of Durvaasaa's curse. His followers, the Devas lost all their glory and were defeated by the Asuraas. The gods along with Shiva and others went to Brahmaa and they all took refuge in Thee.




Brahmaa and the other gods sung Thy excellences for long. O Bestower of Boons! Thou then manifested Thyself before them in great glory and commanded them to make peace with the Asuras and then prepare to churn the milk ocean for nectar.

Devas made peace with the Asuras and with great pride carried the Mandara mountain for use as a churning rod. The mountain fell from their hands on the way. Then Thou seated on Garuda, picked it up as if it were a tiny berry and installed it in the milk ocean.




Then quickly placing Vasuki snake as the churning rope, the Devas and Asuras started the process of churning the milk ocean in which all kinds of herbs and seeds had been put. Thou then cleverly made the Asuras hold the head end of the snake.

When the Mandara mountain as a churning rod had fully stirred the waters of the milk ocean to its depth, it sank due to its own weight. The Devas became very worried. Thee who are their well wisher, assumed the form of a tortoise with a hard back.




O All pervading Being! by diving deep into the ocean Thou lifted up the sinking mountain on Thy back which was harder than a thunderbolt and more than a lakh of Yojanas in width.

When the mountain was lifted up, they, the Devas and Asuras all churned with great force and enthusiasm. Thou entering into both the parties and also into the snake Vasuki, removed their fatigue and envigourated them.




When the Mandara mountain rose up because of the powerful speed of the whirling, Thou placed Thy one lotus hand firmly on it, to keep it in position. Brahmaa Shiva and other gods were overwhelmed with joy and praised Thee as they shed showers of flowers.

The group of Asuras were scorched by the fire emitting from the mouth of the serpant. The Devas were also to some extent troubled. O Lord! By Thy compassion the clouds were made to rain on the Devas to cool them, but not on the Asuras.




Inspite of being churned for long, the ocean remained unchanged, though many fish crocodile and other aquatic creatures were thrown up. Thou alone, then, shining brilliantly, with Thy two hands pulled the two ends of the serpant. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Relieve me of my diseases.




First and foremost there emerged from the ocean the Kaalakoota poison which was like molten fire. The gods propitiated Shiva by singing hymns of praise to him. He then drank the poison to please Thee.

As the Devas and Asuras were churning, the divine cow Kaamadhenu came out.Thou gave it to the sages. O Lord of the three worlds! Then emerged the jewel of a horse (Uchchaishrava), then the great elephant (Airaavata), then the celestial tree (Kalpaka) and the Apsaras (divine damsels) appeared. Thou gave them to the gods.

O Lord of the worlds! Devoted to Thee, then the enchanting Lakshmi Devi emerged. Seeing her pure and perfect form everyone was fascinated and the world got agitated with desire.




The goddess who had set her heart on Thee was given a bejewelled throne by Indra. With the objects which everyone had brought, the sages consecrated her, while they sang Vedic hymns.

As the holy waters were pouring on her, her creeper like body was adorned by Thy enamoured side glances. The gods further bedecked her with gem studded earrings, yellow silk robe and necklaces etc.

Lakshmi Devi holding a wedding garland having humming bees on it, approached Thee with a gait slowed down by the weight of her heavy breasts. As she walked, the beautiful anklets adorning her shapely feet spread a delightful sound and a touch of coyness on her face enhanced her beauty.




She realised that all other gods as Shiva Brahmaa and others though endowed with virtues, were not free from all defects. Thou who are perfect in every way, she put the divine garland on Thee.

Lakshmi Devi, the mother of the universe, was immediately taken by Thee on Thy bosom giving her due respect and honor as she was solely devoted to Thee. Shining on Thy bosom she showered compassionate glances all around which brought prosperity to the whole world.

Then the highly exciting, deluding and intoxicating liquor gushed forth. This, the source of sins and vices, Thou ceremoniously gave to the great Asuras.

From the ocean, then, Thou emerged beautiful like a fresh rain cloud in the form of Dhanwantari holding in Thy two hands the pot of nectar. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Deign to remove all my ailments.




Thou emerged from the ocean as Dhanvantari holding the pot of nectar which the Asuras snatched from Thy hands. The devas became helpless. After consoling them, Thou immediately disappeared. O Lord! Then prompted by Thy Maayaa the Asuras started to quarrel amongst themselves.

Thou then took the form of a beautiful young maiden - beautiful by complexion, young by age, whose frame was bent due to the weight of her high heavy breasts. All the Asuras abondoned their quarrel about the pot of nectar, and thirstily approached Thee infatuated by the sight of Thy pot-like breasts.




O doe-eyed lady, who are you? Distribute this nectar', entreated the Asuras, helplessly being overcome by passion. 'How do you trust me? O Asuras, as I am a whore.' Even though Thou said so, Thou commanded their trust.

Readily and joyfully the pot of nectar was handed over to Thee, as Mohini. Asking them to bear with Thee, Thy wrong deed, Thou made the Devas and Asuras sit in separate rows. Holding the Asuras infatuated and spellbound by the charming and sportive gait, Thou served the nectar.




When the Asuras were wrongfully contemplating that Thou as Mohini were fond of them, and so were waiting silently, Thou finished the nectar among the Devas, as Thou always favour Thy devotees. Then Thou took Thy own form, and beheaded the Asura Raahu who had drunk half of the nectar served to him which he cunningly got by sitting in the row of the Devas.

Having meted out to the Asuras the punishment for snatching away the pot of nectar from thy hands, Thou departed.The Asuras again started a fight with the devas. In the thick of the fierce battle, the Devas were reduced to a state of swoon by the Asura Bali's magical arts.Thou then reappeared in the battle field.




In the battle Thou killed Kaalnemi, Maali and other Asuras. Indra killed Bali, Jaambvaan, Vaali, along with Paakaasura. Naamuchi who could not be killed by either dry or wet weapons was cut off by a weapon made of foam. Thou then stopped the battle on the advice of Naarada.

Shiva heard of Thy female form which Thou had taken to delude the Asuras and was eager to see it. He therefore went to Thy abode along with Umaa and the Bhootas. He beseeched Thee with hymns and praises and stated his purpose of visit. Thou then immediately disappeared.




In the far portion of the garden, Shiva saw Thee in the form of a most beautiful damsel, whose eyes roamed about as she played with a ball. Her robes were slipping down in the course of the movements. The conqueror of Kaamdeva, Shiva, was so overcome by desire that he embraced Thee.

Shiva persued Mohini who was running away. He obtained knowledge of the pure self, only as his seed escaped. After being honoured by Thee, he narrated Thy greatness to Umaa. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Of such greatness, protect me.




The high souled Bali was killed in the battle by Indra, but his body was revived by Shukraachaarya. By performing the Vishwajit Sacrifice he grew in prowess and being a descendent of Prahlaad, he was not afraid of Thy discus. So Devas had to flee in fear of the victorious Bali who conquered the three worlds where the Devas had hid themselves.

Aditi was very much tormented on seeing the plight of her sons the Devas. She approached her husband Kaashyapa for help. He advised her to observe the Payovrata worship unto Thee. She performed it for twelve days with full devotion to Thee.




At the end of the worship, Thou with four arms and blue complexion appeared in front of her whose mind was fixed on Thee.There , at that moment, when she was bowing to Thee, Thou told her that Thou would be born as her son. Thou also charged her to let the meeting be a secret and then Thou disappeared.

Then placing Thyself in Kaashyapa's austerity bourn seed, Thou entered into Aditi's womb. Praised by Brahmaa Thou were delivered as a divine child with evident marks of Vishnu's glory, on the auspicious day of the confluence of Dvaadashi and Shraavana Nakshatra.




The Devas in great joy were showering flowers on that hermitage where Thou were born and were blowing trumpets. Thy Parents were praising Thee with folded hands, just then Thou took on the form of a talented handsome Brahmachaarin.

Kaashyapa Prajaapati and others adorned Thee with the sacred thread, staff, deer skin, and a garland of beads. O Lord! Being conferred upon, and worshipped,Thou performed the rites with the sacred fire and with Thy resplendent form departed for the house of Bali where the Ashvamedha Yanjya was being performed.




As Thou marched forth, Thy body's weight shook the earth, indicating the subsequent manifestation of the might befitting the majesty. Thou held an umbrella as if to ward off the heat of the aggressiveness of all opponents, and carried a staff as though to apply it on the Asura people.

Thou reached the venue of the Ashvamedha Yanjya on the northern bank of the Narmadaa river. By Thy brilliance the eyes of Shukra and others were dazzeled and they wondered if it was the Sun or Agni or the Sage Sanat Kumaara, who was he?




Bhrigu and others who were overwhelmed by Thy majestic charm received Thee quickly. The thrilled Asura Bali, with devotion, approached Thee of charming appearance. Asura Bali, who had done noble deeds, washed Thy feet and sprinkled that holiest of the holy waters on his head.

The son of Diti, the Asura Bali, was very fortunate, by the glory of being born in the line of Prahlaad, or by having performed sacrifices,or by his faith in and service to holy men, to get this holy water from Thy feet. O Lord! This water is meant to sanctify Shiva's head. O Thou! Who resides in Guruvaayur! please protect me.




Impressed on seeing Thy glorious majestic sight, the Asura Bali honoured and worshipped Thee in every way. He said with folded palms 'What do you desire from me? O Braahmin boy, you say, is it wealth, food, house or land or everything. I shall give you all.'

On hearing those bold words of Bali, though filled with compassion Thou were desirous of curbing his pride. Speaking highly of the generosity of the Asura clan, Thou asked for earth measureable by Thy three steps. To ask for all, would have invited sneer from everyone.




To me, who is the lord of all the three worlds how do you ask for mere three paces of earth? You simpleton! Of what use is this? Ask for the whole earth.' Thus he proudly told Thee. Because of this pride he failed to give fully even three paces of earth and invited ridicule and bondage. Bali did not deserve it but he was subjected to all this for acquiring complete detachment.

O Bestower of Boons! When Thou told him that he who is not satisfied with three steps of land will not be satisfied even by the three worlds, Bali was about to pour the pre-gift oblation water to Thee. To test Bali's integrity, and so by Thy prompting the Guru of Asuras, Shukraachaarya, told him clearly to refrain from giving the gift since Thou were Hari.




Bali firmly said that he would consider himself blessed if the Lord himself comes begging to him thus, and so he would certainly make the gift. For such a disobedience Kaavya, (Shukraachaarya) cursed him. Then, to Thee whose feet had already been washed by the waters poured by Bali's wife Vindhyaavali, he proceeded to offer everything with the pouring of the water. How wonderful!

When the Asura king Bali, without any doubt and hesitation offered and gave to Thee everything, the sages and the Devas shed a rain of flowers. As all the inhabitants of the three worlds looked on, that divine form of Thine as Vaamana, increased higher and higher extending to the dimension of the cosmic sphere.




As the tip of Thy feet reached its own realm, the Satyalok, Brahmaa washed the foot with the water from his kamandalu-jug. That water, which became Aakaash Ganga, purified all the worlds. The Gandharvaas danced and danced in ecstasy. On this auspicious occassion the great devotee Jaambavaan went around the world beating the drum.

O Lord! The Asuras started to fight with the Devas without their master Bali's permission.They were defeated by Thy emissaries who had come there and were fighting on the Deva's side. Bali told them that the Lord in the form of Time was standing before them by whose grace they had won earlier, and was now against them. So it was no use to fight. At this the Asuras went away to Paataala.




Garuda, Thy attendent had tied Bali with ropes by this time. Thou asked him loudly, 'Show me the place for my third step. Are you not the lord of the three worlds?' Without any hesitation Bali requested Thee to place Thy foot on his head to measure the third step. Prahlaad himself appeared by Bali's side, praised him and sang hymns of praises to Thee.

"O Asura! In order to curb your pride completely, all this was done. You are blessed by your many good deeds. You will rule your region Sutala, which will be superior even to heaven. Later, in the next Manvantra you will become Indra and ultimately you will attain union with me." Blessing Bali thus, Thou had the priests complete the great Vishwajit Yanjya. O Lord of Guruvaayur! protect me.




Long ago during the Pralaya which took place at the end of the sixth Manvantara, when Brahmaa was about to sleep, the great Asura Hayagreeva stole the Vedas from his mouth. In order to restore them, Thou decided to incarnate as a fish.

Sage Satyavrata, the king of Dramila, was doing Tarpana in the waters of the river Kritamaalaa. In his joined palms, then, Thou appeared as an lustruous undescribable form of a shining tiny fish.

When the royal sage threw Thee in the water, seeing Thee very frightened he took Thee to his home in the kamandalu, the water vessel. In a few days, Thou outgrew the pot, the well, the tank and the lake.




Then at Thy command sage Satyavrata took Thee to the ocean by means of his yogic powers. On his expressing a desire to see the Pralaya, Thou asked him to wait for seven days. Then Thou disappeared.

When the day mentioned by Thee arrived, the earth was engulfed by incessent downpour of rain. The great sage Satyavrata along with the Saptarshis floundering in the limitless expanse of tremulous waters sought refuge in Thee.

Ever obedient to Thee the earth in the form of a boat approached at Thy command which they then boarded. And when they were terrified by the boat's trembling, Thou again appeared in the ocean in the form of a huge fish.




The sages were delighted to see Thee of exceeding glory in the form of a fish about a lakh of yojanas in length. At Thy command, they tied the boat to Thy high prominent horns.

As Thou pulled the boat, Thou showed the sages the various regions of the world. The great king Satyavrata sang hymns of Thy glory, and Thou moved about bestowing on him the knowledge of the Aatman.

At the end of the Pralaya, Thou installed the seven sages in their places as before. The king Satyavrata was installed as the Vaivasvata Manu. Then Thou attacked the demon Hayagreeva in great rage.

Thou with Thy great horns tore apart the chest of the Asura Hayagreeva and killed him. Then recovering the Vedas, handed them over to the delighted Brahmaa. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Protect me.




Nabhaag was the son of Vaivasvata Manu, to whom Naabhaaga was born. To him king Ambareesh was born who ruled the earth surrounded by the seven seas. Yet, Ambareesh always delighted in serving Thy devotees and in worshipping Thee whole heartedly.

Performing all his action in total dedication to Thee, O Lord! He soon gained Thy grace. By virtue of which, even without his asking, Thou comissioned Thy thousand pointed discus to protect him.





In order to worship Thee, along with his pious wife, he observed the Dwaadashi fasting rites for one year on the banks of the Yamuna river, in Maduvana. He conducted a great poojaa, honouring holy men and by giving away to them sixty crores of cows.


Then, there, after Thy worship was performed, on the day of the breaking of the fast and taking food, the sage Durvaasaa arrived at the king's palace, and was invited to take food. The sage who was by nature inconsiderate and a trouble giver, leisurely went to the river Yamunaa to perform his obligatory rites.




The king was anxious as the time was expiring for taking food. So, the king Ambareesha who was devoted to Thee broke the fast by taking a sip of water. When the sage arrived and came to know by his divine insight of what had happened, he rebuked the king and angrily plucked his matted hair and created Krityaa an evil spirit.

The king seeing in front the spirit holding a sword and scorching the world, did not budge a bit from his place. Noticing Thy devotee in danger, Thy Discus Sudarshana consumed Krityaa's fire like a moth and then chased the sage who was running away.




Running around the limitless worlds fearfully, Durvaasaa saw Thy discus alone everywhere. He went to Brahmaa for respite, who dismissed him saying that who could overcome the wheel of time. He then went to Shiva, he who also made obeisance to Thee alone.

Then, when the sage Durvaasaa reached Thy abode and was prostating before Thee, O Infinite Lord! Thou told him,'O Rishi, I am only a servant of my devotees. Knowledge and austerity combined with modesty and humility only is respected. Go and seek shelter at the feet of Ambareesh himself.




Coming back to Ambareesh, the sage clasped his feet for pardon. The king moved back and withdrew his feet out of humility and praised Thy weapon the discus Sudarshana.On the discus retiring, the sage was all praises for Ambareesh for his devotion and the kindness shown inspite of being wronged. He gave the king all the blessings.

The king waited for the sage to return and did not take food for one year.Then he fed him well and sent him off happy, after which only he took food himself.The king became more firmly devoted to Thee than before and ultimately attained union with Thee. O Lord of Guruvaayur! May Thou protect me.




The Devas prayed to Thee for the distruction of Raavana. In the kingdom of Kosala, the sage Rishyashringa performed the Putrakaameshti Ynjya on the request of the King Dashratha. From the Yanajya emerged the divine paayasa which the king distributed among his three wives, by eating it they concieved simultaneously. Thou were born to them as Raama, then yourself as Lakshmana ,also as Bharat, and Shatrughna, by these names.

At the bidding of Thy father, followed by Lakshmana, Thou proceeded to protect the great sacrifice of Vishwaamitra, carrying the bow Kodanda. To remove the fatigue of the way, the sage imparted two Mantraas -Bala and Atibala. By the order of the sage, for the relief of the men, Thou destroyed the demoness Taadakaa, with arrows. After receiving from the sage instructions in the use of several divine missiles, Thou went to the forest with the sage and then to the hermitage named Siddhaashrama.




At the beginning of the sacrificial rites, Thou chased Maareecha and with arrows killed the other Raakshasas. On the way Thou purified Ahilyaa of her sins by the dust of Thy feet. On reaching Janaka's palace and breaking the bow of Shiva, Thou won Seetaa, the daughter of the earth, as Thy consort, who was Lakshmi herself. Along with the three great brothers and their wives Thou set out for Thy kingdom.

O Radiant Lord! Parashuraama, the foremost of the Bhrigu clan, confronted Thee with great anger and was defeated. He then transmitted all his powers to Thee and went away. Thou went to Ayodhyaa and lived happily with Thy consort Seetaa. Then one day, when Bharat along with Shatrughna had gone to his uncle's kingdom,Thy father fixed Thy coronation which was obstructed by the daughter of the king Kekaya, i.e., Kekayee.




To keep Thy father's words Thou proceeded to go to the forest accompanied by Thy consort Seetaa, and brother Lakshmana, armed with a bow. The crowd of citizens stricken with grief, who followed Thee, Thou sent back and on the way went to the residence of Guha. In an ascetic garb of bark cloth and matted hair Thou crossed the Gangaa in a boat and paid obeisance to sage Bharadwaaja who lived near by. On the sage's instruction Thou camped on the great mountain Chitrakoota and lived there very happily.

Hearing from Bharat about Thy father's demise on account of the pangs of seperation from the son (Thee), Thou were tormented and performed Tarpana for him. Then Thou bestowed Thy sandals and the kingdom to Bharata and paid homage to sage Atri. Going into the dense vast forest Dandaka, Thou killed the ferocious bodied demon Viraadha, and Thou graciously gave salvation to sage Shaarabhangee.




After paying obeisance to sage Agastya, Thou the well wisher of the sages, promised to destroy the multitude of demons to the core. Then the sage gave Thee the divine Vaishnava bow and also the Brahmaastra. Thou also met Thy father's friend Jataayu and lived happily with Thy consort Seetaa in Panchawati on the banks of the river Godaavaree.

Shoorpanakhaa approached Thee overcome with passion. Annoyed by her love lorn advances, Thou sent her away to Lakshmana who in great rage cut off her nose. Khar Dooshana and Trishira seeing her state came to attack Thee in great anger. O Thou! Whose powers know no decline, Thou killed them and other more than ten thousand Raakshasas all at once then and there.




Raavana's sister Shurpanakhaa gave an account of Seetaa by which he was infatuated and ordered Maareech to become the illusive deer. The lotus eyed Seetaa, made a desire for the deer and Thou went after it and killed it with an arrow. As Maareech died, he gave an illusive cry imitating Raama. Hearing the cry , Seetaa sent away Thy younger brother Lakshmana after him. Finding her alone Raavana abducted Seetaa. Though Thou were grieved at this, Thou also felt some joy as this gave a good reason to kill Raavana.

While searching for Seetaa, the dying Jataayu informed Thee that Raavana had abducted Seetaa and also had inflicted fatal wounds on him, when offered resistence.Thou performed the funeral rites of this friend Jataayu. On the way the monster Kabandha obstructed Thee and was killed. Thou then gave salvation to the ascetic woman Shabari and also got to meet Hanumaana on the banks of the river Pampaa, to Thy great delight. O Lord of Guruvaayur! protect me.




Having taken alliance with Sugreeva which was brought about by Hanumaan, Thou flung far away the corpse of the Asura Dundubhi with Thy toe and also cut through seven Saala trees by a single arrow simultaniously, to demonstrate Thy strength to Sugreeva. Baali who was incomparable in strength and was eager to kill Sugreeva was killed by Thee by using a strategy. Thou then spent the rainy season tormented by the pangs of separation from Seetaa, near the hermitage of sage Matanga.

When Thy younger brother Lakshmana admonished Sugreeva, he in fear approached Thee marshalling an army of monkeys, to search for Thy wife Seeta in all directions. Thou were delighted to see this and gave to Hanumaan who was standing before Thee, a message and a signet ring for Seetaa. The monkeys very diligently started on the mission to search for Thy consort Seeta.




On hearing Thy account Sampaati had grown fresh wings and flew away. As Sampaati had told him the whereabouts of Seetaa, Hanumaan jumped across the ocean and reached the city of Lankaa. There he saw Seetaa and gave her the ring, destroyed the garden, killed Aksha kumaar in the famous battle, and put up with the Brahmaastra bondage. Then he met the ten faced Raavana and burned down Lankaa. Hanumaan then quickly went to Thee and gave Thee the crest jewel sent by Seetaa.

Thou set out with a huge army of monkeys led by great warriors Sugreeva, Angad and others and conquering the whole earth reached the shore of the ocean. Raavana's younger brother Vibheeshana, crossed over to Thy side, and taking refuge in Thee, disclosed the secrets of the enemy which Thou heard in secret. When the requests made to the ocean diety were in vain, in anger Thou sent the fire missile to annihilate the waters of the ocean. Frightened by the power of the missile, as ordered by the ocean diety, Thou got a way through the ocean.




The monkeys from all the quarters brought mountains and rocks by which Thou got a bridge built across Lanka.Crossing over Thy army of monkeys attacked the Raakshasas with teeth claws mountains rocks and palm trees as weapons. With Thy brother displaying terrific power in the battle field, Raavana's son Indrajit soon tied down Thy troops with Naagaastra. Garuda, Thy vehicle soon released them from that state by fanning them with his wings.

The missile 'Shakti' sent by Raavana, struck Lakshmana who was slipping off life. He was revived by smelling the herb which grew on the mountain which was then brought by Hanumaan. After that Lakshmana killed the master of the magical arts Indrajit. Thou were disturbed by the magical powers of Raavana and were relieved from its stunning effects by Vibheeshana's words. Kumbhkarna who came to join the battle, made the earth tremble and was devouring the army of monkeys, was then killed by Thee.




Accepting the chariot and the armour sent by Indra, Thou faught with Raavana and cut off his row of heads by the Brahmaastra, and accepted Seetaa after she was purified by fire. The Devas of high order healed and revived the host of monkeys who were wounded and killed in the battle. Then along with the king of Lanka, Vibheeshana, and Thy consort Seetaa, Thou returned to Thy own city of Ayodhyaa in the chariot Pushpaka.

Thou were pleased to be coronated with the holy waters and ruled happily for more than ten thousand years. Reacting to a scandalous gossip about Seetaa, Thou abondoned her in spite of her being pregnant. O what a pity. The Asura Lavanaasura was killed by Shatrughna and Thou killed the shudra ascetic. Thereafter, Seetaa who was living in Vaalmiki's aashrama gave birth to Thy two sons.




In the premises of the Yanjya by Vaalmeeki's order Thy sons sang the beautiful composition which was composed by him. Hearing it Raama was desirous of taking back Seetaa, but she disappeared into her mother Earth. At the request of the Kaala Yama to return to Thy abode Vaikunth, Thou first created reason to abondon Lakshmana and then Thou submerged in the river Saryu along with all Thy attendents. Then going to Swarga Thou reached Thy abode the eternal Vaikuntha.

As a lesson to the mankind this human embodiment of Thee happened. Pangs of seperation are caused by extreme attachment, as also extreme addiction to Dharma may lead to the abondoning of the innocent. Otherwise for Thee who are established in self conciousness how can such a weakness of mind be explained. O Wielder of the Discuss! Thou That very embodiment of the Satva guna! O The Lord of Guruvayur! eradicate my sufferings from the disease.




Long ago Thou were born as Dattatreya to the sage Atri and Anasooyaa. Mentally tired by the pesterings of Thy various disciples, Thou wandered about with Thy wife immersed in blissful peace. Thus Thou were seen by the great devotee Kaartaviryaarjuna, the king of Hehaya. Pleased, Thou bestowed on him all psychic powers consisting of the eight Sidhis and also promised him death at Thy hands in the end.

To fulfill the boon given to Kaartaviryaarjuna, Thou were born to Jamadagni and Renuka in the line of the Bhrigus, by the name Raama. Thou were the youngest among Jamadagni's sons and gave Thy parents great joy. Thy purpose to be born as Raama was also to kill the whole clan of kings who were very impious and were a burden on the earth, and were partly held in check only by Kaartaviryarjuna's valour.




By the age of fourteen years Thou acquiered the knowledge of the Vedas. Thy father was greatly enraged with Thy mother who was a little bit attached to the Gandharva king Chitraratha. By the command of Thy father Thou cut of Thy mother's head and also of Thy brothers' as they had failed to carry out the same order of Thy father. After Thy father had calmed down, as a boon from him, Thou got to restore them to life. Thy mother also being pleased gave Thee boons.

To please Thy mother Renuka, Thy father Jamadagni, brought by prayer the heavenly cow Kaamdhenu to his aashrama. On the advice of Bhrigu, Thou set out from Thy aashrama to the Himaalayaa and worshipped Shiva. Thou were bestowed with his battle-axe and other various divine missiles, and killed the asura pointed out by him.Then making friends with sage Akritvrana, Thou returned to Thy aashrama.




The king Kiraatarjuna came hunting to the forest and was treated well by Thy father with the riches and luxaries obtained from the celestial cow Kaamadhenu. When the king returned to his town, he was ill advised by his ministers to buy the cow. The king sent an emmissary for the purpose and as Thy father, the sage tried to resist his taking away of the cow, he was killed. Several warriors emerged from the furious divine cow and destroyed the whole army. But the calf was stolen.

Thy father was brought back to life by Shukraachaarya. When Thy father related the whole incident Thou were very angry. With Thy friend Akritavrana Thou meditated upon Mahodara who then equipped Thee with bow, arrows and the battle axe. Boarding the chariot with the horses and the charioteer, Thou entered Maahishmati. Even when the king was requested, he did not give the calf back, Thou started the battle.




Kaartveerya with his ten thousand sons and seventeen Akshauhini armies and numerous friends and great commanders fiercely fought the battle. Soon by Thy battle axe and arrows the entire army was destroyed and all his sons were killed except those who had fled in fright. The king of Hehaya then attacked Thee.

Kaartaveerya had once with his thousand arms cleverly impounded the waters of the river Narmadaa, and almost drowning Raavana had destroyed his pride who was meditating on the banks downstream. That Kaartaveerya, weilded various weapons with those thousand arms and finding the Vaishnava discus also powerless agaist Thee, knew Thee to be Hari, and with joy meditated upon Thee. Then, he whose sins were purified, was killed by Thee and he went to Thy Supreme abode.




Thereafter the sons of the king of Hehaya were in great rage and killed Thy father. Grieved at this Thy mother Renuka was wailing and beating her breast many times, seeing this Thou took a terrible vow. Thou then got the chariot and weapon by meditation and faught against the Kshatriyaas who were enemies of the Brahmins. With the battle axe Thou killed the Kshatriyaas in all the quarters and rendered the earth devoid of them.

Thy father was revived and Thou defeated the clan of kings twenty one times. Thou then performed tarpana to the ancestors in the vast lake of blood named Samant Panchaka. In the sacrifice Thou also gave away land to Kaashyapa and other Rishis. Thou fighting again with Saalva, refrained, on being restrained by Sanata Kumaars who told Thee that he was destined to be killed by Krishna.




Abondoning all weapons, Thou resorted to the Mahendra mountain for meditation, practicing penance. Finding the land upto Gokarna submerged in the sea, on the request of the sages, who meditated upon Thee, Thou frightened the ocean with the bow bearing fire missile. By throwing a sacrificial ladle Thou pushed back the sea and scooped out the land of Kerala. O Bhrigupati Parashuraama! The Lord of Guruvaayur! Deign to protect me.





O Lord Hari! Condensed bliss incarnate! Long ago, in the battle between the Devas and Asuras, some of the Asuras, even though slain by Thee,did not get liberation because of their residual Karmas. So they were born again on the earth. Mother earth being very much tormented by their burden sought refuge in Brahmaa and reached his abode, where the Devas had already gone.

Crushed by the immense weight of the evil minded people and about to fall in the ocean of the causal waters, this me please protect. Ask the Devas here of my plight,' the Earth lamented. O Lord! Seeing the Earth in such a helpless state and also looking at the faces of the Devas, who had assembled there, Brahmaa meditated on Thee.




Presently, the lotus born Brahmaa said to the Devas that what the Mother Earth was saying was indeed true. In the matter of the protection of the Devas and the Earth, Maha Vishnu alone was capable. So all of them and Brahmaa, led by Shiva would quickly go from there to the Milk Ocean and prostrate before Him and sing hymns of his prise. So together they went to Thy abode.

They together went to the shore of the Milk Ocean where a pleasant breeze was blowing. As they stood there with their minds fixed on Thy feet, meditating, the lotus born Brahmaa in his own heart heard Thy words. Making everyone happy, he told them that he had been spoken to by the Supreme Lord Himself, and asked them to listen to those words.




"I know the sad state of the gods and of the Earth caused by the cruel kings. For its removal I shall be born in the Yaadava clan with all My powers (as a complete incarnation). The gods may be born in the Vrishni clan as part incarnation, and the wives of the Devas also will be born on the Earth to serve me." Thus Thy words Brahmaa told to the Devas and the Earth.

Hearing Thy compassionate message which was like nectar to their ears they all went away with their minds freed from sorrow, highly delighted and satiated with Thy sweet words. In the famous city of Mathura which is said to be made more sacred by Thy ever presence there, Devaki, the virtuous daughter of Devaka married the king Vasudeva, the son of Shoorasena.




When the marriage ceremony was over Devaki's brother Kansa, in order to honour the couple became their charioteer and took to the road in the chariot. Rising from the sky Thy voice said, "You who are very wicked will be killed by her eighth son." Alas! Thus spoken, out of great fear, he then drew his sword to kill the beautiful lady who was near by.

The evil minded Kansa who had caught hold of Devaki by her hair did not release her inspite of the repeated conciliatory words of Shauri (Vasudeva). Then at the offer of Vasudeva to surrender his children, he was satisfied and went home. The first born Thy brother, though handed over to Kansa as promised, he did not kill the child out of love. For, O Lord! even wicked people are found to be very compassionate in the heart, once in a while.




At that time, prompted by Thy will alone Naarada Muni told to the king of Bhoja, Kansa, that did he not know that his clan was of Asuras, whereas, the Yaadavas were Devas. Hari, the master of the Maayaa, will be born to kill him, as result of the prayers of the Devas. Hearing this, Kansa drove out the Yadavaas and killed the sons of Vasudeva.

At the seventh pregnancy when the king of serpants, Aadishesha entered the womb of Devaki, by Thy prompting, the foetus was transferred to the womb of Rohini by Yoga Maaya. O Maadhava, Thou also who are Existence Conciousness and Bliss alone, entered in Devaki's womb, being well prised by the Devas. O Lord! That Thou O Krishna! removing the host of ailments, bestow to me supreme devotion.




Thou O Lord! Who are Bliss personified, when the time of Thy incarnation approached, the rainy season indeed shone with the lustre of Thy body, which emanated the blue rays of brilliance on the thick dark clouds that covered the skies.

When all the directions had been well cooled by the rain waters, when the virtuous people were overwhelmed with the joy of the impending fulfillment of their desires, and the moon was rising at midnight, Thou the remover of all sorrows, appeared here on this earth, embodied as Krishna.




Thou shone in the birth chamber, though in the from of a child, with Thy body adorned with the divine majesties, shining crown, bracelets, shoulder ornaments, beautiful necklace, conch, discus, lotus, mace, beautiful as the hue of the rain bearing clouds.

O Vaasudeva! Thou did shine in that prison house with the glorious Lakshmi Devi comfortably resting on Thy bosom. The side glances of varied graces, with shyful eyes, cast by her, dispersed away the inauspiciousness of the prison caused by the wicked Kansa.




Thy form which is unapproachable to the minds of many aspiring sages, when Vasudeva saw with his own eyes, he had horripilation all over his body, his eyes were full of tears of joy and with a choked and melting voice he sang Thy prises, whose sight is like nectar honey for the bee like eyes.

Thou were praised with prayers for a long time by Vasudeva who was filled with joy, saying that 'O Lord! cut down the creeper of all my sorrows with Thy sharp sword like playful eyes. O Supreme Being! Remove all my sufferings with Thy side glances laden with compassion.'




And by Thy mother Devaki's tears whose delicate creeper like body was covered and made wet , Thy excellences were praised by hymns. Thou, the abode of mercy, then explained to them,Thy parents, about their two previous births. Then at the request of Thy mother Devaki, Thou assumed the form of a human infant child.

At Thy prompting, in order to bring about Thy inter-exchanging with the daughter of Nanda, the son of Shoorasena Vasudeva took Thee in his two hands. Thou who can only be concieved in the minds of the sages, in Vasudeva's hands looked like an attractive young swan perched on a lotus.




Thereafter, at Thy behest, Yoga-Maayaa, who was born in the house of Nandagopa, caused all the people in the region to fall into deep slumber. This is not at all surprising, considering that the well locked inanimate doors of the prison opened by themselves.


He, Vasudeva, the most blessed one set out carrying Thee in his hands. Aadi Shesha with his many hoods warded off the rain waters and led along the way by him with the gems on his hood s enlightening the way. O Lord! Of such exceeding prowess deign to save me from my forceful ailments.




When the leader of the Yadu clan Vasudeva set out carrying Thee, he saw the waters of the Yamuna river flooded to the skies. Lo! As he crossed, the waters were reduced to the ankles of his feet as if the huge expanse of water was an illusory flood caused by magic.

Vasudeva entered the cowherd chieftan's house, whose doors were open and the cowherd women were all fast asleep, and a baby girl was crying. He gently placed Thee on the labour cot and took the seeming female infant (Yoga Maayaa) in his hands and quickly proceeded to his house, in Mathura.




Then awakened by the sound of crying of Thy younger sister, the host of attendents ran fast to inform Kansa of the child's birth. Sticken with fear, Kansa, with dishevelled hair, hastily reached the spot and was surprised and confused to see a baby girl in his sister's arms.

Kansa dcided that certainly this was a trick of the decietful Vishnu that this girl was born. He pulled the infant away from his sister who had held her close in her arms, just as an elephant would pluck out a tender lotus stalk from a pond of lotus, and dashed her, Thy younger sister, the birthless one, on a block of stone.




Then, just as Thy devotee would quickly free himself from the clutches of death, she, Yoga Maayaa freed herself from the clutches of Kamsa immediately. Not hitting the earth, she rose above the earth in the sky and assumed another form with eight arms shining with divine weapons.

"O cruel most Kansa! What is your gain by smashing me? Your destroyer has been born elsewhere. Think of your welfare." Thus saying to the wicked one, Thy sister disappeared. The Devas praised her also as she entered the temples on the earth and was worshipped.




Thereafter, the next morning, the king told the main haughty demons, Pralamba, Baka and Pootana, what the daughter of the mountain, Paarvati-Yoga Maayaa had said. They then roamed all over the land fearlessly killing the children. Merciless people are capable of doing merciless deeds.




Then, Bestower of Liberation! O Lord! Lying on the labour bed of Yashoda, the cowherd chieftan's wife, Thou raised infant cries as Thou slightly kicked Thy legs. All the women folk were aroused from sleep, and they announced the birth of a boy. O! How can I describe the joy with which the whole of Gokula was brimming.




What a wonder indeed that the most meritorious and holy persons were surpassed by Yashoda by her good fortune as she imbibed with her eyes Thy beautiful form fresh as a Kalaya flower lying by her side. Then she joyfully applied Thee to her breasts feeding Thee, as she also caressed Thy charming body again and again.

Nandagopa, overwhlmed with joy,and out of the desire for Thy welbeing gave away limitless gifts to holy men of the Braahmin clan. In the same manner innumerable auspicious rites and observances were performed by the gopas for Thy sake. Thou the harbinger of auspiciousness of the three worlds, deign to save me from my ailments.




Thereafter, Nanda (who is the abode of undiminished virtues), went to the king's city to pay his tributes (taxes). On meeting him, Thy father Vasudeva who knew of the activities of Kansa and his supporters, told him that.

"O Friend! The birth of a son to you gives me pleasure as if a son were born to myself." Thus he cleverly attributed Thy fatherhood on Nanda, and praised him with affection.




Just then there in Gokula, some beautiful looking woman with honey bees hovering around the sweet smelling flowers in her hair locks, entered. O Thou! In the guise of a child, she approached Thee.

Quickly she, Pootanaa, born in the clan of demons, who had taken the lives of many children, lifted Thee up, even as the Vraja women were for a second wondering as to who she was.




Thou who were angered by her killing of the children, unhesitatingly climbed in her lap and sucked well her poison smeared breasts as if it were a huge mango fruit.

Thou sucked the breast along with her life force. This Pootanaa fell down with a thunder like noise reverting to her natural ferocious body with both hands streching out.

The whole of Gokul stood stunned hearing the terrifying sound and seeing the frightful form. The Gopis picked Thee up even as Thou were playing on the chest of the dead demoness.

O Thou! Who confers auspiciousness on to the world, the young women protected Thee in various ways with chanting Thy names alone. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Making me devoid of my ailments, make me Thy devotee.




The chieftain of Vraja, Nanda Gopa, having heard the words of Vasudeva, was returning home in a hurry. On the way he saw an undescribable form falling down and crushing all the trees around. In utter fear he took refuge in Thee and prayed to Thee.

The Gopas came to know of the whole incident of Pootanaa from the Gopikas and they were dumbfounded with fear and wonder. They then proceeded to cut the body of the terrible monster who was killed by Thee, into pieces with axes and burnt it at a distance.

The breasts of Pootanaa were made pure by Thy having sucked them. Therefore, when her body was burnt, huge volumes of smoke rose in the sky, so fragrant that it produced doubt in the minds of the people as to what it was - agaru, sandalwood, or gulgulu (frankincense) incense.




Thou declared to the higher ones of the cowherd clan that the fruits of the contact with Thy body were not far behind, and that they too would get them soon. The conferring of fragrance / blessings on Pootanaa was, as though, to prove that.

The cowherd people were wonder struck that the boy was not killed by the demoness. They also marvelled at the events foretold by Shauri Vasudeva. Realising this, they were fully immersed in the joy of looking at Thy face.

O Vaasudeva! Day by day this Gokul developed with prosperity and undiminished auspiciousness as a result of Thy living there. Happiness and undecaying virtue shone everywhere.




In their houses the beautiful Gopikas kept talking to each other about Thy charming form and smile. Having completed their daily chores they assembled in great joy to watch Thee.

O the boy is looking at me,' 'his smile is directed towards me', 'come, come to me', thus remarking they streched out their hands to hold Thee. O Lord! What all was not done by the Gopikas endearingly.

They passed Thee from hand to hand, each one of them eager to touch Thy body. As they did so, Thou looked like a honey beetle moving from one very red lotus to another strung together in a garland.

O ! What states of joy did Yashodaa, Nanda's wife, not attain as she took Thee in her lap and suckled Thee, with her eyes fixed on Thy smiling face. O Lord Hari! Who are thus! May Thou save me from all ailments.




O Lord! Once on Thy birth star day, Yashoda, the queen of Vraja, who had invited the relatives and their wives and the Braahmins, for the occasion, placed Thee near a big cart and got busy in the kitchen organising the feast.

Then from near Thee, was heard the fearful cries and confused voices of various boys who were appointed to protect Thee, which was mingled with the sound of the crackling and breaking sound of wood.

Then hearing the terrific sound, frightened, the Gopikas came running with their heavy breasts heaving because of the effort and anxiety. They saw Thee lying amongst the frightful big pieces of broken wood strewn all around.




Alas! What! What has happened to the child!' thus crying, Nanda, the Gopas and the essembled Braahmins rushed to the spot. Finding Thee in Yashoda's arms, they felt relieved and shed tears of joy seeing that the child was safe.

What ! What happened and how! This is a wonder! This huge cart is shattered! There seems to be no explanation for this', thus exclaiming, they looked at Thee, awstricken, with their fingers placed on their noses.

O Lord! The children who were gaurding Thee, declared 'This child who was desirous of being breast fed, moved his lotus like legs, and hit the cart which overturned. I saw, even I saw.'





Then to the people who knew nothing of Thy prowess, the words of the frightened children were entirely baseless. But to those who knew of even a bit of Thy prowess and had witnessed the incident of Pootanaa, could not reject their statement altogether.

Pink like tender leaves, these legs, have they been hurt? These hands, charming like the lotuses, have they been injured?' Thus with overflowing sympathy and moved with such concern, the women folk stroked Thy body gently.

O Yashoda! Give me my son. By the Lord's showers of mercy today my son was saved!' Thus saying and collecting Thee in his arms, Thy father embraced Thee again and again, whose body was full of horripillations.




The Asura who had come to kill Thee, disguised as a cart, was destroyed by Thee. But even a trace of his body or evil nature (Rajas) was not seen. How can that be? Certainly, he became pure (by coming in contact with Thee) and merged in Thy pure Sattvic Self.

The Braahmins who were invited and were well honoured specially conferred their auspicious blessings on Thee. With Thy captivating childish sweet ways, Thou delighted the whole of Vraja. O Lord of Guruvaayur! May Thou sheer away my sufferings.





Once, O Lord of Guruvaayur! Thou who had very much increased in weight, Thy mother not being able to carry Thee, placed Thee on the bed. What indeed was the cause of this, thus overcome with misgivings, she kept busy carrying out her duties in the house. As she did so, she was constantly thinking of Thee and praying for Thy welfare.

Then the well known Asura Trinaavarta, came disguised as a whirl wind. All the quarters were filled with thick dust and a terrific sound arose and spread all around by the impact of his arrival. He carried Thee away, who carries away the minds of people.




The immense dust caused intense darkness due to which the vision was obstructed. All the cowherds and everyone were unable to see anything. Thy mother was full of worry as to what had happened to Thee. She ran in distress towards Thee and not finding Thee at the spot, she began to wail and cry loudly.

Then that great demon weakened in power, shrank in size and his speed was diminished because of carrying Thy weight. So the dust storm and the fierce whirling sound had also subsided, and so in the cowherd village Gokula, Thy mother's cries were clearly heard everywhere.




On hearing the wailings of Yashoda, Nanda and the other gopas rushed inside the house crying. Meanwhile, the Asura who had become weak by carrying Thy weight, wanted to release Thee, who releases everyone's bondages. But when Thou did no let go of Thy hold of him, he fell down from the skies.

The gopas were exhausted by their crying and wailing. Then outside the house, they saw a huge and heavy body falling on the rock. What a wonder! On the chest of the dead body, they found Thee with a soft smile lying unscathed.




The wicked demon had died by falling on the rock and his huge body was smashed. Wearing a smile Thou played on that dead body beating about with Thy lotus like hands. The gopas picked Thee up from there as one would pick a blue gem from a big mountain.

One by one, Nanda and the other Gopaas with great joy took hold of Thee quickly and embraced and kissed Thy limbs.The Gopikaas were also desirous of taking Thee, but did not do so out of shyness. We praise Thee, who then, as a honey beetle jumped into their lotus like hands.




Thy mother and father and the others wondered as to what could they do for Thy protection. Again and again, at that time, they said that only Govinda could protect their son. O Lord! The redeemer of Devotees! So they prayed to Thee alone for Thy wefare.

Thus Thou killed the Asura who was in the form of the wind. Why do not Thou kill and remove my ailments which also arise from the wind. What else can I do? O Lord of Guruvaayur! I again and again beseech Thee for the eradication of all my internal and external ailments.




श्रीकृष्ण के जातकर्म आद संस्कार का वर्णन 
O All pervading Lord! Thou are above and beyond all ceremonies and rites. Yet, Garga Muni an expert at astronomy and astrology, went to Thy house at the secret request of Vasudeva, to perform sacraments for Thee.

Nanda was very delighted and he honoured the greatest of all the sages Garga Muni, who was eager to perform the sacraments for Thee. He then, with a gentle smile requested the sage to perform the rites.

Sage Garga said,'O Respected Nanda, since I am the priest of the Yadu clan, this ceremony must be performed in great secrecy'. Saying so, with horripillations over his body he performed the naming ceremony of Thee and Thy elder brother.




How should I do the naming of this child? He indeed has thousands of names or rather endless names. O Lord! May be that sage Garga thinking like this, performed Thy naming in great secrecy.

The putting together of the root of the verb Krish and the suffix N, denoting the combining of Existence and absolute Bliss, which is Thy real nature, declaring, the sage gave Thee the name Krishna. Also signifying the drawing away of the sins of the people of the world, the name Krishna was given to Thee.

The sage also gave Thee other different names like Vaasudeva. Then he gave the name Raama etc to Thy elder brother. Having done so, Garg Muni indicated to Thy having superhuman powers and disposition, to Thy father. Yet he did not fully reveal Thy real identity as Lord Himself.




Who so ever loves your son will not be deluded by Maayaa and so will not be overcome by sorrows thereafter. And who so ever assails him will certainly perish.' Thus the great sage described Thy glory and greatness.

He will conquer many Asuras and will take his own people to the realms of purity. You will have occassions to hear of his untainted pure fame.' Thus the sage spoke of Thy greatness.

By his help alone you will be able to overcome all obstacles. Remain with your full faith placed in him.' Thus without saying that Thou were Hari, the sage thus described Thee.

Then Garga Muni went away. Nanda and the others were very delighted and looked after Thee endearingly. O Lord of Guruvaayur! who are full of compassion, remove my ailments.




O Lord Muraari! Thou and Thy brother Balaraam soon moved about on Thy hands and knees. When Thou moved about, Thou looked so beautiful that it was like your movements adorned the various parts of the house. With Thy movements, Thy ankle trinkets tinkled pleasingly, and so to increase the pleasing sound Thou charmingly moved about with more briskness.

Thy very gentle smile revealed the newly cut teeth. Thy lustruous locks of hair streamed around Thy face. It was a lovely sight to look at Thy lotus feet, and Thy arms, with armlets having slipped down to the wrists which were marked with braclets. Thou and Thy brother intensely captivated the minds of all the onlookers and also of all the people of the world.





O Vaasudeva! All the people followed Thee with their eager affectionate eyes set on Thee. As the two of Thou ran, Thou made some screaming sounds, then laughed and ran as Thou turned Thy lotus like faces casting a look at the people behind. What incredible joyful excitement Thou caused when Thou did so!

As Thou two moved fast, Thou fell and got up and were smeared and tainted by mud. The taintless sages in heaven, saw these pranks and smiled at Thee and saluted Thee worshipfully. Then Thou two would be with great care quickly picked up by the two mothers and would be embraced and kissed again and again.





The tender hearted Yashodaa with overflowing and full breasts, held Thee in her lap and fed Thee. How exremely fortunate and blessed she was as she did so. O Thou! The seeming cowherd boy! In between the feeding Thou smiled bewitchingly, revealing the charming jasmine buds like teeth, and seeing Thy face she was filled with delight.

Next, as Thou started to walk about, Thou played with the other boys in the neighbouring houses and compounds with the natural childlike restlessness. The Gopaas witnessed with joyful laughter asThou also chased the pet parrots, cats and calves of the household and they somehow restrained Thee from doing so.





Where so ever that Thou went with Thy elder brother Haldhar, the Gopis helplessly and spell bound kept watching Thee. They even neglected their household chores and forgot all about their children and servants. O Slayer of Mura! They were always so very much excited as this happened again and again.

Thou would sweetly sing and sometimes charmingly dance about with the desire of getting fresh butter. The young women full of affection gave Thee butter which Thou ate and also gave freshly boiled milk which Thou drank with delight.




In the house of Mahaabali I had to go begging. Let that be. Here now in front of these ladies I am not going to do so again.' O Lord! Thus deciding Thou gave up begging for curd and ghee etc and resorted to pleasently stealing in clever delightful ways.

In the cowherds' colony the Gopikas did not have place in their hearts for either anger or sorrow by Thy stealing of butter and ghee etc. They did not even feel any dearth for its being stolen. It was because Thou also stole their hearts and immersed them in the ocean of Bliss. Such Thou O Lord of Guruvaayur! May Thou eradicate my ailments.




On the front end of the branch of a tree, watching the moon, Thou asked Thy mother and father again and again for it, saying that it was a fruit. At that time, then, going by Thy father's words, when Thou flung Thy two arms,amazingly, the diety moon came into Thy hands! What can we say of Thy splenderous lordliness? Thy whole body was covered by luminous light and Thou attained Thy cosmic form!

'What is all this! indeed!' thus Thy father was a vessel of amazement. Thou immersed him in the cosmic ocean for a moment, then again extended Thy Maayaa, and Thou brought about Thy enchanting form of a son. That, Bliss incarnate,Supreme Consciousness, Cosmic form, O Krishna! save me from disease!




O Lord! Once long ago, as Thou were lying flat on the back, in the lap of Yashodaa and sucking at her breast, Thou yawned. As Thou did so, in Thy open mouth, Thou revealed to her the whole universe.

O Lord of the Universe! Again once, as Thou were playing with other children, Thou cheated them in collecting fruits. Angered at this, they reported to Thy mother that Thou had eaten mud.

O Lord! At the time of the deluge Thou do consume everything earth water etc. Yet Thy mother was frightened that Thou may fall sick by eating mud and so she became angry.




O you naughty one! Is it that you have eaten mud O son!' O Lord! These words of Thy mother, for a long time, Thou kept on denying and laughingly asserted that Thou had not done so.

O Boy! If you deny what all the others are saying, please open your mouth.' Thus reprimanded by Thy mother, Thou opend Thy mouth as a lotus in full bloom.

Thy mother was eager to see just a trace of mud in Thy mouth. As though to please her, and to give her abundant satisfaction Thou showed her in Thy mouth not only this whole earth but the entire universe.




At that time, in Thy mouth what not was seen by Yashodaa? Somewhere the forests and oceans, somewhere the skies and Rasaatala, human beings and demons, gods and devas!

Yashodaa saw in Thy mouth the recliner in the milk ocean. Again she saw Paramaatamaa, the resident of the Vaikunth abode. Then she saw Thee as her son in front of her. In how many different ways did she not see Thee.

In the cavity of Thy mouth she saw all the worlds, where even Thou were present with Thy mouth open, once again, in which again all the worlds were seen; and so on endlessly. This definitely expounded Thou as the infinitude of the universe.

At that time for a moment, Yashodaa had a flash of illumination. Thou with affection deluded her and clung to her, calling her 'Mother' and demanded to be suckled. O Lord! Thou the Wonderous Child! Deign to protect me.




Once when Thy mother was churning the curd, Thou approached her in the eagerness to be breast fed. Obstructing her churning Thou climbed up her lap and sucked at her breasts.

O Lord! Thou had half-way sucked her lotus bud like breasts, with a charming smile playing on the sweet lotus like face. Just then, Thy mother went away in a haste to quickly hold the milk which had overflown on the fire.

O Lord! Having drunk half way, and as a result the joy being interrupted, Thy mind was overcome with great rage. Oh! Then taking up the churning rod, the curd pot was broken by Thee.




Thy mother came running when she heard the loud sound rising of the pot being broken. Right then she saw the curd spreading on the floor,even like Thy pure unblemished fame spreading in the universe.

Thou who are saught after through the path of the Vedas, were not seen anywhere by Thy angered mother. She, the fortunate one searched everywhere and saw Thee sitting on the mortar feeding butter to the cat.

Oh! Yashodaa with her face quivering due to anger, hastily caught hold of Thee whose lotus like face was looking very sweet with pretended fear. As her friends watched, she took a rope to tie Thee up.




All good men want to bind themselves to Thee alone in devotion. That Thou O Lord! Yashodaa desiring to tie, found the length of the rope short by two fingers, even though she attached many pieces of ropes to lengthen it.

As Thy mother's friends were smilingly watching with wonder, Thou saw her body perspiring and exhausted due to the effort. O Hari! Thou who are the ever-free Being, out of compassion accepted the bondage.

As Yashodaa went back into the house, she said 'O Rogue! stay tied like this to the mortar for long.' Thou stayed there eating the butter which Thou had earlier placed in the cavity of the mortar.

O All Pervading Being! If Thou are easily attainable to the desireless (a-paash) people, who are not bound by desire, how was it that Yashodaa was able to secure Thee with a (paash) rope for binding. Thou whose glories were thus sung by the gods in the heaven, O Lord of Guruvaayur! May Thou save me from my ailments.




Thou were joyfully named Daamodara by the group of sages who were watching Thee with great happiness, and they praised and glorified Thee. Thou who with a tender belly were attached to the mortar, saw two Kakubha (Arjuna) trees not far away.

The two sons of Kuber, (the god of wealth) one known as Nalakubara and the other one known as Manigreeva became very well known. By worshipping Shiva they also attained great prosperity and because of the pride of wealth they became very haughty and indifferent to Thee. For a very long time they led a very wayward life.

Naarada who is devoted to Thee alone, once saw these two sporting in the Ganges which is the river of the gods. They were in an intoxicated state having drunk wine and were surrounded by young intoxicated damsels, stark naked, singing and sporting in the Ganges waters.




At the sight of sage Naarada, the dear women hastily put on their clothes. Even then, with the mind blinded by intoxication, these two, continued to sport in nakedness. The Muni then pronounced thus (in the next shloka) in order for them to achieve devotion to Thee and mental peace. For without calmness of mind where is happiness?

You two will become Kakubha trees for long. Then when you see Hari, you two will get to your own state.' Being thus told by the sage, desiring to get Thy vision, they went to the outskirts of Vraja and became Kakubha trees.

Those two such Arjuna trees Thou approached in a slow pace without a pause, as Thou pulled along the crosswise mortar, which obstructed the aged and long decayed trees and felled them.




When the two trees were felled by Thee, just then from their root cores emerged a pair of radient Yakshas. O Govinda! They imeediately worshipped Thee with hymns.

Here in this world, in due course, the devotees of other gods also certainly come to Thee only. These two devotees of Rudra, by the grace of Naarada, reached Thy feet. They prayed to Thee and beseeched for the highest devotion and went away.

Then by the falling of the trees, which caused the frightening sound, the group of Gopas were frightened and rushed to the spot trembling. As Nanda glanced at Thy mother meaningfully, she felt very ashamed. He then released Thee from the mortar, who releases everyone from the bonds of Samsaara (the cycle of repeated life and death and the illusion of Maayaa).

Having entered the interspace of the two trees and the trees having fallen, it is only God's grace that the child is safe and unhurt today.' As they said so they carried Thee to the house. O Thou Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me from my ailments.





The Gopas who were not aware of Thy glory and greatness, interpreted the falling of the trees and such other occurances as unaccountable ill-omens. So they made up their minds and decided to migrate to some other place.

Indeed by Thy prompting alone, a leading Gopa named Upananda brought to their notice the beautiful forest country side called Vrindaavana, situated to the west of Gokula, as a proper location for their settlement.

Nanda and the others soon abondoned the Vrihadvana settlement and made it as a cowshed. They proceeded following the imposing vehicle which was carrying Thee and in which Thy mother was sitting.




The Gopikaas did not feel the distance of the path covered, as they were fully engrossed in Thy playful prattle. The pleasant sound of the cart was interspersed by the trampling sound of the hooves of the rows of the cows.

O Lord! Thou were delighted to see Vrindaavana. The Kunda flowers were in full bloom and there were clusters of trees all around. Its expansive grass lands had the intense beauty as though green emerald was inlaid.

The Gopas built their new houses forming a semi-circle, and settled down there and were sitting peacefully and comfortably. Along with the young boys of the Gopas, Thou went about the whole place looking around admiringly, and enjoying the beauty of the forest.




Thou saw the daughter of Kalinda, Kaalindi or Yamunaa river which was flowing with clear waters through winding ways. The echoes of the cooing of the swans enhanced the sweet sound of the river. The thick growth of the full blown lotuses was like her ever smiling face.

Thou also saw the majestic Govardhana mountain. It was attractive by the resonant sound of the calls of the peacocks. It was radiant by the multi coloured rays of the gems it contained. Its high peaks were as though touching the abode of Brahmaa.

Then with the Gopa boys where ever Thou went, even to the end of the forest, Thou came across the winding course of the Yamunaa river, as though she was a love-lorn damsel, waiting to meet Thee in solitude.

Thou then with Balaraam and the other young boys with great excitement tended the calves in this forest which was well suited for the cattle. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Protect me from illness.





In the beautiful Vrindaavana swarms of honey bees would fleet around. There, O Auspicious Lord! Consort of Laxmi! Accompanied by Haladhara and other cowherd boys, Thou moved about with Thy radiant form pleasing to the eyes. Keen on tending the cows, Thou carried a horn, flute and a cane.

O Consort of Laxmi! Thou set Thy two feet, which are caressed by Laxmi's lotus hands and which are infused with the protection of the world, in Vrindaavana. When Thou did so, the trees, creepers, waters, lands, hills and fields and what all was not full of prosperity!





In the lavish grass meadows at the end of the forests, the cool breeze was blowing on the vast banks of the Yamunaa river, on the peaks of the Govardhana mountain, Thou were playing the flute softly as Thou lead the calves to graze. One day, Thou saw an Asura in the form of a calf.

As the Asura walked about, wagging its tail briskly and forcefully, it turned its head in a strange way looking for a loop hole (an opportunity) to strike. Thou caught him by his two legs and swirling him very fast again and again, threw him on a big tree just as he lost his life.





By the impact of the fall of the Asura who was evil minded by birth, the tops of the trees were broken and the forests were destroyed. O God! The gods then assembling in the skies showered heaps of flowers on Thy head, in joy.

The cowherd children asked Thee as to from where the extremely fragrant heap of flowers were falling on the top of Thy head. Thou jokingly told them that when the Asura was thrown , the flowers blooming on the clusters of the trees rose up and indeed those flowers were coming down slowly now.





Again on another day, when it was extremely hot, Thou and the others went to drink the water of river Yamunaa who is the daughter of the Sun. Thou saw a crane flapping its wings very quickly, which looked like the mountain Kailaash whose wings Indra forgot to cut when he was cutting off the wings of the mountains.

When the cowherd boys were drinking water, he charged towardsThee and swallowed Thee and again hastily spit Thee out like a ball of fire. He then came to tear Thee by the point of its beak. O Lord! Thou who are adapt at destroying the evil people, catching hold of his beak, tore him apart.




In no time the crane demon reached the abode of death as if to see his dead sister Pootanaa or as if to welcome his younger brother Aghaasura who was to follow him. As the host of gods were showering heaps of flowers, Thou went home from the woods of Vrindaavana.

The Gopikaas heard the sweet sound of Thy flute and rushed with great joy to have a glimpse of Thee. Thy parents Yashoda and Nanda were also very delighted to see Thee. O Thou Shauri! (Vaasudeva) Who are well known to be residing in the famous temple of Guruvaayur, be pleased to expell my ailments.




Once Thou decided to have a picnic in the woods. Along with the children of Gokul and surrounded by a large herd of calves, Thou set out early in the morning. O Lord Thou also took along eatables, cooked rice and other delicacies.

When Thou set out for the woods, from Thy lotus like two feet the dust arose which sanctifies the three worlds. The great sages received that dust on their bodies with great joy and horripilation as they feasted their eyes on Thy sight.

Thou and the lads were grazing the cattle on the thick grass lands. Suddenly the most terrifying demon Aghaasura, in the form of a formidable python, with an evil intention blocked the way.





Thou had gone a little ahead. The lads mistook the huge body of the Asura for a mountain and its large spread out mouth for a cave. In their eagerness to explore the woods, they entered the python's open mouth.

The Gopa boys along with the calves had entered the belly of the snake by mistake and started to feel the heat therein. O Lord! Apprehending the situation, Thou also entered immediately to save the helpless friends.





In the cavity of the throat of the python, Thou increased Thy size of Thy body, thus obstructing its breath. It began to wreeth in agony, then Thou tore open its neck portion and releasing the Gopa boys and the calves, Thou also came out.

A great brilliance emerged from the Asura and rose, in the sky and awaited Thy emerging from the body of the python. Oh! What a wonder, as soon as Thou came out the brilliance merged into Thee, while the gods danced and sang.




Brahmaa and other gods were wonderstruck and watched Thee and followed Thee in the skies. After that Thou went with the Gopa boys when the day had reached noontime and with Thy own people Thou celebrated the food festival, the picnic lunch.

The horn and the flute were tucked in Thy waist band. Thou were holding a ball of rice in Thy lotus like hand and provoked peals of laughter among the boys by Thy humorous talks. As Thou took Thy meal the gods joyfully sang Thy praises.




O Lord of the Universe! The great gods praised Thee saying that the meal taken happily with the Gopa boys gave Thee more pleasure than the sacrificial offerings which Thou had received with the gods. O Thou Residing in Guruvaayur! Save me from my ailments.




In all the other incarnations of Thee put together, not having seen such majesties as in the salvation of Aghaasura, Brahmaa decided to test Thy powers. He extended his power of Maayaa, illusion, and took the herds of calves into invisibleness, and hid them.

The Gopa boys were worried by the disappearance of the calves. As though trying to bring them back, Thou went away from there with a half eaten ball of rice in hand. In reality, Thou made it convenient for Brahmaa to carry out his intention, who then made the boys also disappear while they were eating food.





There upon by Maayaa Thou assumed the form of the calves and the boys adorned with slings, vessels, flutes horns etc., and played around in the woods for long. In the evening in those many forms Thou returned to Gokul.

Thou alone were in the form of the slings and horns held by the gopaa boys who were also Thou alone in their form. The cows and calves were also Thy form alone. The mothers, that is, the Gopikas and cows received the gopa boys and the calves with great joy and love.




The Gopikas and the cows were greatly attached to the jeevas born as their issues, because of the sense of 'I'ness and 'mine'ness. This is a universal notion. By getting Thee as their off-springs, sons and calves, what extreme happiness and thrill of joy did they not get!

In this manner, day by day, every moment the Gopas served Thee in Thy many forms with ever increasing joy. Even Thy elder brother Balaraam could not relise that it was Thou in the various forms till the end of one year. Though Thou two are in reality of the nature of Brahman, there is a vast difference. Thou are special.




At the end of one year, Brahmaa was stupified as he could not distinguish which set of cowherds and calves were the old ones and which were the new ones. Thou revealed to him each of the new ones by making him see them with diadems, shoulder ornaments and other adornments.They even had four arms and the hue of water bearing clouds, like Thee.

The lotus born Brahmaa saw each one of them as Thee alone. As Him whose limbs were caressed by Godess Lakshmi, who was reclining on Aadishesha's hoods, a delightful sight to the eyes, as His eyes were sportingly closed as though in Yoga Nidraa. The Sanaka and other sages were attending on Him.




Brahmaa saw the innumerable forms of Naaraayana everywhere. He saw himself as an attendent. His mind was totally overpowered by Maayaa and he was completely confused. Then Thou became one, holding a half eaten ball of rice in hand.

Brahmaa, whose pride was humbled, prostrated to Thee, the Lord of the Universe, again and again. He praised Thee and went home. Then Thou also entered the house joyfully and rejoicing with the boys. O Thou the Dweller of Guruvaayur! And the Lord of the Universe! save me from my ailments.




O Lord of the universe! Having passed chilhood Thou attained the charming age of boyhood (6 to10 years). Then Thou gave up the tending of the calves and enthusiastically promoted to herding cows and cattle.

O Lord! This occupation that Thou took up was the fit and proper beginning for the work which lay ahead. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Thy incarnation was for the protection of 'Gotra', the earth, and tending 'Gotras', the cows, was a first step towards that end.

Once, with Balaraam, as Thou were happily roaming about in the woods and admiring the beauty of the woods, on Thy friend Sudaamaa's suggestion, Thou enthusiastically entered the Dhenuka forest.




At Thy words, Balaraam shook the cluster of tall palm trees with the force of both his strong arms. A bunch of soft and ripe and hard and unripe fruits fell in front of Thee. Just then, the demon Dhenukaasura, in the form of a donkey also appeared.

I am engaged in protecting the cows (Dhenuka), how can I now kill the Dhenuka (cow) asura?' Thus interpreting, as it were, Thou made Balaraam Thy elder brother kill Dhenukaasura who was an enemy of the gods.

Dhenukaasura's servants had also come in the form of jackals. O Lord! Thou and Thy elder brother, as if in mere play, smashed them effortlessly against the palm trees as though they were mere black-berries.




Then when Thou were killing the pack of jackals, Jambukas, Varuna, the water god, whose name is famous in the Vedas as Jambuka, hid it in the Vedas only, for the fear of being killed. I believe that it is for this reason that Varuna's name as 'Jambuka' is not known.

O Slayer of Mura! The gods praised Thee saying that the fruit of Thy incarnation has now appeared. Thou laughingly said that 'indeed the fruits of the palm tree have been got now', and saying so, ate the fruits with the boys.

Thou ate the nectar like juice dripping luscious and fleshy fruits with the boys to Thy heart's content. Fully satisfied and triumphant Thou returned to the house carrying along loads of such fruits.

O Omnipresent and Omnipotent Lord! The people approached Thee cheering that Dhenukaasura was killed. They praised Thee saying, 'Victory to Thee', 'May Thou live long', as they ate the sweet fruits. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Do save me from my ailments.





Long ago, the sage named Saubhari who was eager to serve Thee, remained submerged in the waters of Kaalindi, for twelve years, performing austerities. He became attached to the fish who kept sporting there. Once he saw Garuda right in front of his eyes.

Thy mount that Garuda who was hungry and was eating a fish. Seeing that, Saubhari was mentally very agitated and cursed Garuda saying that he would lose his life if he ate any creatures there.





At that time, Kaaliya the serpent was full of pride due to the power of his poison. He ate away the offerings set apart for Garuda, the enemy of serpents. Angered at this Garuda who is devoted to Thy lotus feet, smote Kaaliya with his wings. Kaaliya took refuge in the waters of Yamuna (Kaalindi), which had become prohibited for Garuda because of a curse of a sage.

As the cruel one was living in the waters of Yamuna, the daughter of the sun, the trees on the banks of the river dried up due to the power of the poison. The birds who flew in the sky above, dropped down dead. Thy heart melted in compassion and was moved with pity seeing the plight of the creatures.




At that time, once Thou had gone to the wood's end near the Yamuna , unaccompanied by Balaraam. In the intense summer heat, the throats of the cattle and the cowherds were parched. So they happened to drink the water of the river which was poisoned.

They had all lost their lives and had fallen on the ground. O Changeless One! Thou were overcome with pity and approached them. Thou shed Thy auspicious glances on them which were like showering nectar, which soon revived them.




The Gopas were revived and experienced a profuse showering of bliss in all their limbs, and exclaimed saying 'O what, what has happened?' Then seeing Thee in front they realised that this strange bliss was Thy doing, because they had seen Thy glorious deeds before.

In the same manner the cows also were revived very quickly. Seeing Thee in front they gathered around Thee affectionately and shed joyful tears as they were also lowing.




O Mukunda! We have horripilation all over our bodies. There is intense intoxication of bliss inside. The action of this poison is wonderful!' As they said so, the Gopas congratulated Thee and worshipped Thee.

In this manner, by Thy charming glances, the devotees who had lost their lives were revived and were rendered devoid of diseases. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who are full of such merciful greatness, release me from disease.





O Lord! Thou then made up Thy mind to drive away the fierce serpent from the waters. Thou quickly approached and got up on a Kadamba tree standing on the bank of the river, with its leaves withered due to the poisonous breeze.

Thou climbed that tree with Thy lotus like splenderous charming feet resembling tender leaves, and with a long leap jumped far out into the deep waters with swirling fierce waves.

When, Thou the bearer of the weight of the three worlds, jumped, Thy immense weight caused the waters to swirl and swell. On the river bed an area of a hundred bows (yards) submerged, as a sudden roar arose from the river.




The loud roar from the middle of the waters which extended to all the directions and the intermediary directions, disturbed and angered the serpent king Kaaliya. He came out of the water and rushed up to Thee in a fit of blinded anger.

Thou saw the serpent in front with his thousands of peak like hoods emmitting burning fire flakes and fierce poison fluid, looking like a many peaked black mountain.

Alas! That huge serpent emmitting deadly poison and breathing out intense heat, bit Thee of limitless strength, all over Thy body. Then it coiled around Thee making Thy body and Thy movements invisible.




The loud roar from the middle of the waters which extended to all the directions and the intermediary directions, disturbed and angered the serpent king Kaaliya. He came out of the water and rushed up to Thee in a fit of blinded anger.

Thou saw the serpent in front with his thousands of peak like hoods emmitting burning fire flakes and fierce poison fluid, looking like a many peaked black mountain.


Alas! That huge serpent emmitting deadly poison and breathing out intense heat, bit Thee of limitless strength, all over Thy body. Then it coiled around Thee making Thy body and Thy movements invisible.



As Thou performed the dance, the Gopas rejoiced, the sages sang hymns, and the gods showered flowers. O Lord of the Guruvaayur temple! Such that Thou are, save me from the severe illness.





O Lord! With Thy ear ornaments quivering rhythmically, Thou danced for long on the hoods of the serpent. As the gods in the sky beat the drums, the heavenly damsels sang in accompaniment.

O Hari! Thou played around for long, leaving the drooped down head and jumping on the raised ones. Thus Thou trampled hood after hood with Thy lotus feet. Thou danced around in this manner keeping time with the clapping of hands beautifully.

The group of hoods were crushed by Thee and were drooping. The blood flowing from them rendered the waters of Yamunaa red. The serpent king was totally exhausted. Thereupon, O Maadhava! His wives prostrated at Thy two feet in all humility.





O Lord! Long ago, and for a long time the serpent wives had well heard of Thy majestic greatness. And so their minds were absorbed in Thee. Without any restrain, they hailed Thee with hymns of praises of a kind which are beyond the powers of even great sages.

O Achyuta! Thy heart was overflowing with compassion on seeing the devotion of the serpent wives. With Thy mind welled with such compassion Thou let the serpent king live, who then surrendering himself unto Thee, prostrated before Thee.

Thou then told him to go to the Ramanaka island situated in the centre of the ocean. There the enemy of the snakes, Garuda would not do him any harm. Respectfully obeying these words of Thine, the serpent king departed along with the other snakes.





The serpent wives gifted Thee many gems, resplendent necklaces and silk garments. Adorned with these, towards evening, Thou joined Thy folk, who were waiting for Thee on the banks with their sights mingled with joyful tears, and went with them.

In the darkness of the night the group of people were unable to go back to their houses in Vraja. So they were sleeping there on the banks in the shelter of Thy feet. Just then they were engulfed by a forest fire.





The Gopas were awakened and raised piteous tones of 'save us, save us', in alarm. To quickly protect them, Thou drank in that great fire. What is so suprising in this? Thy mouth, indeed, is fire itself.

The yellowness 'Peetataa' was only an adjective of fire. By Thy having drunk it, it has also acquired the verb adjective of Peetataa, to be drunk. O All pervading Lord! The delighted cowherds thus praised Thee. O Hari! Deign to eradicate my ailments along with my sins.




O Lord! Thou the fulfiller of wishes, one day in a bedecked attire, with Balaraama, went to the forest. The sons of the Gopas and the cows also surrounded and followed Thee.

Joyfully showing around the unspoilt pure beauty of Vrindaavana to Balaraama, accompanied by the cowherd boys, carrying a staff in a playful mood, Thou reached the banyan tree called Bhaandeeraka.

Then, the pitiless demon, approached Thee in the disguise of a Gopa, desiring to kill Thee, who are with long arms.




In spite of knowing fully well of his intention, seemingly unaware of his designs, Thou cultivated friendship with him. Then near the banyan tree, arranging the game of wrestling with the cowherd boys who were skilled in that art, Thou started a duel.

O Lord! Thou divided the cowherd boys into two teams led by Balaraama and Thyself. The Asura was aware of Thy strength and being afraid wanted to join Thy team, to which Thou agreed.

As per the rules of the game, as was arranged, the victor is to be carried by the vanquished. Thou being defeated, Thou carried the very dear friend Shreedaamaa, there by demonstrating to the world that Thou are at the service of Thy devotees.




Thus the many cowherd boys were carrying and were being carried. In the course, Pralamba was defeated by Balaraama and so he carried Balaraama far away from Thy sight out of fear of Thee.

Balaraama saw that he was being carried far away, so he increased his weight by his divine power. The demon then took to his own real form, seeing which even Balaraam was wonderstruck.

The Asura's height was great and so being carried on his shoulder, Balaraam could see Thee from a distance. At Thy sight Balaraam shunned all fear and with a firm fist struck the demon and quickly crushed him to a pulp.




Balaraama returned after killing the clever Asura and Thou embraced him lovingly. As Thou two were meeting the gods and devas showered flowers on Thy heads.

O Hari! Thou who has the splendour of a black bee, who are the support of the worlds, Thou who carried out the distruction of Pralambaasura, without delay, quickly eradicate my sufferings.




As Thou were engaged in playing with the group of boys and were held up in the distruction of Pralambaasura, the cows moved far ahead in their eagerness to eat grass. They reached a nearby forest named Aishika.

The cruel summer heat was not felt in the Vrindaavana forest. But when the cows reached the outskirts of the forest, they were tormented by the intensely hot summer heat which was increasing and spreading. Exhausted by the heat and for the want of water and also out of grief at the seperation from Thee, they stood stunned and motionless.




O Krishna! Along with Thy mates, Thou ventured far in search of the cattle and having lost the way, Thou reached the Munja forest. There Thou discovered the cows standing in distress and as Thou were nearing them to bring them back, alas a wild fire broke out and spread.

All the directions were blazing with the outrageous fire and its terrific frightening roars. All the escape routes were obstructed and all the boys and cows were so tormented as if they were half burnt. They all took refuge in Thee who are a friend of all and called Thee saying, ' O The Only One saviour from all sorrows , save us, save us.'




Enough, enough of so much fright. Let all completely close their eyes.' Thus on Thy instruction when they had all closed their eyes, where indeed was the forest fire and where was the Munja forest? They instantly found themselves in the Bhaandeera area inside Vrindaavana. How wonderful!

Hail, hail, Thy mysterious ways, unfathomable, O Lord!' Thus Thou were smilingly praised by them. Thou continued to roam about and sport in various ways, where the Paatala flowers blooming in bunches, were the only indication of the presence of the summer season.




The intense heat of the summer time was like the weight of the heat of passion that people carry in their minds who are indifferent to Thee. It was like the heat which is created by worshipping Thee, which dries up all the mud and slush of Thy devotees. It was like the brilliance flowing from Thy two arms. Such a summer time Thou spent on the banks of the river Yamunaa.

Then, the clusters of clouds in the rainy season were like the hue of Thy splenderous body, the lightening shining was like the lusture of Thy beautiful yellow garment. It gave joy to all the inhabitants of the world. Such a rainy season Thou spent, sporting at will, in the caves of the mountain (Govardhana).




O Lord! To Thee, the highly honoured One, living in its caves, the mountain king (Govardhana) extended its hospitality. It sang hymns of Thy praise in the form of the pleasant cooings of the peacocks. It worshipped Thee in the form of offering heaps of fully bloomed Kutaja and Kadamba flowers falling from the branches at Thy feet.

Then the spring season approached. In that season the streams were full of pure water, like the pure minds of Thy devotees. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Thou spent such a season enjoying in the forests and happily grazing grass to the cattle in the pleasant forests. O Thou! bestow unto me good health.




Day after day the Gopikas saw Thy form and were captivated. Thy form beautiful and fresh and soft like the Kalaaya flower, evoking the sentiment of love. Thy form charmingly enchanting everyone. Thy form, Brahman indeed, the personification of Existence, Reality, Supreme Consciousness and Bliss (Sat-Chit-Aananda).

O Lord! The minds of these Gopikaas were oppressed by Cupid and because of their love for Thee, they were always eager to see Thee. O Hari! By and by they were unable to bear the seperation caused by Thy going to the forest early in the morning to tend the cows.

When Thou set out, the gazelle-eyed Gopikaas had their eyes fixed on Thee with their minds centred on Thee. They would listen to the sound of Thy flute from afar and revel in narrating and recounting Thy various sportive activities.




Having gone to the forest, Thou would stand cross-legged under a shady beautiful tree and kept playing the flute and filling its pipe with life-breath.

O Lord! The music born out of Thy flute shook the celestial damsels with Cupid's arrows. It made the multitudes of animals and birds motionless, and even melted the stones and rocks.

Thy tender finger tips moved deftly on the stops of the flute, as Thou kept time tapping Thy tender feet. This pose of Thine the Vraja women visualised in their minds again and again and got into a state of ecstacy. Oh how wonderful!




The celstial damsels were able to see Thy form without restrictions or hinderence. The birds and animals and cows also could see Thy form directly. Even the forest/earth was always having contact with Thy feet and saw Thy form as Thou roamed about. The Gopikaas of Vraja regarded all of them very fortunate and blessed.

O when for once, we will imbibe the nectar of Thy lips, the last of it left over by the flute? Far fetched indeed is this greed.' Thus the Gopikaas lamented again and again and were in great distress and despair.

Day after day and again and again, in this manner, the Cupid caused promptings to the Gopikaas. This was, in a way, a blessing to them. As it made them so bonded in attachment towards Thee, that they became helpless and so always attained indifference in the worldly concerns.

Indeed, attachment comes in the natural course. In spite of much effort the means of liberation may or may not be achieved. For the Gopikaas attachment to Thee served as both, as they attained liberation as a result. Oh fortunate indeed they were. O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me.




The beautiful eyed girls of Vraja, overcome by Cupid and love for Thee were desirous of serving Thy two lotus feet. To achieve this, everyday, on the banks of Yamunaa, they made an image of sand of goddess Girijaa and worshipped it.

All the beautiful girls were always immersed in chanting Thy name and narrating Thy deeds. In the morning they would go to the river and worship goddess Girijaa with hundreds of offerings and pray to her that Nanda's son, Krishna, may become their husband.

Thou were moved by compassion when Thou saw that the beautiful eyed girls had performed the vows for a month. With a desire to bless them Thou went to the river bank.




The observances of the vows being completed, they eagerly went to sport in the Yamunaa waters, leaving their robes behind, on the bank. Seeing Thee in front, they felt very ashamed.

The girls stood with their heads hung in shame. Thou took away the heap of their cloathes lying near by and quickly climbed up the branch of a tree.

Come here, O beautiful eyed ones! Take each one of you your clothes,' Thou said with a soft sweet smile. The girls were confused when they were asked to do so.




O dear boy! May you live long. We are your hand maids. Why do you tease us thus? O Lotus eyed one! Give us our clothes.' Thus being told, Thou merely gave a smile.

Thou saw that the girls had come up the bank with joined palms, that they were purified at heart and that they had surrendered to Thee as their sole resort.Thou with joy gave them back all their clothes and also words of promise as blessings.

Known indeed is your desire to me. I will surely give a proper response, in the moon lit nights on the sand banks of Yamunaa.' Thus Thou said to the girls.




O Lord! The doe eyed girls heard Thy honey dripping words flowing from Thy mouth. Looking with love at Thy lotus face again and again they slowly went home.

Thus Thou blessed the Gopikaas and continued to roam the woods as before. O Hari! With Thy such cooling compassion, quickly put an end to all my hosts of ailments.





Once Thou went into the forest far away from Vrindaavana, with the cows and the cowherds. In Thy heart Thou carried the desire of blessing the large group of the very devout Braahmin women.

Then Thou saw that the boys were hungry and were tormented by thirst and the forest was without any dwellings where some food could be got. Not very far away some Braahmins were performing Yagya. Thou sent the boys to them to beg for some boiled rice (food).

O Lord! The boys then went to the Braahmins and they mentioned Thy name and asked for food. But the great Braahmins who were known to be well versed in Vedas (Shrutis) acted as if they had not heard anything and did not respond in any manner.




The boys came back, saddened at heart at being ignored thus. But such an indifferent behaviour was quite expected of such ritualistic Braahmins. Indeed for long they were not devoted to Thee so how was it possible that they would offer food to Thee?

Thou told the boys to go and announce Thy arrival to the housewives. Thou smilingly told them that those women were full of compassion and that they would give food. Thus being told the boys went to the housewives and requested them.





As Thy name was mentioned by the boys, the women who were eager to see Thee were very excited. They quickly came to Thee carrying with them four types food. For long they were holding a desire to see Thee, so in spite of being forbidden by their kith and kin, they came quickly.

The peacock feather was quivering in the locks of Thy hair. Thy two cheeks were glowing with the reflection of the earings. Thy hand was placed on the shoulder of Thy friend. The women joyfully saw Thee standing in this manner in front of them.




And then, one of them who was eager to come near Thee, was held back by hand by her ritualistic husband. Thus being deterred, she meditated deeply on Thee. O What a wonder! This fortunate one easily entered oneness with Thee, there and then.

Accepting their offerings for food, Thou blessed them. They were always desirous of having physical contact with Thee and so abondoned their houses. Seeing this, Thou sent them back to conduct the Yagya rituals properly. Thou also rendered their husbands free from any ill feelings towards them.




The Braahmins realized their own mistake. They also recognized the great devotion of their wives. Those of them who reflected thus and then understood the Reality sang Thy praises. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Eradicate my sufferings.




O Shauri! Once the cowherds were collecting the requisite material to perform a Yagya to appease Indra. Thou wanted to humble the pride of Indra. In spite of knowing what the preparations were for, Thou, in full humility and politeness asked Nanda and the other cowherds, 'O Father what is this your effort for?'

Nanda told Thee, 'O son! A yagya has to be performed for Indra every year. He gives happiness to the earth by rain. The livelyhood of all human beings on earth depends on rain. Especially so for us, because our cattle live on grass and water alone.'




O Lord! Hearing this, Thou said with sweet reasoning, 'Oh no, this is not true, to say that the rain is generated by Indra. Rain is generated by the unseen past actions of the living beings, as required. In this big forest, what kind of offerings do the trees give to Indra?'

Thou said to Thy people,'this is true that the cows are the wealth of our tribe. This mountain (Govardhana) provides them with their requisite grass and water. So the offerings should be made to the mountain. The holy men on the earth are indeed more great than the gods, so they also deserve to be worshipped.'




Hearing Thy words the cowherds also worshipped the holy men with high regards. They made rich and plentiful offerings to the mountain. They performed circumambulation and prostrated again and again with great reverence. Thou becoming the soul of the mountain ate all the entire offerings in front of the cowherds.

Thou told them 'Was I wrong? This mountain has physically consumed all our offerings. Even if the enemy of mountains, Indra is angry, this mountain is capable of protecting everyone.' All the inhabitants of Gokula were happy on hearing this.




The inhabitants of Vraja, in a jubiliant mood returned to Vraja with Thee. Then, when Indra heard of his yagya being stopped he did not tolerate it because his mind was overcome by the preponderence of Rajo Guna. Indra knew Thee well and was also aware that his own high position was ordained by Thee, yet he was enraged.

Indra was full of false pride and set out to win Thee. He reasoned that even if it was Vishnu himself, the slayer of Madhu, in human form, if he shows disrespect to the gods, what ever their prestige, would be lost. So he made up his mind to destroy the lowly cowherd (Krishna) and all his prosperity, and to win Thee.




To destroy Thy residence Vraja, Indra released deluge causing clouds in the skies. He took along thunderbolt and set out riding on his white elephant Airaavata. He was accompanied by other gods, fire(Agni), wind(Vaayu),etc., who slyly scorned him. O Lord of three worlds! whom does not Thy Maayaa afflict?

Even if Indra is angry, we are fearless by the grace of the holy men and by the grace of the mountain,' saying so Thou certainly convinced the cowherds. Then Thou stood waiting and wondering why Indra had not yet come. O Lord of Guruvaayur! O Slayer of Mura! do eradicate my ailments.




At that moment, indeed, above the land of Vraja, were seen by Thee massive rain clouds continuously roaring and spreading. They caused all the quarters to tremble and they resembled Thy form in their brilliance.

There was torrential rain in all directions accompanied by huge enormous hail stones. The group of cowherds were tormented by the wrathful action of Indra. They all cried and prayed to be protected. O Invincible One! Hearing their laments , Thou asked them not to fear.




Here, for our clan, the mountain is the deity. Indra is the enemy of mountains. This mountain, Govardhan, will resist Indra's attack. Indeed what is your doubt in this?' Thou said so with a smile. O Lord! Assuring them, Thou quickly uprooted the Govardhana mountain with Thy two tender arms.

Then Thou held aloft the lifted up mountain with Thy lotus like arm. The soft sand bed of the mountain was well protected from the rain water. The cows and cowherds all gathered under the uplifted mountain along with their belongings and were also well protected.




As Thou were holding the mountain, Thou enthusiastically engaged the girls and boys of Thy age group in playful conversation. The cows gathered around Thee and Thou caressed them with one hand. The cowherds were all very satisfied and delighted.

This mountain is so huge. Yet he is holding it in his left hand which is tender like a lotus stalk, for long. What a marvel! Is it that it is the power of the mountain to have lifted itself up?' The Gopas who were Thy onlookers commented thus.




Oh! The arrogance of this small boy! When his hands pain by the weight of the mountain, he will put it back in place.' Saying so Indra who was full of contempt for Thee poured rain heavily for seven days.

Thou had not stirred one step from Thy place. All the clouds were drained and exhausted of their waters. They were drifted away and scattered by the winds. Noticing all this, the head of the gods, Indra was scared of Thy might and fled.




The heavy rain had then subsided and the cows and cowherds had come out from under the mountain. O Lord! Thou then replaced the mountain on the earth and were embraced by the overjoyed cowherds.

O Consort of Laxmi! The gods praised Thee saying that long ago (in the incarnation of a Boar) Thou had lifted up the whole earth itself. Lifting up the mountain was not much of an effort for Thee. O Resident of Guruvaayur! Save me from ailments.




The Gopaalakas witnessed Thy tremendous feats such as the lifting of the mountain and Thy great powers. They considered Thee to be the Lord of the Universe. All of them asked Nanda again and again about Thy horoscope.

Thy father told his clansmen of what sage Garg had prophesied about Thy greatness. Thence forward their love and also great respect for Thee increased much more than before.

Then as a result of being disgraced his pride was shattered and the lord of the gods, Indra realised the truth about Thee. He came to Thee with the divine cow Kaamadhenu, and sang Thy praises. He touched Thy lotus feet with his bejewelled crowned head.




The divine cow Kaamadhenu annointed Thee with her milk overflowing with love for Thee and so Thou were named 'Govinda', the Lord of cows. Airaavata the elephant of Indra brought the waters of the celestial Ganges and Indra also annointed Thee with it delightfully.

O Lord of the three worlds! Thou were annointed as the Lord of Gokula. By Thy grace and glory, Gokula attained a prosperity unknown and unheard of in either the heavens or even in Vaikuntha.

Once very early in the morning, Thy father was bathing in the river Yamunaa. He was taken away by the emissary of Varuna. To bring him back and also to fulfill the purpose of Thy taking human form, Thou went to the city of Varuna .




The Lord of the waters, Varuna, was taken by surprise at Thy unexpected appearance. Thou were well worshipped by him. Thou immediately returned home with Thy father. Thy father, Nanda, later narrated this incident to his clansmen.

The Gopas were convinced that Thou were definitely Hari Himself. O All pervading Lord! They were tied with the intense thirst of having a direct experience of Thy Supreme State. Thou showed them that state which is not attainable to men without devotion.

The great ocean of liberation was full and overflowing and lustruous with the supreme blissful nectar. The groups of Gopas were indeed immersed in it for long. O Infinite One! By Thee alone they were drawn back to their worldly state of consciousness.




O Lord! Thy unattainable abode was revealed to the devotees with such ease and clearly as a berry in one's palm. In which other incarnation of Thee has such a thing happened? So, it is certain that here in the form of a cowherd, Thou are the Supreme Self. O Dweller of Guruvaayur! save me from ailments.




Thou then decided to carry out the festival of the love god, which Thou had promised to the Gopikaas when their vows had ended. One night, with the bright light of the full moon, when all the directions were cool, in the forest on the banks of the river Yamunaa, Thou resoundingly played the flute.

O All pervading Lord! In the resounding sound of Thy flute the seven ascending and descending notes emerged in a musical strain and enchanted everything in the world space. Hearing which the damsels attained an unparalleled and uncomparable captivating state of their mind.




O Resplendent One! The lotus eyed damsels were captivated by the sound of Thy flute. They, who were engaged in the household duties, or were taking care of their children, or were engaged in serving their husbands, abondoned everything and came rushing to the forest place.

Some of the damsels were dressing up and adorning their bodies with jewels. As they heard the resounding sound of the flute, they came to Thee having adorned themselves halfway. For Thy eyes they were far more pleasing indeed than those who were fully adorned.




O Lord! One woman, in her haste, came to Thee wearing a necklace on the hips and the waist band in the neck area. O Mukund! It was as if the charming faced one clearly indicated to Thee in particular the attractiveness of her own hips.

Some another woman, in her excitement came to Thee not wearing any upper garment on her breasts. She was not noticed in such a state by the other women, who were as excited. It was as if she was weighed down by the unparalleled intense love she carried as water pitchers as breasts for the celebration of Thy coronation in the kingdom of love.




Some of them were indeed unable to come out from home. O Lord! They meditated on Thee firmly in their hearts. With the result, they gave up their bodies and merged with Thy non dual form and attained the Supreme consciousness bliss. These indeed were the most fortunate ones.

These women thought of Thee and remembered Thee not with the feeling of godliness, Paramaatmaa, but with the feeling of paramour. In a moment, they attained the state of liberation with Thee. O Supreme Resplendent form! Meditating in the mind in some or the other manner may I attain the state of immortality effortlessly.




The beautiful women of Vraja, who had come and gathered all around Thee, were looking at Thee. Thou had a captivating smile lighting Thy face, glancing with compssion, and Thou who are like an unbound ocean of splendour, O Hari! The stealer of the world's heart! rid me, O Lord of Guruvaayur! of my ailments.



Thou had decided to fulfil the desire of the beautiful women who had come to Thee. They were helpless as they were struck by Cupid's arrow for Thee. Yet Thou first spoke to them in an unfavourable manner.

To the hearing of the sages assembled in the skies, Thou stated the duties of the housewives, for the benefit of the world. Indeed, Thy words are to be followed for they are in accordance with the Dharma. But the actions of Thee who are ever pure, should not be practiced by others, because Thy actions do not always conform to the good and bad standards of the world.

On hearing Thy unfavourable speech, those doe eyed women were very much grief striken. For long did they plead saying 'O Thou ocean of compassion, do not, O do not foresake us.'




O Thou! Slayer of Mura! Moved with pity by their weeping and pleading, Thou set out to sport freely with them on the sand banks of Yamunaa river.

The sand banks of Yamunaa was lit by beautifully flowing and shining moon light. There Thou sat down on the bed which was made by the Gopikaas by spreading out their upper garment.

By Thy sweet and playful talks, by holding of hands, by the joy of kisses, and by close hearty embraces, Thou delighted the women folk immensely.





On the day of the stealing of clothes, O Lord! Thou had promised to them the stealing of clothes (the removal of the sense of ego). That also, O charming One! Thou gave to the beautiful eyed women, whose minds were overcome with bliss.

O Son of Nanda! The most resplendent one in the three worlds! Perspiration drops sprouted on Thy body. Thy lotus face was soft with a jasmine like smile. The damsels embracing Thee were very delighted.

In seperation with Thee, Thou are unbearable as a burning charcoal. In union indeed Thou are an absolute embodiment of love. O Dear One! Wonderful it indeed is that in union also, here again the women were delighted.

O Lord of Guruvaayur! I worship Thee who are eager in mind to nicely embrace the bulging breasts of Raadhaa. I pray to Thee to eradicate all the ailments.





The lotus eyed damsels were allowed to participate in the pleasant sport with Thee, the very pure embodied essence of the resplendent supreme bliss. They were immeresed in boundless bliss and so they fell victim to great pride and self importance.

This Krishna the Consort of Laxmi and the captivator of the minds of the whole world, is engrossed in me.' Full of pride, all of them indeed thought thus. O Govinda! Being aware of this, Thou disappeared from their midst.

O Slayer of Mura! One of the Gopikaas, Raadhaa by name, till then had reared no pride. Thou took her along with Thee far away and sported with her at will.





O Lord! When Thou disappeared, the lotus eyed damsels, full of suffering the pangs of separation gathered together, looking around for Thee in the various forests from place to place in intense and utmost grief.

" O mango, O champaka, O Karnikaar, O Mallika, O maalati, O tender creepers! Did you see the one who has stolen our hearts?' Thus the totally devoted ones asked the fruit and flower trees and lamented.

O Friend! This lotus eyed Krishna, I see before me,' excitedly declared one of the Gopikas, seeing Thee with her imaginative vision. This only doubled the sufferings of her friends.




They had completely identiied themselves with Thee. So, on the banks of the Yamunaa river they enacted and imitated Thy deeds. They went about searching for Thee all over again and they saw Raadhaa who was also separated from Thee because of pride.

Together all of them went searching for Thee from end to end in the forest till it was dark. Again coming together on the banks of Yamunaa, they intensely lamented and spoke to each other about Thy glories and excellences.

O ocean of mercy! O charmer of Cupid who charms the three worlds! Thou then appeared smiling softly in front of the Vraja women whose minds were overcome by grief and pain.




The beautiful women who were doubtful of seeing Thee, when they suddenly saw their own beloved in front, in what all ways did they not show their intensity of joy? That Thou O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me from misery.




O Lotus eyed One! As the Gopikaas saw Thee and approached Thee, they were overcome with joy. They stood stupefied and motionless as if drenched in a downpour of Immortal Bliss, seeing Thee in front of them.

After that, one woman, suddenly took hold of Thy lotus hand and without hesitation placed it on her heavy breasts. She stood like that for a long time with all her hair standing on end.

Another woman extremely overjoyed, O Lord! Wound Thy tender arms around her own neck, as if stopping the vital breath coming out of her throat.





One woman, devoid of all shame, from Thy lotus like mouth, taking the chewed betel, put it into her lotus like mouth. Doing so she attained the summit of fulfillment of all desires.

Who ever of us, here, will ever touch Thee who mercilessly abondoned me in the forest.' One of them resentfully said as she looked at Thee with tearful eyes.

In this manner, Thou went to the banks of the river Yamunaa with the Gopikaas who were overwhelmed with joy. The Gopikaas prepared a seat with their saffron tainted upper clothes, on which Thou sat with all splendour and shining with glory.




The Gopikaas told Thee 'There are so many varieties of compassion. Some people have compassion for everyone. Some have compassion for their dependents. Yet, some are such that they do not have compassion even towards those who have given up everything and fully surrendered, like me.'

Thou told them, 'O dear girls! Do not at all suspect me to be hard hearted. I am afraid of losing your love. I did this (the disappearing) so that your minds may be continuously fixed in me.'

O most dear Ones! Please listen to me. Take it from me that there is none as dear to me as you. Therefore here on the banks of Yamunaa in the beautiful nights sport with me without any hinderance.' Thus, O Lord! Thou told them.

Thus with such declaration the Gopikaas were even more full of intense joy. Thou then, sporting with them, full of enthusiasm engaged in Raasaleelaa. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me from ailments.




A bunch of peacock feathers adorning the beautiful locks of hair; a pair of fish shaped earings dangling from the ears; many necklaces intermingled with flower garlands adorning the neck; a golden girdle fastened to the yellow silk garment adorning the waist; sandle paste and other unguents smeared on the body emitting strong fragrance; gem studded anklets flashing forth a glow; on such a radiant form of Thee, with decorations appropriate for the Raasa, we meditate on.

Then only, having done the make up and putting on the bodice on the breasts, and begemmed earings dangling on the cheeks, the group of young women formed a circle surrounding Thee. O Consort of Laxmi! O Padmanaabha! Thou moved about in between every two of the beautiful women and performed the very beautiful Raas Dance.




O Vaasudeva! Naarada described Thy resplendent, fragrant and beautiful Raas Leelaa. Hearing about it from far, groups of gods, full of eagerness came from the heaven and quickly gathered in the sky. They were accompanied by hundreds of beautiful women who were experts in dressing up and in adorning themselves with jewellery and also in amorous display.

The key notes of the flute set the tune giving the sweet song and the raagas a flow and rhythm. The soft beat of the feet of the dancers kept time with the very pleasant beats of the music. The clapping of the hands mingled with the tingling sound of the bangles. During the dance, time and again Thou placed Thy lotus hands on the shoulders of the Gopikaas. As they danced about, the clothings on their waists fluttered. On such enthralling majesty of the Raas Dance let us meditate.




As though in competition, the singers raised their voices in successive strains as the musical notes reached higher in pitch. The beautiful limbs of the dancers moved delightfully displacing their necklaces and the begemmed ornaments on their body. The groups of gods watched with extreme joy and showered rains of flowers. Along with their women-folk they watched entranced completely submerged in the Pure Consciousness i.e. in Thee.

One Gopikaa, slender and delicate like a creeper, tired and sweating, with drooping eyes out of fatigue, supported herself on Thy beautiful shoulder. Another woman with dishevelled hair, to smell the fragrance of the fresh sandal paste on Thy arm, slyly kissed Thy arm, having horripilation over her body in the process.




Another one, who was a repository of merits, placed her own cheek on Thy cheek, with earrings dangling on them. She enjoyed the thrill as she intook the nectar like juice from the betel chewed by Thee. The Gopikaas, during the dance, having achieved Laxmi's sport field, Thee, the most beautiful in all the worlds, what states of joyous intoxication did they not attain?

O Lord! The singing stopped gradually and the musical instruments also ceased. But immersed deeply in the joy of Brahmic Bliss the women kept dancing in a circle. They were not even aware of the knot of clothing strings loosening or of their bodice having slipped or of their hair being dishevelled. The stars in the sky stood still in their courses, to enjoy all this. What more can I say?




The world was engulfed in the highest bliss as the Raas Dance ended. The pure bodies of these women glowed with fresh perspiration drops caused by the dance, and who were unable to bear the shafts of Cupid any longer. O Lord! Prompted by the meritorious deeds of the Gopikaas, Thou assumed as many forms as they were in number and performed an amorously great festivity.

O Lord! The women were exhausted by the varied sports and were fondly caressed. Thou performed sports with them at will in the waters of Yamunaa.Thou also went around in the forests where a cool gentle breeze was blowing filled with the fragrance of flowers, which dazed the large number of women with estatic joy.




O Repository of all virtues! In this manner, Thou made the women experience the immense bliss of the nectar ocean in the nights. Such an experience only yogis may attain. This created in Brahma Shiva and other gods a feeling of respect for the Gopikaas. O Thou attainable to the devout people, of such a nature, O Attractive One! O Krishna! protect me.



In this manner, as Thou were entertaining the Gopikaas and they were immersed in bliss, the Gopas went to the temple of Lord Shiva, Ambikaa's (Paarvati's) husband. Thou went along with them to the temple which was in the forest named Ambikaa. After the divine festival had been performed, they all slept happily in the night. Then a fierce snake swallowed Nanda Gopa.

The fierce snake was looking up. In spite of being thrashed with burning logs of wood, it did not loose hold of his prey. The Gopas fell on Thy feet and prayed for protection. Then indeed Thou went near and touched him with Thy foot, and he became his own body and attained the former form of Vidyaadharee.




O Lord! Weilder of Sudarshana! I am Sudarshana by name. Having sinned the sages for ridiculing them, they cursed me to remain here as a python. I have reached purification by the touch of Thy feet.' Thus praising Thee, he went back to his abode, while the Gopas also happily returned to Vraja.

Once indeed in Balaraam's company and with the women folk Thou were strolling about. Shankhachooda, an emmissary of Kubera, kidnapped the women. Thou hastily persued him and killed him and liberated the women. Thou gave the crest pearl of Shankhachooda to Thy brother Balaraam.




During the day Thou were engaged in play with friends in the forest. Enchanting even Cupid, Thou played the flute with lucious notes flowing like nectar. Thy sight was like a drink of nectar to the eyes of the celestial damsels. Thinking about all this the Gopikaas suffered pangs of seperation and what all lamentations did they not give in to.

Once, some emissary of Kansa, always looking for ways to do cruel and evil deeds, Arishta by name, terrific in appearance, bellowing horribly, in the form of a bull stood before Thee.




Then this bull who was the plunderer of the peace of the world, he assumed a form which was huge and driving away the herds of cows, soon approached Thee who are repository of Vedas.

Raising his horns and head he was rushing hastily towards Thee. Thou caught hold of him swiftly and fearlessly who was an inauspicious Asura, though he was in an auspicious form of a bull. Thou then crushed him to death and so delighted the gods.




"O Lord! It is amazing that today by the killing of the bull, the status of righteousness (Dharma) is strengthened on the earth. The great joy in Indra's mind is also enhanced." Thus Thou were praised by the gods.

O bulls! Run far away. See here is this slayer of bulls.' Thou went home with the Gopas who were joking in this manner. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me.




A close friend of the Bhoja king Kansa, Keshi was never unsuccessful in any of his attempts. He took the form of a horse from the land of Sindhu, thinking that Thou were easily accessible to those born off Sindhu (ocean) as Thou are to Laxmi Devi.

This wicked Asura, even though he had assumed the form of a Gandharva frightened all the worlds with his fierce voices. Until he set sight on Thee, the evil one distructed Gokula and then rushed to attack Thee.

Thou, whose feet are placed on Garuda, Thy vehicle, was kicked on the chest by this horse demon by his foot. Perhaps he had heard the story of sage Bhrigu having hit Thee with the foot, he deludedly thought that he too could do so.





Dodging his raised hoofs Thou quickly caught him and flung him far far away. Though he fainted for sometime, with an increased rage as though set afire, he rushed to consume Thee.

Thou decided to punish the horse, and placed Thy strong club like arm into his mouth. At that time the arm increased in size and choked the horse to death. Even though the Asura was in the form of a horse, he attained oneness with Thee.

Merely by the killing of the animal the gods were full of joy. This was as if it were a new Ashvamedha sacrifice done by Thee. Delighted, the gods hailed Thee giving Thee the name Keshava, the killer of Keshi.




Sage Naarada had told Kansa that Thou were the son of Vasudeva. Kansa eagerly set out to kill Vasudeva but was verbally dissuaded by Shri Naarada to do so. At the end of Keshi's distruction Naarada came to Thee and sung Thy praises.

One day Thou were engaged in playing the game of hide and seek with the Gopa boys. Just then the son of Maya, an Asura named Vyoma who had immense magical powers and who was an enemy of the gods, approached Thee.




He, in the game, mingled among the boys who were playing as thief and policemen. Vyoma playing as thief put the Gopa boys and the cows in a cave and closed the mouth of the cave with a stone. As Thou understood the situation, Vyoma was killed by Thee.

Thou made Vraja swoon in bliss with such strange and different kinds of sports.Thou renewed Thy sports every now and then with unlimited variety. O Supreme Being! O Lord of Guruvaayur! protect me.




Then when Kansa came to know from Naarada that, Thou, O Lord! resting on the serpent king! Were residing in Vraja, his heart was full of fear. He called for Akrur, the son of Gaandini, and sent him for Thee under the pretext of inviting Thee to witness the bow worshipping festival.


This Akrura for long was Thy devotee. Owing to the fear of Kansa he felt it was impossible to see Thee. Now he was overwhelmed with intense joy when by the order of the king himself he was preparing to see and meet Thee.




This doer of meritorious deed, Akrura, travelled in a chariot to Thy abode. On the way his innumerable thoughts were centered around Thee and so he again and again experienced Thy presence. He feared and fervently prayed for the removal of all possible obstacles to this meeting with Thee and so he did not notice anything on the way.

All along the way he was immersed in Thy thoughts alone - 'Shall I be blessed to meet the Supreme Being who is the subject of all Vedic hymns? Will I be able to touch him even slightly? Will he embrace me? What will he say to me? Where will I see him?' He went along the way thinking in this manner.




O Lotus Eyed One! He gradually entered Vrindaavana which is sanctified by Thy feet and revered by Shiva, Brahma and other gods. As Akrura approached Vrindaavana he was as if immersed in bliss or was under a spell. What states of ecstacy did he not attain!

O Lord! Coming to the places where Thou sported, he prostrated. He rolled in the dust which had imprints of Thy feet. O what shall I say! His state is beyond description. At that time also many devotees were born but such ardent devotees were few indeed.




Akrura reached the vicinity of Thy residence by dusk. He passed by the houses of the Gopas from where flowed the soothing to the ear, nectar like strains sung about Thy sportive deed. Seeing this he was as though carried away and caught in the current of a river of bliss and spiritual joy.

O Infinite Lord! Then Akrura saw Thee with Thy elder brother Balaraam, eagerly watching the milking of the cows, and it seemed like Thou were awaiting the arrival of a great devotee (Akrura himself). It was as if Akrura's internal Brahmic experience was flowing outwardly like a nectar ocean personified as Thee.




Akrura saw Thee and Balaraam, both neat and tidy after the evening bath, dressed in beautiful yellow and blue garments, wearing a few ornaments and looking charming in appearance. A soft smile played on Thy gentle faces.

The crown of the devotees Akrura got down from the chariot. Thou lifted him up in great joy as he prostrated before Thee. Thou embraced him and in a few words enquired about his wellbeing. Holding his hand Thou and Balaraam led him to Thy house.




With Nanda Gopa Thou very respectfully honoured the Yaadava Akrura and listened to the message of his mission. Thou communicated to the Gopas about the news of the king's command. That night Thou spent conversing with Akrura on various matters.

That night Thou failed to meet the Gopikas. The ladies suspected that the rascal that Thou were may be tarrying in the house of Chandra, or Chandrabhaagaa, or Raadhaa or Mitravrindaa, in the night. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Protect me.




Then hearing the news of Thy impending departure the cowherd girls were very much saddened. They gathered together and lamented saying -'What is this? How and why is this happening?'

The abode of compassion, Nanda's son, Krishna, how can he foresake us, who have no other support, except him. Alas what kind of fate do we have.' The girls with their hearts fixed on Thee bemoaned.

Thou were to leave with Thy father and a group of his friends in the last lap of the night. Thou sent one of Thy companions to the beautiful Gopikas who were very sorrowful, to assuage their grief.





I shall come back near you very soon. You will have many good and happy meetings with me. I will soon immerse you in the nectar of bliss ocean.' Thus Thou gave consolations to the girls.

The women followed Thee till far loudly and petiously begging and gazing with entreating eyes. Thou cast soft sidelong glances in that direction and departed with Balaraama in Akrura's chariot.

Many carts with Gopas followed Thee as also the minds and thoughts of the Gopikas. Thou crossed the forest with sorrowful animals and sad trees and reached the banks of the Yamunaa river.




Akrura, the son of Gaandini was bathing in the waters of the river to perform his daily duties. He saw Thee in the water and also saw Thee on the chariot. He was overwhelmed with wonder and became helpless as to what it all was. But is there any wonder in Thy being seen from everywhere as Thou are omnipresent!

Akrura again took a dip in the water. The meritorious and fortunate man that he was, he saw Thee The Supreme Being reclining on the Shesha serpent's body bed, resplendent and adorned with the discus, conch, mace and lotus. Thou were surrounded by groups of gods and various siddhaas.

He was then immeresed in the ocean of supreme bliss and sang the praises unto Thy Saguna and Nirguna forms. Even as Thy vision disappeared, he continued to experience the unlimited bliss and with horripilations all over his body, he went to Thee.

Thou asked him if the water was so cold that he had horripillation on his body, as if not knowing the cause. Akrura was speechless because he was immeresed in extreme bliss. Thou sitting with him on the chariot, O Lord of Guruvaayur! Do save me.




Thou reached Mathura by noon. Having taken Thy lunch in a garden on the outskirts of Mathura, Thou proceeded to see the city with Thy friends, and reached the main road. Thou were drawn as though by a chain formed by the meritorious people of Mathura who had long heard about Thee and were very eager to see Thee in person.

The women who came to see Thee were similar to Thee in various respects - Thy feet glow with a redish tinge, they were radiant and glowed with the intense love for Thee. Thou have a lustre of rain bearing clouds, they had beautiful full breasts. Thy eyes always moved about, they had eyes which were always desirous to see Thee. Thy chest is attractive with many necklaces, they were also attractive.Thy mild smile has a majesty of innocence, they had a majesty and they shined due to their purity. Thy clustre of black hair is adorned by a peacock feather stuck in it, their tresses were adorned by wearing ornaments.




Thy sidelong glances gave intense joy to the women and swayed the populace with joy and wonder. There among the people, Thou asked a washerman for clothes to which he retorted saying 'who is going to give you royal robes, go away.' Thou at once cut off his head with Thy hand, whereby he attained salvation.

One broad minded weaver gave to Thee suitable clothes and Thou confered salvation to him. Who other than Thou can fathom the merits of the jivas. O Lord of Laxmi! Again a garland maker who gave Thee garlands and bouquets and also sung hymns of praises was given Bhakti as desired by him, and also immense wealth.




On the way Thou saw a beautiful woman with lotus eyes but with a hunch back. She presented to Thee sandal paste and other unguents and in return Thou created in her heart an intense love for Thee. Then, in order that her straight forward inner mind be reflected in her outer physical appearance also, Thou gave a gentle pull holding her chin by Thy beautiful hand and thus transformed her into one of the most beautiful women in the world.

O Lord! Then those who were not very sinful and so had acquired full faith in Thy greatness, offered to Thee something or the other according to their capacity, like betel, garlands etc., At that time, in the path, carrying some flowers, alas, I did not stand with joined palms in salutation, because of which, today, I am experiencing great sorrow.




I will come again', saying so Thou dispersed the woman who had given unguents to Thee, whose gaze followed Thee till as far as Thou could be seen, going away. Then Thou prepared to enter the outer gate of the city (Mathura). Thy coming was preceeded by Thy fame which was like Devaki's (Krishna's mother) breast milk stimulated by the jubiliation of Thy arrival.

Having entered the festive city Thou proceeded to the hall of the great bow. Charmed by Thy majesty, the people stood at a distance and the gaurds too gave way to Thee to enter. The great bow lay there decorated with flower garlands and worshipped. Before the gaurds or the caretakers admonished Thee saying 'No no" Thou took hold of the bow, lifted it up, strung it, drew it and also broke it.




The breaking of the bow with a terrific sound was like the heralding drum beat to the festival of Kansa's destruction due the next day. O Lord! The sound caused horripilation in the gods. Even Kansa trembled by the sound which increased many fold and overflowed by the shrieks of the gaurds who were severly beaten by Thee with the two pieces of the bow.

Thy greatness was realised by the good people with love and by the wicked people with fear. Thou moved about the city viewing its prosperity and returned to Thy camp in the garden in the evening. Thou talked to Shreedaamaa about Thy sorrow because of the separation from Raadhaa. Thou then went to sleep feeling content and happy at the impending fulfilment of the purpose of Thy incarnation. O Lord of Guruvaayur! deign to protect me.




Early the next morning, the frightened king Kansa commanded the commencement of the wrestling by the beating of the drums. The assembly of the kings ascended their respective seats to witness the wrestling. Nandagopa had also gone to the palace, and Kansa had also climbed to the top balcony of his palace. Thou along with Balaraama and Thy friends, dressed attractively approached the gates of the arena which was obstructed by the angered great elephant Kuvalayaapeeda.

Thou said 'O wicked one move away from the way quickly'. At this the cruel and angry minded mahout prompted the elephant, who taking great speed caught Thee in its tusks. As though in play Thou released Thyself and struck a blow on the elephant's bulging forehead which rivalled with the Gopikas' pot like breasts. Thou then hid between the elephant's legs for sometime and then came out smiling sweetly.




To the sages who meditate, just as Thou seem to be in their grasp but suddenly elude them, so also Thou escaped even when Thou were in the grasp of the elephant, running away just when it seemed to catch hold of Thee. Thou then playfully threw him on the ground. As he again rushed towards Thee, Thou pulled out its tooth from the root of its tusk. From there emerged priceless large pearls which Thou gave to Thy friend asking him to get them made into a beautiful necklace and give it to Raadhaa.

O Lord! Carrying the tusk on the shoulder, as Thou entered the arena with Balaraama, everyone's eyes and minds were forcefully drawn towards Thy auspicious form.The people exclaimed 'O fortunate indeed is Nanda, no no the Gopikaas, no Yashodaa, no no we the onlookers are fortunate, we alone are fortunate indeed in the three worlds.' Thus everyone declared.




Not many people had the knowledge that Thou who shone and lived among the Gopas were Brahman incarnate and the essence of Supreme Bliss and Pure consciousness, free from all limitations. For many of them the auspicious time had arisen that they saw Thee for the first time and were full of bliss and became free from sin and joyfully narrated Thy deeds which they remembered.

At the king's command the champion wrestler Chaanoor and the boxer Mushtika attacked Thee and Balaraama. There were mutual and loud and fierce blows of fists, throwing up, pushing down and dragging and various such methods of fight were used. What a wonder it is that the leading wrestler Chaanoor, even before his death attained bondage and release many times at Thy hands.




Alas! How bad! The two boys are tender bodied and the two wrestelers are tough. We will go away quickly and not see this unequal contest,' thus the people were talking among themselves. Just then Thou caught hold of Chaanoor's arm and whirled him round and round and threw him dead on the ground. Mushtika was also quickly crushed to death by Balaraama. The remaining wrestlers ran away out of fear.

Kansa asked for the drums to be stopped. Then the wicked one not knowing what to do ordered for Thy respected parents to be killed. O Omnipresent Lord! He also ordered that Thou be driven away to a remote place. Thou were very annoyed at his wicked words. Thou leaped with determination to the throne of Kansa to the highest balcony of his palace, like a Garuda ascends to the top of the mountain, and gripped him, the son of Ugrasena, though he was difficult to catch hold of because he resisted with brandishing a sword.




Immediately crushing his joints Thou hurled the king on the ground and jumped on his body. At that very moment the gods in heaven showered flowers on Thee. What shall I say! O Supreme Being! Though Kansa always remembered Thee out of fear, he attained union with Thee as a result of Thou killing him. This was due to his vaasanaa (past life's tendency) as Kaalanemi (in his previous birth) who was killed by Thee.

Quickly then Thou killed Kansa's eight brothers. Prostrating before Thy parents, Thou made Ugrasena the king and made the whole Yaadava clan greatly happy by giving them what they desired. Thou then got Uddhava as friend who was the greatest of devotees and had recieved instructions into the laws of ethics from the preceptor of gods, Brihaspati. Thou resided in the capital with satisfaction. O Lord of Guruvaayur! deign to remove all my afflictions.




Along with Balaraama Thou went to sage Sandipani's aashram and mastered all knowledge in just 64 days. Thou brought back Thy guru Sandipani's dead son from Yama's abode and gave him by way of Guru-dakshinaa. Thou then went back to Thy city sounding the conch Paanchajanya.

Again and again Thou remembered the overwhelming love of the beautiful Gopikas for Thee. Thou were also overpowered with compassion for them. Thou sent Thy very dear friend Uddhava to them with a message. Also with the desire to demonstrate to him the intense devotion of those great devotees which was rare in the whole world.




Gokula's prosperity was an indication of the magnitude of Thy greatness. Reaching there in the evening, Uddhava delighted Nanda and Yashodaa with Thy many news. In the morning the lotus eyed women of Gokula saw the bejewelled chariot and suspected Thy arrival. They came to know that one of Thy emissaries had come. Abondoning their work, they gathered at the house of Nandagopa.

The Gopikas saw Uddhava donning charming clothes and ornaments similar to Thine. They remembered Thee again and again and Thy various deeds and sports very thoroughly. They were full of emotions and were choking for words, and somehow managed to speak to Uddhava with faltering words. They had forgotten to obseve the norms of behaviour and courtesies, and the differences between themselves and others.




O Sir! Is it that you are sent by the heartless Krishna for the sake of his parents? Where is the beloved one of the beauties of the city? O Lord! O Hari! Protect us. Alas which one of us women can forget the embrace of the nectarine form, the kisses of intense love and the frolicsome words of the beloved one?'

During the Raasa dance the done up beautiful hair which were dishevelled and had loosened, and with the appearance of sweat drops, Thy form was rendered enchanting. O Ocean of Compassion! Reveal to us once that form, so that we may once more embrace that form of Thee! O Enchanter of all the worlds!', thus Thy dear ones implored Thee out of intense love.




The Gopikas bemoaned their fate with such words of despair and were overwhelmed with grief. Uddhava comforted them with Thy message of deep spiritual import. They came to their normal selves and thereafter experienced Thy inner presence. Uddhava spent some days with the totally devoted Gopikas joyfully and happily narrating various incidents about Thee.

The Gopikas always sang songs about Thee. Everywhere while doing their household chores, they narrated Thine tales, amongst themselves. They even spoke about Thee in their dreams.Their actions were mostly imitations of Thy actions as they tried to personify Thee. Everything that there, was permeated by Thy presence. Observing all this that great devotee Uddhava was wonderstruck and left stunned.




This is my Raadhaa's favourite. My dear one speaks like this. My dear friend! Why are you silent like my dear proud one (Raadhaa)?' 'In this way O dear friend (Raadhaa) your beloved (Krishna) speaks to me when we are alone.' With these words Uddhava gladdened Thy dear lotus eyed Raadhaa.

I shall come soon. My not coming is only due to work pressure. When there is firm rememberance, in seperation also there is no grief. Before long when Brahmaananda is attained, you will experience the seperation and union equally blissful.' By such words of Thine Uddhava appeased them.




Such devotion is neither seen nor heard of in the whole world. Of what use is the study of so many scriptures and the practices there in. And what is the use here of all penances. May there be salutations to the Gopikaas.' Thus Uddhava joyfully exclaimed when he returned from Gokula and met Thee. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Who were happy to see Uddhava, save me from so many of my afflictions.





Thou went well adorned with Uddhava to the house of Sairandhree, the female attendent who had given Thee unguents and was long striken with love for Thee. She was thinking of Thee every day and adorned herself and decorated her house everyday in the expectation of the festive event of meeting Thee.

At Thy arrival, all her wishes were fulfilled and she joyfully honoured Thee with various offerings, with her breasts heaving in excitement. Thou happily delighted her in privacy.





When she was asked by Thee as to what boon she wanted, the stupid woman prayed that she may get to enjoy in the same manner with Thee on other nights also. Indeed only an enlightened person will ask for 'Saayujya' (becomming one with Thee) liberation. But at least she could ask for 'Saamipya' (being always close to Thee). How come she did not ask for even that!

O Lord! Subsequently Thou on some nights delighted the doe eyed one in secret. Thou gave her a son who came to be well known as Upashloka. He learnt the knowledge in Saattvat Tantra from Naarada and shone as an exponent there of.





Thou went with Balaraama and Uddhava to Akrura's house. Akrura received Thee with high honours and worshipped Thee with hymns. Thou sent away Akrura to gather the news of the Pandavaas who had returned from the forest and also news about Dhritaraashtra's doings.

Jaraasandha was blinded with rage when his friend and son in law Kansa was killed. He besieged Mathura. Along with Balaraama, and a few soldiers, chariot and charioteer called from heaven Thou destroyed his army of 23 Akshauhini brought by him.




Jaraasandha of extraordinary strength was forcefully tied up by Balaraama. Thou wanted him to come back with an army, so Thou released him. At that time there was no one more powerful than him for having conquered all the kings in all the directions and who comandeered their armies.

He was broken hearted and humiliated by defeat in the battle. He attacked Thee sixteen times prompted by the smaller kings. O Vishnu! Thou destroyed 391 of his Akshauhini armies altogether. What a wonder!




The eighteenth attack by Jaraasandha was immenent and Thou saw the Yavana king in front with 3 crore Yavanas. Thou soon got a city built in the middle of the sea by Vishwakarmaa and had Thy people transferred there, by Thy Yogic power.

Adorned with a lotus garland, Thou ran from the city on foot feigning fright and surprise. The Yavana king who was devoid of meritorious deeds, in order to be blessed by being killed by Thee, persued Thee. Thou then led him into the cave of a mountain, where king Muchukund lay asleep. Mistaking the king for Thee, the Yavana kicked him and was instantly reduced to ashes by the angry look of the awakened king. Thou then manifested Thyself in a charming form for the benefit of the devout king.




I am of the Ikshwaaku dynasty, O Lord! I am dispassionate towards the many royal pleasures. My only desire is for Thy grace.' Thus he said praising Thee. Thou were greatly gladdened to see that the king did not seek any of the multitude of boons. Thou conferred on him Bhakti which is as good as or equal to Mukti (liberation). Thou also conferred on him liberation which washes off all sins. Yet to set an example for the world, Thou told him to do penance to purify the deeds of having caused pain to people during his rule.

After that, going to Mathura Thou destroyed the army brought by the Yavana while on Thy way, like before, the armies of the king of Magadha (Jaraasandha) obstructed Thee. To inflate his pride, Thou gave him the last (eighteenth) victory by fleeing to the ocean city of Dwaarakaa. O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me.




Even though Vishwakarmaa, the divine architect had employed all his excellent skills in building it and the gods had lavished all their divine embellishments on the city, which was situated in the middle of the ocean, it was adorned by the marked resplendence of Thy form.

At the instructions of Brahmaa, the king of Revata gave his daughter Revatee in marriage to Balaraam. On this event with all the Yaadavaas, who had assembled, Thou happily performed a great festive celebration.

The daughter of the king of Vidarbh (Bheeshmaka), Rukmini was indeed in love with Thee. O Lord! Her brother,Rukmi, due to his ignorance caused by his Tamas guna, of his own will resolved to give her to the Chedi king Shishupaal. Rukmi had made friends with Shishupaal who was totally non virtuous.





For a long time holding love for Thee, which was braught about by the cruel Cupid, the girl at once instructed a Brahmin to acquaint Thee of her distress by the immenent threat to the fulfillment of her desire,

The Brahmin boy soon reached Thy city which is inaccessible to wicked minded people. He was highly delighted and attained great joy on being received with honour by Thyself the remover of the worldly travails and afflictions of men.

And he said to Thee 'In Kundinaa (capital of Vidarbha) lives the noble princess Rukmini. She is deeply in love with Thee. She who has lost her own restrain has indeed sent me here.'




From long since I am a captive of Thy excellences. Now the king of Chedi (Shishupaal) is going to captivate me. O Abode of Compassion! Save me.' O Lord of the worlds! Thus she prayed to Thee.

If Thou will foresake me, the helpless one, I will certainly end my life soon.' This massage of the fair Rukmini from the good hearted Braahmin, brought about deep agitation in Thy heart.

Thou then told him, 'O friend! My love pangs are more intense than hers. Therefore, I will come, and in presence of the kings, take away the dear dark eyed one.'

O Lord of Guruvaayur! Along with the highly delighted Braahmin, Thou immediately got into the chariot and soon reached Kundina. May Thou deign to bring about relief for me from all my afflictions.




Thou were respectfully received along with Balaraam who had followed Thee with an army, by king Bhishmaka, as Thou entered the city of Kundina. Rukmini at once honoured the Braahmin boy with salutations who gave her the news of Thy arrival in the city.

The public of Kundina saw Thy most beautiful form in the world, and heard about the ill effort of Rukmi, the king's son. They were smitten with great sorrow with the state of affairs in the city and spent a sleepless night sadly and tearfully talking about it all.

Then, the next morning, the moon faced beauty Rukmini, who had already dedicated her life to Thee, came out of her chambers to worship Paarvati. She was bedecked with auspicious ornaments and attire and was well surrounded by the guards.





The princess reached the temple of goddess Paarvati in the company of noble women. With great reverence and fervour she worshipped the goddess and prostrated at her feet praying again and again that Thou alone be her husband.

The assembly of kings had gathered joyfully with the expectation to see Rukmini. Thou stood among them in a silently aloof manner. Just then the princess came out of the temple of goddess Paarvati, in a charming manner causing the quarters to light up with her brilliance.

Then the enthralling beauty Rukmini bewitched the entire assembly of kings gathered there. Thou also, O Lord! Were somewhat enchanted by her as she cast her sidelong glances.




Addressing her admiringly, Thou asked her, 'O moon-faced one! where indeed are you going?' Thou hastily reached her and holding her by her arm Thou led her to the chariot and helping her in it, Thou carried her away. Whereupon there spread a loud protest among Thy rivals.

Where indeed has he gone, the cowherd?' Thus the enraged kings shouted and put up a fight. They were defeated by the Yaadavas. O what a wonder! Thou were not swayed in the least by the wicked ones, just as the lion is not swayed by the barking of the dogs.

Rukmi then came to battle with Thee. Refraining to kill him, Thou bound him and disfigured him and thus humbled his pride. At the instance of Balaraama Thou released him of his bondage and returned to Thy city Dwaarkaa with Thy wife Rukmini who was Ramaa (Laxmi) herself.




Rukmini was shyly caught between the new experience of being with her husband and the increased passion caused by the joy of experiencing love. O Lord! Thou sported with her in privacy so as to delight her whose face was beaming with the rays of her smile.

Day and night Thou delighted the beautiful Rukmini by various jokes and pleasant talks. Then one day, by Thy doubtful words the simple minded one was very much agitated.

More than ever before by Thy affectionate expertises Thou delighted this Thy beloved even more. O Bestower of Liberation! Liberate me from the sufferings caused by the disease, who is always narrating Thy excellences.




Thou then like a greedy man asked for the divine Syamantaka jewel from Satraajit who had got it from the Sun god. O Lord! The reasons for this may be many. What appeals to me indeed is that this was a strategy by which Thou wanted to marry his daughter (Satyabhaamaa) who was in love with Thee.

The narrow minded one (Satraajit) did not give the precious jewel to Thee. His brother Prasena wore it round his neck and went away hunting. A lion mistook the jewel because of its brilliance to be a lump of flesh and so he killed Prasena. The great monkey (Jaambavaana) killed the lion and gave the jewel to his child.




Influenced by the allegations of Satraajit, people suspected that Thou had stolen the jewel. Even a slight fault in the conduct of the virtuous person is like nectar for people in general, for it gives them a chance to slight that person. In spite of the fact that Thou knew everything about the jewel, Thou went in search for it with Thy men. Thou saw Prasena and the lion lying dead and thus were led to the monkey (Jaambavaan's) cave.

The aged Jaambavaan did not know Thy identity and so exclaimed, 'who has come to obstruct me who has Mukund as his only resort?' As, the crest jewel of the devotees, he was invoking Thee with "O Lord Raam! O Hari! Victory be to Thee!, he worshipped Thee with blows of his fists.




Finally when Jaambavaan recognized Thee, he gave to Thee his young daughter and the jewel. Thou accepted them and blessed him, and immediately returned and gave back the jewel, the Syamantaka Mani, to Satraajit.

Satraajit, the intelligent one, was then filled with shame for his conduct with Thee. He had given away his roving eyed daughter Satyabhaamaa to someone verbally only. He gave her to Thee along with the jewel. Thou, happily, with Thy deep and unfathomable reasoning gave back the jewel, having got what was worth getting (Satyabhaamaa).




When Thou were delighting the shy Satyabhaamaa, there was the news of Kunti's sons being burnt in the wax palace. So Thou went away to the land of the Kurus. Under the promptings of Akrura and Kritvermaa, Shatadhanu killed Satraajit and took away the jewel.

Satyabhaama was overcome with grief and went to Kurukshetra. Seeing her, Thou quickly killed Shatadhanu and made her happy. As though doubting the whereabouts of the jewel, Balaraam went to the abode of the king of Mithilaa. There he very well trained Duryodhana in the art of wielding the mace.




This, Akrura, O Lord! By Thy will alone caused the death of the notorious Satraajit. It is said that with a mind to bring about his prosperity, Thou did not take back the jewel from Akrura.

Akrura was very firmly devoted toThee. O Lord! How could there be an evil thought in his mind (of killing Satraajit and getting the jewel)? He was bloated with the vanity of having self knowledge and self control. Certainly to curb that, Thou brought this about.




Akrura with Kritvarma fled in fear. Thou called him again and brought out the jewel hidden with him. Thou then let him retain the jewel who was of good conduct, and satisfied him. Thou then lived happily with Satyabhaamaa reclining on her bosom. O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me.




Thou always endeared the loving and very beautiful Satyabhaamaa. Thereafter Thou went with her to attend the wedding of Paanchaali. To please the Paandavaas, Thou stayed in Hastinaapur for sometime. O Lord! Thou then founded the city of Indraprastha and then returned to Dwaarikaa.

Thy younger sister, the virtuous Subhadraa was saught in marriage by the Kuru prince Duryodhana. She was carried away by Indra's son Arjuna in the guise of an ascetic at Thy behest. Balaraama was enraged at this but was later pacified by Thee. Thou then went with him and Satyabhaamaa to Indraprastha to the great delight of Thy dear friend Arjuna.




Even as Thou sported there, Thou saw Kaalindi on the banks of the river Yamuna and took her as Thy wife. Thou pleased the god of fire, Agni by letting him consume the Khaandava forest, and then returned to the city of Dwaarika. The princess of Avanti, Mitravindaa was the daughter of Thy father's sister and was greatly in love with Thee. She was afraid of her brother and was helpless. Thou took her away suddenly in the presence of many kings.

Thou then went to Kausala and married the king Nagnajit's daughter after demonstrating Thy strength by harnessing seven powerful bulls simultaneously assuming seven forms. O Lord! Bhadraa's brothers Santardana and others gave her to Thee in marriage. O Bestowere of Boons! she was also the daughter of Thy father's sister.





The target which was just a reflection of a fish in the water was not hit at even by Arjuna and the others. Stricking which Thou married Lakshmanaa who was the daughter of the king of Madra. In this manner Thou had eight wives. Thou then came to know about the misdeeds of Bhauma from Indra's words.

Thou rode with Satyabhaamaa on Thy lap riding the divine bird Garuda, who came to Thee as and when required and remembered. Thou went to the residence of the enemy as if Thou were going to a garden. After destroying the fortification of the city of Praagjyotish, Thou killed the army and made the blood run all over the city. Thou soon converted the city of Praagjyotish into Shonitpura (the city of blood).




The Asura Mura having five faces rushed towards Thee from the middle of the forest which was like an ocean. He was at once made headless by Thy discus cutting off his five heads. Then Narakaasura with his regiment of mighty four tusked elephants gave a prolonged tough fight. Thou cut off his head also and made him pass over hell (and saved him from the suffering of hell).

Bhumi Devi sang hymns in Thy praise. Thou at once gave the kingdom and an elephant to Narakaasur's son Bhagadatta. The rest of the elephants Thou sent away to Dwaarikaa along with a good amount of wealth. Thou also sent the 16000 women who nourished love for Thee, and were imprisoned by the wicked Narakaasura.




To give back to Aditi the ear ornaments which were taken away by Narakaasura, Thou went to the heaven. Satyabhaamaa had accompanied Thee who put to shame the women there, with her beauty. Thou were received with honour by Indra and others. Thou took away the Kalpataru, at which, the angered Indra put up a fight. Thou won over him and returned to Thy city. Thou did this to demonstrate to the world the evil which is generated from prosperity.

Thou planted the Kalpa tree in the courtyard of Satyabhaamaa's palace. The 16000 women were accepted by Thee as wives. Thou took on as many forms and engaged Thyself in each of those houses of these wives in various activities and lovingly nurtured them. Naarada was surprised to see Thee sporting in this manner. Thou then gave each of them ten sons. O Lord of Guruvaayur save me.




Pradyumna, Rukmini's son was an aspect of Thy essence and was kidnapped by Shambara at birth. Later Pradyumna killed Shambara and returned to his city of Dwaarikaa with his wife Rati. He also carried away the fortunate daughter of Rukmi and married her. His virtuous son Aniruddha married Rochanaa, the grand daughter of Rukmi. Thou had gone to that wedding. During a game of dice, when a quarrell arose, Rukmi was killed by Balaraam.

Bali's son Baana was a devotee of Shiva and had a thousand arms. His esteemed daughter Ushaa had not seen Thy grandson Aniruddha before. She met him in her dreams and suffered pangs of separation from him.




Pradyumna, Rukmini's son was an aspect of Thy essence and was kidnapped by Shambara at birth. Later Pradyumna killed Shambara and returned to his city of Dwaarikaa with his wife Rati. He also carried away the fortunate daughter of Rukmi and married her. His virtuous son Aniruddha married Rochanaa, the grand daughter of Rukmi. Thou had gone to that wedding. During a game of dice, when a quarrell arose, Rukmi was killed by Balaraam.

Bali's son Baana was a devotee of Shiva and had a thousand arms. His esteemed daughter Ushaa had not seen Thy grandson Aniruddha before. She met him in her dreams and suffered pangs of separation from him.




The consort of the mountain's dear daughter, Shiva, being the protector of the city, with his army of the Bhootas blocked the army of the Yadavas, fearlessly. The mighty Baana quickly gave fight to Yuyudhaana, Guha to Pradyumna and Thou to Shiva, the destroyer of the Puras.

All Shiva's weapons were resisted and he was rendered unconcious by Thy weapon (Mohanaastra). All the army of the Bhootas fled in fear and the leaders of the Pramathas were crushed. Skanda was defeated, by the flower arrows of Pradyumna's bow. The minister of Baana, Kumbhaanda was soon smashed by Balaraam like a new pot.




Baana came attacking ferociously with 500 bows and arrows, but his weapons being severed he had to retreat. Thereupon, the head of all the obsession, the Shaiva obsession came to the forefront but was immediately put out by the Vaishnava obsession. The enlightened Shaivas gave freedom to all those that sung Thy excellences and went away praising Thee. Often the enlightened Rudras also act ferociously, being predominated by Tamas.

Baana again attacked ferociously full of arrogance with his many various weapons. Thou made him devoid of all vice and his many arms by cutting them off. Shankara soon realised Thy greatness and praised Thee and on his request Thou let off Baana with his two arms on both sides. Baana who was then spared from the fear of death honoured Thee. Thou then returned to Thy city Dwaarikaa with Aniruddha and Ushaa.




Thou indeed defeated Indra again and again, Varuna was defeated when he kidnapped Nandagopa and Yama was defeated by Thee when he took away the children of Thy Guru. Agni, Vayu's friend was overcome when Thou drank it during the forest fire and Brahmaa was defeated when he stole away the calves. Shiva was defeated here in Baana's battle. Therefore, O Lord! this incarnation of Thee excells and wins over all other of Thy incarnations.

King Nriga who was reduced to the body of a chameleon by a holy Braahmin's curse, was purified and sent to heaven by Thee. By this Thou instructed Thy devotees to have supreme respect for holy Braahmins. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me.




Then when intoxicated Balaraam was sporting happily and at will with the damsels, he called over Yamuna to him. When Yamuna did not comply to his wishes he subdued her by turning her course. At that time Paundraka Vaasudeva misled by the ill advice of his subordinates, sent a messenger to Thee.

I am Naaraayana and have descended here on this earth. It seems you too bear my emblems. Abondon them and surrender unto me.' Thus the messenger said to Thee to the amusement of all in the assembly.




After the messenger had departed, Thou went with the Yaadava army to the capital of Paundraka. There Thou saw the ridiculous form of Paundraka's body marked by a burnt sign (representing Srivatsa) an invaluable gem round his neck (representing the Kaustubha) and wearing also fish shaped ear ornaments and a yellow silk garment.

Paundraka threw his own Sudershana made of black iron at Thee. Thou then cut off his head by Thy Sudarshana which was emitting sparks of cosmic fire, and crushed his army. Thou also cur off the head of his friend Kaashi and hurled it into Kaashi itself.




It may be due to stupidity or due to believing the immature words of young people that Paundraka for long firmly believed in his mind that he himself was indeed Vaasudeva. This thought made him constantly be in oneness with Thee and so he attained Saayujya (union with Thee). Who knows whose good deeds lead him where and to what credit?

Then the son of the king of Kaashi, called Sudakshina fervently worshipped Shankara. He performed black magic on Thee and released an evil fierce fire named Krityaa. He also somehow mobilised the Bhootas who were frightened during the battle Thou fought with Baana.




The frightened citizens saw the Krityaa fire with long legs like palm trees burning everything and they informed Thee of this. Thou without stirring from Thy seat at the game of dice in which Thou were engrossed, deployed O Lord! Thy Sudarshana discus which was ready at hand.

Thy ever brilliant great weapon dashed towards Krityaa. The terrible Krityaa ran away shouting in distress and in anger burnt down the impious actioned Sudakshina himself. Thy Sudarshana discus in turn burnt down the city of Kaashi.




Long ago Vividha, the monkey who had helped Thee in killing the Raakshasas (during Thy incarnation as Raama) nursed the desire to be killed by Thy part incarnation. As a minister of Narakaasura, he took to evil ways and started creating sufferings for the people in the vicinity of Dwaarika. In a fight with Balaraama, he was killed with ease by a blow of Balaraam's hand in no time.

Saamba was a captive of the Kurus because he had abducted their daughter. Balaraam went to the Kurus to pacify them but was enraged by their talks and lifted up Hastinaapur and released Saamba. Thou did not send the Yaadava army to confront them, because Thou wanted that the Kurus be killed by the Paandavas. Thou whose sporting ways are unfathomable, O Lord of Guruvaayur! I worship Thee so as to remove my sufferings.




Once then during the time of Solar eclipse, leaving behind Kritvarma and Anirudhdha in charge of Dwaarika, Thou went to the holy spot known as Samantapanchaka, along with the Yaadava clan and their womenfolk.

Thou also took a dip in the holy waters and thereby sanctified the waters for the benefit of the large number of people. Thou also gave away money in good amount to the group of the Braahmins. Then Thou interacted with Thy friends the Kauravas and the Paandavas and others.

Draupadi who was deeply devoted to Thee, freely mixed with Thy wives. She was very much delighted when they narrated the various methods by which they were abducted and married by Thee. The other women also enjoyed the narrations.




After that O Lord! Seeing the gopas Thou approached and honoured them with great joy. The gopikas had become frail in body due to the sorrow of seperation from Thee for a very long time. Thou joyfully went to them also.

Instantly then, celebrating the joy of Thy sight all complaints from the hearts of the beautiful women were wiped away. With the intense love welled up, their bodices burst open revealing their very dear familiar breasts where Thou got absorbed.

Raadhikaa was totally absorbed in Thee when Thou embraced her and told her that so much delay was caused in meeting her and the gopikas because of frequent clashes with the enemies.




Then the gopikas were rendered free from the pangs of seperation as Thou gave them the knowledge of Supreme self privately. Thou instilled into their hearts that Thou were the Supreme Bliss Consciousness and the Supreme Brahaman, their inner most self.

There remained a feeling of joy mixed with the sorrow of seperation when long back the gopikas were adviced by Uddhava. But after this instruction by Thee, they indeed were experiencing Supreme Blissful Union with Thee by a mere thought of Thee.

Vasudeva asked the assembly of the great sages about the auspicious rites to be performed for the atonement for the sins. Even though the sages were very amused and laughed at such an enquiry, because having Thee as a son there was no need for any atonements. But they made him perform the required rites all the same.




The very big sacrifice was performed which lasted for three months. During that time Thy friends and the gopas were honoured by the Yaadavas and they enjoyed Thy company's pleasure like in the olden days.

At the time of departing Thou approached Raadhaa. As Thou held her in a tight embrace Thou were happy to see her free from all sorrow of separation or otherwise. Thou returned to Dwaarikaa with a happy heart. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me from all ailments.




O Lord! The Magadha king Jaraasandh had 20800 kings as captives in his prison. The tormented kings sent a person as a messanger to Thee, the only refuge of the helpless. He prayed to Thee to kill the king of Magadha. What more can be said.

Then eager to attack Jaraasandha, the king of Magadha, Thou were informed by Naarada that Yudhishthira was preparing to perform the Raajasooya Yagna. Thou were in a fix as to which of the two Thou should attend to. Udhdhava pointed that the sacrifice demanded that all the enemies be conquered, so by attending the sacrifice both the purposes will be fulfilled. With Thy followers Thou proceeded to attend the Raajsooya Yagna in Yudhishthiraa's city Indraprastha.




Thou reached Indraprastha along with all Thy wives. Enhanced in strength by Thy gracious glances, Dharmaputra with his brothers conquered all the opponents and ammassed incomparable wealth. Oh Thou who are the servant of Thy devotees was then sent by Yudhishthira to Jaraasandha along with Bheem and Arjuna.

O Lord! Thou three then went to Girivraja the capital of Jaraasandha. In the guise of Braahmins Thou asked for a festival of dual. Thou made the king of Magadha, Jaraasandha, who was lacking in good deeds, fight with Bheem. Meanwhile, Thou and Arjuna remained as onlookers and 'Raajayudhva' i.e. who make kings fight.




Arrogant Jaraasandha was fighting ferociously in the battle. Thou gave a hint to Bheema (that Jaraa's son could be killed by splitting) by splitting a twig. Bheema then tore Jaraasandha apart and killed him. The captive kings were then released and Thou happily blessed them with supreme devotion. They were all devoid of all desire, yet Thou engaged them to rule the earth ethically and as per Dharma.

Yudhishthira was then performing the Raajsooya Yagna during which all the kings were joyfully performing the work alloted to them as servants. Thou O Lord of the Universe! Also were engaged in washing the feet of the holy men and the Braahmins etc. What can be said about the upliftment of the good fortune of the great king Yudhishthira?




According to the system of the sacrificial rite the most noteworthy of the guests assembled was honoured and worshipped foremost. While Yudhishthira was considering, he followed Sahadeva's advice and performed this worship to Thee, the Soul of the whole Universe. This gave great satisfaction to everyone, gods and humans alike.

Just then, at once, the king of Chedi, sprang up from his seat hurling a string of abusive words to Thee, 'In this assembly, in the presence of great sages and kings, which fool is honouring this corrupt cowherd boy?' he exclaimed. Saying so he flourished his weapons and was soon confronted by the Paandavas.




Thou detered Thy allies, the Pandavas and Thyself cut off the head of the advancing adversary with Thy discus which cuts the Asuras. Chedi had gained a purified mind through his three births (as Hiranyakashipu, Raavana and Shishupa),where he was constantly thinking of Thee. Thus he attained the supreme union with Thee which is not easily attained by the Yogis.

Then the most holy and eleborate sacrifice, the Raajasooya Yagna being completed by Thee, the people returned loudly acclaiming Thee and Yudhishthira. The wicked Duryodhana's mind was full of jealousy at the sight of the enemy's prosperity. He was all the more confused when he mistook the floor for water and water for floor in front of the assemly hall which was built by the Asura's arshitect Maya, for the Pandavas.




O Lord! Then a loud laughter arose from Draupadi and Bheema instigated somewhat by Thy side long glances. O All pervading Lord! Immediately indeed the seed was sown by Thee to rid the earth of its burden. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Save me from my ailments.





Saalva of magical merits, who was defeated by the Yaadava army at the time of Rukmini's abduction, got Saubh the aerial car as a boon from Shivaa.When Thou were residing in the city of the Kurus, Indraprastha, Saalva attacked Thy city Dwaarika. Pradyumna resisted him heading the entire army of the Yaadavas, and killed his powerful minister Dyumanta. This battle lasted for 27 days.

Along with Balaraam Thou quickly reached Dwaarika and confronted Saalva the owner of the aerial car Saubha whose army was almost destroyed. He knocked down Thy bow Shaaranga with a stroke of his mace. He even killed the likeness of Thy father which he had created by his magical abilities. Some say that even Thou were for a moment decieved by this illusion. But sage Vyaas has refuted this opinion.




The aerial car Saubha was smashed to pieces with a mace and thrown into the sea, Saalva's head was also cut off by Thy Sudershana discus. Dantavaktra then attacked Thee violently and hit Thee with his mace, thereupon Thou killed him, the repository of good deeds, with Thy mace Kaumodaki. He was fortunate like Shishupal (Chedi) and others who had attained union with Thee. The purpose of this incarnation of Thee was to give liberation to all those who had for long fixed their minds on Thee.

After Thy return to Dwaarikaa, a fraudulent game of dice took place in the assembly of the Kurus. Draupadi was dragged there by her hair. Piteously and helplessly crying she prayed to Thee. With compassion Thou endowed her with endless length of clothing. Further, when living in the forest, Draupadi was very frightened because sage Durvaasaa had come there with his people when the food was over. Draupadi again thought of Thee and Thou came to her rescue and ate a bit of the left over leafy vegetable and thereby satiated fully the hunger of the sage and his retinue.




As the preparations of the war were on and strategies were decided, Arjuna asked Thee alone to be on his side. Agreeing to that, Thou gave Thy army to Duryodhana. Taking on the role of a messanger of the Pandavas, Thou went to Hastinaapur. Indeed Thy words were honoured by Bhishma, Drona and others but Duryodhana rejected them altogether. Revealing Thy Cosmic form in the assembly of the sages Thou shook up the entire Hastinaapur and returned to Dwaarikaa.

In Thy role as Arjuna's charioteer, Thou saw the warrior sad and dejected in the face of the war, with the pitiful thought of having to kill his relations and his own people. Thou said to him 'O Friend! What is this? Aatman is eternal and only one. Who is the slain and who is the slayer here? Therefore giving up all fear of killing, surrender yourself to Me and carry out this righteous war.' By saying so and showing him Thy cosmic form, Thou brought Arjuna back to a balanced state of mind.




Bhishma, one of the leading devotees was intent on helping in fulfilling Thy purpose of reducing the burden of the earth, and was killing almost 10,000 warriors everyday. Arjuna had become very exhausted in resisting Bheeshma. Forgetting Thy vow of not taking up arms in the war, Thou rushed towards Bheeshma with Thy great discus in hand as though in great anger. Bheeshma stood with folded hands and bent down his head as Thou approached him. Seeing him thus Thou were full of joy and desisted from attacking him.

When the fight with Drona was going on Bhagadatta who was firmly seated on an elephant discharged the Vaishnava missile which Thou attracted towards Thy own chest and saved Arjuna. Arjuna was able to kill Jayadratha when Thy Sudarshana discus hid the rays of the sun. Again when Karna discharged the Naaga missile towards Arjuna, Thou lowered the earth by the pressure of Thy toe, so that only Arjun's crown got cut off and Arjuna was saved here also. What all did Thou not do for the benefit of the Paandavas.




Just when the war was to begin Balaraama had gone away on a pilgrimage. He first covered the holy area of Naimishaaranya. Then he killed Suta for not having got up to honour him and installed his son in his place. Then he destroyed the Asura Valkala, who used to destroy the Yagnyas carried out on the full moon and new moon days. Completing his pilgrimage he returned to Kurukshetra. There when he saw the prolonged fight between Bheema and Duryodhana, he went away to Thy city of Dwaarika.

Drona's son, the evil minded Ashwatthaamaa had killed the sons of Draupadi when they were fast asleep. On Thy command Arjuna approached him and retracted the Brahmaastra discharged by him and clipped off his crest jewel.To cut off the line of the Paandavas, Ashwatthaamaa again sent the weapon into Uttara's womb to kill the foetus in there. To protect the foetus Thou entered her womb in the size of a thumb with Thy Sudarshana discus in hand.




The entire great Dharmas were taught to Yudhishthira by Bheeshm who could decide the moment of his death. On seeing Thee, by his devotional intensity alone he attained the undivisible state of Brahman. Thou enabled Yudhishthira to perform three great Ashwamedha Yangyas by which all his aspirations were fulfilled. Then Thou returned to Dwaarikaa. O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me from all diseases.




The Brahmin by the name Kuchela (Sudaamaa) was Thy fellow disciple in the hermitage of sage Saandipini. He was totally devoted to Thee. A house holder with a controlled mind and senses, he spent his days calmly without any worldly desires of wealth etc.

His wife who equalled him in nature , had not achieved the same level of desirelessness as him. Once she asked him why should he not approach his friend Krishna, the Consort of Laxmi, for getting some means of livelihood.

Kuchela set off for Thy place more out of eagerness to meet Thee than for acquiring a means of livelihood, as prodded by his wife, troubled by hunger. He had a repulsiveness towards wealth because of its proneness to generate pride and arrogance. He carried in a corner of his cloth some beaten rice as an offering to Thee.




Kuchela reached Thy wonderful city and among the many houses, entered the house of Mitravrindaa. As he did so he attained supreme peace as though he had entered Vaikuntha only, more so by Thy lavishing hospitality beyond description.

After a cordial reception by Thee as he was fanned by Thy consort, Thou held his hands and recalled the old incidents. Like when at the behest of the teacher's wife, Thou went togather to gather fire wood and were caught in an unseasonal rain in the forest.

Kuchela was feeling very shy and so Thou forcefully snatched the flattened rice from him and ate a fistful. Just then in great consternation Ramaa approached Thee and held back Thy hand saying that that much was indeed enough.




He was greatly honoured by Thee the devoted of the devotees, and very happily stayed in Thy city for one night. The next day he went away alas without any wealth. Strange indeed are Thy forms of blessings.

Had I but asked for wealth Krishna would surely have given. What shall I tell my wife?' Thus telling himself he walked along immersed in the memories of Thy talks and Thy playful smile. By and by he reached a gem studded splendorous mansion.

What have I lost my way?' Thus wondering for a moment he entered the house. He saw his wife adorned in ornaments of gems and gold and surrounded by ladies in waiting. He then realised Thy grace and compassion and the most wonderful results of the same.

Residing in the begemmed mansion he himself was full of devotion for Thee which incessently grew of its own. In the end he attained liberation. Thou in such a manner fulfilled the desire of Thy devotee. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Be pleased to rid me of my ailments.




Thy mother had long back heard of Thy having brought back Thy teacher Saandipini's son and she desired of Thee to be shown her six dead sons. By Thy mother's words Thou went to the Sutala land and met Mahaabali and were greatly honoured by him. From there Thou brought back the six sons who were originally Marichi's sons and were later born to Hiranyakashipu by a curse of Brahmaa. They later took birth as Vasudeva and Devaki's sons, who were killed by Kansa. Thou took them to Thy abode.

With the desire to bless both the great well known Braahmina Shrutadeva and the deeply devoted king Bahulaashwa, Thou went to Mithilaa along with many ascetics.




Thou went to the house of both of them at the same time by assuming two identical forms. One, the king received and worshipped Thee with plenty of rich offerings. While the other, the Braahmina worshipped Thee and offered to Thee the fruits and rice and other things obtained as alms that day. Thou were equally pleased with both of them and bestowed Mukti (liberation) on them.

Again then in Dwaarikaa, there was a Braahmin whose children died just when they were born. To the wails and lamentations of the father Thou had just to say that who could resist fate. May be, I believe, seeing this Arjuna's mind was blunted into thinking that Thou were merely a human being. To curb his pride and to take him to the high level of realizing the Truth, Thou showed him the Supreme abode, Vaikuntha.




People began to speak ill of Thee at Thy indifference towards the Braahmina even after he had lost eight sons. At that time Arjuna came and stayed at Dwaarikaa on a friendly visit. When he heard the wailing and lamentations of the Braahminaa on having lost his ninth son, he was very much moved. He vowed to bring back the son failing which he would immolate himself in fire.

When the tenth child was to be born, the proud Arjun went to the Braahmin's house without telling Thee. He made a protective web with his arrows and divine missles around the labour room. Again suddenly the child's body disappeared. Immediately Arjun with his yogic powers went in search for the infant to the houses of Yama , Indra and other gods. As all his efforts were in vain he was about to enter the fire when Thou smilingly prevented him from doing so.




Thou rode with Arjun on a very fast chariot and went past the mountain Lokaaloka towards the west. The intense darkness there, Thou removed by the spendour of the Sudarshana discus. Arjuna's eyes were dazzled as he stood there. Thou showed him Thy undescribable abode beyond the causal waters which was unaffected by the darkness of ignorance or the Tamas Guna.

There seated was He on the bed constituted of the king serpant Aadishesha. He was adorned with ornaments and divine weapons and yellow silk garment. Goddess Laxmi was at his side and His form had the splendour of dark fresh rain bearing clouds. He is the Supreme Ruler over the Trinity of Brahmaa Vishnu and Mahesh and is the sole subject of all the Vedas and scriptures. To That Being, the embodiment of Moksha and identical to Thyself, Thou and Thy dear friend Arjun prostrated.




The two of you are Myself alone. In one the divinity is potent and it is latent in the other, so you two seem different. To meet you I Myself took away the sons of the Braahmin. You may now take them away.' With such words the Supreme Lord gave away the children which Thou gave back to the Braahmina, while Arjun sang Thy glory.

In this manner Thou delighted the world by various sportive activities nurtured the Vrishni clan and performed many sacrificial rites and Yagnyas. Thou pleased the gazelle eyed wives with unparalleled sportive endearments and on the pretext of unburdening the earth gave liberation to many dependents and devotees. Thou, the incarnate Infinite Brahman Itself appeared in a material form and shone through the veil of a human form amonst the Yaadavas.




O Lord! In those days Naarada who mostly stayed in Dwaarika was always engrossed in the bliss of Thy worship. Once Thy meritorious father attained insight and illumination from him who is the foremost among the devotees. The most distinguished among the intelligent, Uddhava attained enlightenment from instructions given by Thee directly. It is believed that he is still residing in Badrikaashrama for the benefit of the world.

O Infinite Lord! Thy exalted incarnation as Krishna shines in all its uniqueness where all people everywhere effortlessly overcome all sorrows and attained spiritual union with various means of friendship, fear, love, hatred, attachment and other unique methods. May Thou O Lord of Guruvaayur! for the removal of world's sorrows having incarnated also deign to endow full devotion.





O Consort of Ramaa! (Laxmi) Thy devotees are not easily blessed in this world. I know it to be so because prosperity generates pride in the passionate people. After making them dispassionate Thou do fulfill all their desires. Those who are already dispassionate, to them Thy blessings come quickly. There is no question of Thy devotee's downfall.

O Lord! Brahamaa, Shiva and others who are pleased and angered quickly, are worshipped by people in accordance with their own nature. Alas! They are led to disgrace by their shortsightedness. This is indeed clear by the example of Vrikaasura.




Vrikaasura, the son of Shakuni once asked Naarada as to which Diety was the easiest to please. Naarada instructed him to worship Shiva and not Thee who are not supportive towards evil minded people.

He indeed practiced severe penance and on the seventh day greatly angered, threatened to cut off his head and thus made Shiva appear before him immediately. From the Lord of the universe, Shiva, he sought a very mean and cruel boon that on who-so-ever's head he placed his hand would die immediately. How can good sense prevail upon people who are indifferent to Thee?




Like a lion who rushes towards the rescuer, Vrikaasura rushed towards Shiva. Lord Shiva ran about in all directions in panic of the Asura, and kept looking backwards. Everyone in the whole world kept quiet. Then from far Thou saw Shiva as he was about to reach Thy abode. Then, in the guise of a clever Brahmachaari Thou stood waiting for the Asura.

Hail to you O son of Shakuni! Why are you needlessly running about, placing your faith in this ghost? If you doubt my words, O dear One! Test for yourself by placing your fingers on your own head.' Befooled by these words of Thine, he placed his hand on his head and immediately fell down dead as an uprooted tree. Such is the fate of the people who worship other deities. What more, Thou are the ultimate refuge of even Shiva.




Once the ascetics residing on the banks of the river Saraswati assigned sage Bhrigu to test who among the Trinity was more inclined towards Saatvic guna. Bhrigu went to Brahmaa who was enraged, but he controlled his anger, when Bhrigu showed his disrespect. Next he went to Shiva and behaved with him in the same manner. Shiva was eager to kill him but was restricted by Paarvati. Then Bhrigu went to Thee.

When Bhrigu went to Thee, O Lotus eyed! Thou were sleeping on Laxmi's lap. He hit Thee on the chest with his foot. Thou got up in good humour and asked for pardon for everything and told him that the mark of his foot would always remain as a decoration on his chest.




The great ascetics residing near the Saraswati river decided that Thou were the most Saatvic of the Trinity. They firmly anchored their devotion into Thee and attained union with Thee. O Changeless One! Who are free from the shortcoming of decay, Thy exalted Saatvic form we worship.

When Bhrigu went to Thee, O Lotus eyed! Thou were sleeping on Laxmi's lap. He hit Thee on the chest with his foot. Thou got up in good humour and asked for pardon for everything and told him that the mark of his foot would always remain as a decoration on his chest.




O Supreme Being! The episodes of Vrikaasura, Sage Bhrigu, Thy Mohini Avataar and the Ambareesh episode only proves, here, that Thy majesty and superiority supersedes over all other deities like Shiva and others.Thou are non-different from Thy Nishkala (partless) form and Thy Sakala (part) forms like Shiva, Brahamaa, and shine in an indescribable manner as the essence of all.

The Shaivaas speak of five aspects with Brahmaa Vishnu Shiva Ishwara and Sadaashiva. Here Sadaashiva is Thy own self the Supreme Being. Thou alone are Ishwara the Lord of Vaikuntha. The three forms of Trinity, Thou alone assume in the three parts of Satyaloka.




The form of Vishnu, among the Trimuti, is a manifestation of pure Sattva. Brahmaa is the manifestation of abundance of Rajas with a trace of Sattva. Whereas, Thy form known as Shankara has an abundance of Sattva but Tamas expresses itself in its activities.

Thou do transcend the Trinity and are the Supreme Being. Thou are the essence of all and Shaivas worship Thee alone as Shiva with worshipping norms, as described. That too is Thy form alone. We have many proofs in support of this truth.




Bhagavatapaada Shree Shankaraachaarya also, among all the Sakala forms, honours Thy form alone. He who is not of the nature of favouring any one deity has commented on the Sahasranaama etc., reffering to Thee alone. In the end he attained samaadhi singing Thy praises.

In his famous work of Mantra Shastra, known as Prapanchasaara, Shri Shankara has described Thee as transcending the Trinity - Brahmaa, Vishnu and Mahesh. He has described Thee as a beautiful blue lily and the Lord of all. When he describes the meditation on Nishkala, while dealing with Pranava, he also propounds Thy Sakala form, and of no other deity, Thee as the object of meditation.




In the text of Puraana Sangraha where there is the gist of all the Puraanas,Thy supreme greatness alone is unequivocally described. The Trimurti occupying the Satyaloka in three parts has been depicted. But Thy abode, Vaikuntha has been described as distinct and superior to and so transcending Satyaloka. No reference is made to the abode of Shiva.

O Lord! Here, at the time of Braahmakalpa, Thou had revealed Thy form to Brahmaa, which is described in the second Skanda of the Bhaagavatam. Maadhavaachaarya, who was himself a votary of Shiva, has reffered to that same form with the names Hari, Shiva etc., in Puraanasaara.




People who by their natural inclination are devoted to worship Shiva, for them, the results (liberation) are achieved by their firmness in their devotion only. In the Skanda and other Scriptures, sage Vyaasa has asserted this, for the benefit of such devotees, with statements that belittle Thee which are to be taken as eulogy.

Arthavaada has three methods- 1) statements where existing facts are exaggerated, 2)statements are in accordance with experience, 3)statements are contrary to experience. These are used to make the subject matter interesting. In the Skaanda Puraana and other scriptures there are many contrary statements, reffering to Thy Taamasic nature, Thy defeat or Thou being instructed by others etc., which are in the category of the third method.




O Supreme Being! Though I am an ignorant man, what little I have said, is in accordance to what is expounded in the Mantra Shaastra. Bhaagavata is the essence of all the sayings of sage Vyaasa and Thy excellences are sung there in. Deign to eradicate my ailments and endow firm devotion to me.




O Lord Krishna! I believe that the worship of Thy feet is the most fear expelling and the only refuge for those mortals who are suffering because of being deeply bound by the false material notions and wrong acceptance of ephemeral values as true. By devotion to Thee all fear is expelled, in every way, the methods of which are taught by Thee (in Bhagvad Geeta etc.). O Lord of Lords! O Soul of all Beings! A person who is steady in Thy devotion will not slip or falter even a wee bit even if he runs on the path of delusion with his eyes closed.

O Supreme Being! All the actions of my body speech and mind which are prompted by Thy power, I offer and dedicate to Thee, the Supreme Spirit who are here in the form of Lord Guruvaayur. A person may be of lowly caste, but if he has resigned his mind speech senses and vital energies at Thy feet, he sanctifies the worlds. It is not so even if a person is a Braahmin and is indifferent minded towards Thee.




The feeling of fear arises from the consciousness of a second entity-different from oneself. This consciousness of a second entity is a projection of the mind. I will try to control my mind with effort and discriminative intelligence. But when this discriminative intelligence is overpowered and inflicted by Maaya, the consciousness of oneness does not reveal itself again. Therefore, O Lord! by constantly worshipping Thee with great Bhakti, I will overcome all fear.

Bhakti, devotion, is generated in people with meritorious deeds and it grows by association with people who are always worshipping at Thy feet. Just as in this world, wealth and prosperity are generated by association with prosperous people. O Lord! May I always have such association, because intense and firm devotion, which effaces all sins, arises as a result of listening to Thy glories and narrations of Thy sportive activities which are sung by such devotees.




Among the many paths of liberation, the path of devotion is the most preferred. Treading this path I shall fervently sing Thy glories and Thy deeds in Thy various incarnations, and also chant Thy grace conferring names. I may burst into laughter or cry suddenly, or at times roar or sing and dance about like a mad man. O Thou! bestow Thy compassion so that going on the path of Bhakti I may move about at will and not have to follow the world and its social norms.

I shall salute the five elements, everything comprising of the elements, fishes, birds, animals and other mortals, friends and enemies with the knowledge that they are all Thy forms alone. Thus with my mind balanced with Bhakti I will always be in Thy service and worship Thee. With Thy grace then I will achieve firm devotion, dispassion and the knowledge of the Truth in Reality, simultaneously and will not have to make an effort to achieve each one separately. (Just as swallowing a morsel of food gives the satisfaction of enjoyment, strength and appeasing of hunger).




The strings of sufferings created by the universe like hunger and thirst will not effect me because my mind will be engrossed in Thee. I shall constantly meditate on Thy feet, and will not deviate even for a fraction of a second from them. With the knowledge that good and bad and gratification and aversion are an effect of Maayaa I will be indifferent to them. I shall move about peacefully with my mind being cooled in the cool light of the moon of Thy toe-nails.

It may be that I do not deserve now the experience of the knowledge of Thy oneness with all beings. May I have love for Thee and friendliness for Thy people, kindness for the ignorant, indifference towards the enemies. Or may I have the eagerness to worship Thy images with full faith. People who worship Thee in such a manner, also, without delay attain the highest pinnacle of divine love.




Thy Maayaa by projecting itself as earth water air and other elements conceals Thy real nature. More over, it throws the embodied souls helplessly into a network of worldly sufferings based on the reactions created by their good or bad actions. O Lord of Universe! May that Maayaa not overpower me. O All pervading Being! the enlightened Yogi Prabuddha has said that this Thy Maayaa can be overcome only by devotion at Thy feet.

As I have been able to see the misries of the creatures, in this world, by obtaining an insight due to a discriminative mind, may I be blessed with the instructions from a great spiritual master. From his instructions, may I receive the knowledge of Thy real nature, by the narrations of Thy excellences, glories and deeds will arise supreme devotion, by which crossing over Maayaa, at Thy feet that supreme bliss will be conferred on me which will give me great delight. To achieve this, this is the first step. O Lord! of Guruvaayur! remove my numerous ailments.




Understanding that the rituals described in the Vedas are beyond their seeming results-oriented nature, I shall dedicate all such rituals that I perform, to Thee O Lord! And become free from the bondage of action. May I not, even by mistake, by thought deed or speech attempt to do what is forbidden by the Vedas. If any such action becomes unavoidable, that too I will dedicate to Thee alone, O The Glowing Light of Consciousness!

The other form of ritualistic Karma, (Aagama) where Thy devotion is propounded, following that, I will worship Thee everyday. The dear most pure Saatvic form of Thee I will invoke in my heart as an image of stone or clay or any other material and worship with offerings of flowers, incense and food, according to my capacity. O Lord! devotedly performing Thy worship, I will seek Thy grace.




Women and people of the lower social order are unprivileged to hear the narrations of Thy deeds and excellences and for chanting Thy names. They are indeed to be pitied. But I bemoan the unpeaceful lot of people of the higher castes, who in spite of having all the facilities of worshipping Thee, would not do so being arrogant of their learning and high birth. In Thy teachings they have been repeatedly instructed about Thee, they perform Yagyaas as a livelihood and for material ends, and there is no misdeed that they do not do. O Lord! I pray, do not make me one like them.

Those worldly undevoted people laugh loudly at the wise people who are devoted to Thee with their minds absorbed in Thee. They speak spitefully of them with statements like -'This is a wicked fellow and keeps saying Krishna and Raama to conceal his misconduct. Because of this person's shameless prattles, I could not say many important things. My brother is an hypocrite and feigns to worship Vishnu all the time.' O Lord! Do not make me like them.




In the Krita Yuga people propitiate Thee with penance, in the form of a lustruous white sage. In the Treta Yuga, people offer sacrifices to Thee in the form as the Yagya itself, red in complexion marked with Sruka and Sruva (the Yaagyic acessories). According to the Taantric rites and rituals, in the Dwaapara Yuga, people worship Thee with a blue complexion resplendent with mace and discus etc. In this Kali Yuga Thou with a blue complexion are worshipped by people, with the chanting of Thy various names.

O Slayer of Mura! That this Kali Yuga may be victorious, wherein by chanting Thy various names and glories alone Thy grace is acjieved effortlessly and in no time. O Fulfiller of All Desires! Those born in Treta Krita Dwaapara also desire to be born indeed in Kali Kaala. Fortunately, those of us who are born now, in Kali, may we not O Lord! be deprived of Thy grace, because of the persuit of poisonous sensuous sense enjoyments.




In the Kali Yuga devotees will abound, mostly in the Dravid land, i.e., South India. In the regions of the rivers Kaaveri, Taamraparni and the Kritamaalaa, the holy west, the devotees will be more. Oh Lord! I too am born in this region only, and have some devotion to Thee. O God! I pray, do not delude me by binding me with ropes of desire, and do make my devotion to Thee complete.

Once king Pareekshit saw the merciless Kali who is the enemy of Dharma (righteousness), and to kill him, he drew his sword also. But he did not kill Kali, because Kali is a knower of the essence of Truth, and also because it has some good features. In Kali, Thy worship bears results very soon where as evil deeds take time to bring fruits. Kali is also afraid of Thy devotees, so he tries to take them away by disease etc., even before their devotion becomes firm. For this O Lord! punish him.




O Supreme Lord! In this Kali Yuga, Gangaa, Geetaa, Gaayatri, Tulsika, Gopichandana, Saalagraama worship, Ekaadashi fast and chanting of Thy names, these eight, the sages say, are quick and effortless means of salvation as they secure Thy abounding grace. O Thou! May I be intensely devoted to them all.

O Lord of the Universe! Who so ever, whole heartedly takes refuge in Thee, abondoning all actions, is no longer a debtor to the gods or sages, Pitris (or Manes), or a servant to them. Even if he has done any misdeeds, they are destroyed by Thee who do reside in his heart. O Lord of Guruvaayur! my sufferings, born of my sins, do remove and generate devotion in me.




Thy grace alone will enable me to abondon my love and affection towards my relatives. With my mind merged in Thee, renouncing everything, I will wander about looking upon the whole world as an expression of Maayaa. The injunctions and prohibitions of the scriptures apply to the one who entertains the concepts of good or bad due to multiplicity caused by false comprehension. How can both of these apply to a person whose mind is absorbed in Thee and who has transcended the consciousness of differences.

There are countless beings who are always absorbed in satisfying their hunger and thirst. Among them, a man is superior for being endowed with a discriminative mind. Human birth indeed is rare. Among men also a person may be one's own friend or a foe. A person whose mind is absorbed in Thee, is always concerned in the means of alleviating sorrow, is ones own friend. All others are their own foes.




O Lord of the Universe! When Thy grace operates there is nothing in this worldly existence which may not become a spiritual teacher. I will learn the lesson of true forebearance from the earth who does not move inspite of being oppressed by all. The air is always in contact with various objects but is not tainted by them so I will learn nonattachment from the air. The nature of my soul which is all pervasive and unaffected, will be clear to me from the sky as a teacher.

May I be clean pure and sweet like the water. May I be not blemished by taking food of any type, just as fire though all consuming, is unaffected by the defects of any substance. Just as there is fire in every tree, let me recognize me in all beings. The growth and decay is of the body, like waxing and waning of the moon, and not of Aatman, the self. By Thy grace, may I realise, the oneness of all individual bodies, just like the reflected images of the sun in universal waters.




May I not be like the pigeon who for the love of its offsprings was killed by the hunter, along with them. Like the python may I eat whatever is available and also endure hunger when nothing is available. Let me be deep and serene like the ocean. Let me not fall a prey to the lust of women like a moth to fire. O Lord! let me seek the essence of things like the honey bee and unlike it let me not perish in accumulating wealth.




Let me not be led to captivity by women as an elephant is by a female. Let me not earn wealth in plenty because it is taken away by others, like the honey gatherers. Let me not be attracted into a snare by sweet words, as a deer is by vulgar music. May I not be too attached to food like a fish is to a bait. Like Pingalaa may I sleep soundly without a care. O Lord! May I not be killed by others like the Kurara bird for having to guard the meat it was carrying.




Devoid of sense of honour and dishonour, I will live very happily like a child, unaccompanied and all alone, like a solitary bangle on a maiden's wrist, I will move about restricting myself from all other noises of contacts and conflicts. May my mind be absorbed in Thee and not know anything beyond that, like the arrow maker who does not know the announcement of the king's coming. May I live in houses made by others, and so be not attached to any house, like the snake who lives in the holes made by rats.

The spider is a teacher in the sense, that, I learnt from it that the Universe created by Thee, is absorbed into Thee, by Thee alone. From the beetle I got the firm lesson that meditating on Thee confers Thy form. On careful thought I realised that though this body is a storehouse of filth and ashes, it is a great teacher, specially this body of mine. Because of it suffering from many diseases, I have been endowed with discrimination and renunciation.




Alas! Rid me of my infatuation to my body. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Because of love for it one is helplessly attached to house, wealth, wife etc., and so we forget Thy lotus feet. In the end this body is fit only for fire or dogs. Even now, while living, it is dragged hither and thither by senses of sight hearing touch taste etc. There is none alas to take us to Thy lotus feet.

O Lotus Eyed Lord! If obsession to body sense is unavoidable, do rid me of all my ailments and endow me with unshakable firm devotion to Thy lotus feet. This Braahmin body, which may take me to liberation, is achieved after many lives. O do not plunge it into lowly sensuous pleasures. O Lord of Guruvaayur! deign to save me.




People, whose minds are purified by performing desireless actions, come to understand from the instructions of competent teachers, Thy supreme aspect which is immaculate, bodiless, taintless, all pervading and transcendent. As for the qualities of multiplicity, stoutness, thinness etc., which are in association with the bodies constituted of the three gunas, are super imposed on Thee. It is like the expensiveness, small ness, dimness and brilliance of fire according to the nature of the fuel (wood) on which it manifests.

The fire of knowledge is ignited by the striking of two fire sticks, the lower one represents the teachings of the teacher, and the upper one the disciple (who comes seeking the knowledge). This fire illuminates perfectly clear knowledge and burns the forest full of many tendencies and desires which are an effect of past actions, and also the ignorance of identification with the body and the world. When such a forest is burnt up, the fire (of knowledge) for want of fuel also subsides (in Thee). Then the state of total merger in Thee alone remains.




Other than the attainment of Thee, certainly, the other means of eradicating sufferings, which are resorted to, like cultivation, medicine, the six gunas, the six steps of Yoga etc., are ultimately ineffective in completely removing or the reccurence of all sufferings. The Vedic paths are difficult to persue with their many inherent difficulties. Even if they are somehow persued and their results obtained, by some, they in arrogance forget Thee, (who are the ultimate aim) and are led into downfall and undergo endless sufferings.

O Lotus Naval One! Where is there another fearless world other than Thy world the Vaikunthaloka? Residing in Satyaloka also, at the end of two Paraardhaas, Brahmaa is afraid of Thee (as Time) and does not live in peace. That being so, what to say of human beings who keep accumulating sins by unrightious means! O Bestower of Boons! O friend of the Lowly! O Ocean full of mercy! therefore, do cut off my bondage.




O Lord! In reality, for me, who is merged in Thyselfness only, there is no bondage or liberation. Thy two aspects of Maayaa and knowledge manifest, indeed, like dreaming and awakening. The difference between the two, the bonded and the one who has achieved liberation while living, is that, the former, perched on the tree of the body has to eat the fruits of the sense experiences, while the latter does not have to do so and so is a non suffering soul.

Of what use are the words about the state of liberation in the embodied soul? This concept is far fetched for the impure minded. There is no way other than devotion for the mind to be even a bit purified. O Lord Vishnu! Do bring about that for me which by intense devotion, with surrendering of all fruits of action to Thee, and with Thy realisation by the teachings from a Guru, I may achieve oneness with Thee.




In this world there are people who are totally engrossed in the study of Vedas and other scriptures and do not care to know Thee. It is a futile effort on their part just as owning a cow which has not calved. I will not study the scriptures wherein Thy form saturated with Pure Consciousness, and the world enchanting, all purifying and sportive incarnations are not spoken of.

O Lord of the Universe! Thou are this, that or of that kind or of that sort, I do not at all understand any of this whatsoever. In spite of my little understanding, O Enemy of Chaidya (Shishupaal)! Thy worship alone I will always dutifully perform. May it thus happen to me that I get to see Thy images and touch the feet of the groups of people who are lovingly attached to Thy feet. May I also worship Thee, sing Thy hymns, prostate to Thee, and lovingly recite Thy excellences and deeds.




O Lord! What ever comes to me, I offer to Thee. I am Thy servant. May I always be in Thy service without fail, like cleaning Thy temple etc. May I worship Thy resplendent four armed form in the sun, fire, Braahmin and Aatman. May my love melting heart, through devotion continuously flow into a torrential stream towards Thee.

The state of supreme blissful union with Thee is difficult to be attained by charity, sacrifice, vows, desciplines, austerities or by following the methods of Saankhya Yoga. The most meritorious Gopikaas attained intense bliss only by attachment to Thee. There are many devotees of Thine, but the loving devotion of the Gopikaas, to Thee, is highly esteemed by Thee. May that devotion strengthen in me. O Lord Krishna! O Lord of Guruvaayur! remove my sufferings.




O Thou! The Origin of All! In the beginning Thou were in an undivided state of all jivas in the Hiranyagarbha form. Then Thou do manifest Thyself in multiplicity of jivas, and become associated with Maayaa and its various Gunas. With the well developed and dominant Sattva, devotional attitude is reached, by which the other two gunas Rajas and Tamas are destroyed. By and by when Sattva also is abandoned I (the jiva) shall, again, unobstructed, realise myself as Thyself only.

O Infinite Being! When the Sattva Guna predominates, the harmfulness of sense enjoyments is realised. Whereas when the Rajas and Tamas are predominant, to abstain from worldly enjoyments becomes difficult, because the mind and the gunas are mutually interlinked. To control all these, devotion in Thy Tureeya state alone is the only refuge. Thus, in the form of a swan Thou instructed.




There are many paths of welfare laid down to suit varying tastes of people as means of fulfilment. O Krishna! They lead to goals that yeild only temporary and trivial pleasures. Thou did describe to Thy friend, Uddhava, devotion as the most glorious path for attainment of supreme spiritual welfare of man. Where does the joy that people get by worldly persuits, stand in comparison to the bliss of devotion to Thee!

A person whose mind is satisfied in Thy devotion, moves about happily in this world. One who has dropped all desires, for him, every place is full of joy, just like an aquatic creature living in deep waters, finds water everywhere. Such a person does not covet Indraloka or Brahmaa's residence or the attractive Yogic powers. This may be so. The bliss of liberation coming of its own to him is also without his seeking.




If Thy devotee is sometimes ensnared by sense pleasure, because of his senses not being in his control fully, they by nature weak, cannot stand the onslaught of devotion and so Thy devotee cannot be conquered by the senses. Just as a well lit blazing fire burns down stacks and heeps of wood, in the same way Thy devotion burns away stacks of sins and sinful tendencies. When this happens, the false power of the senses do not stand any chance.

Unless the heart melts with love, the hair of the whole body stand on end or tears of joy flow, how can the mind be purified. Of what use are austerities or learning devoid of devotion. Just as, by constant use of corrylium the eyes can see the objects, the mind intutes Thy subtle truth by constant imbibing of Thy narrations and so purifying the soul. It is not so indeed by the study of highly sophisticated arguments.




To practice meditation, I will sit erect in a comfortable pose (sukhaasana) and gaze on the tip of the nose. Controlling my vital breath energies by doing Pooraka etc., praanaayaam (breath control) I will imagine the downward lotus in the heart as facing upward. I will imagine the sun, moon and fire above it and Thee in a delicate dark blue form as the water bearing clouds, seated on the top.

I meditate on Thy blue form which has lustruous hair, shining fish shaped earings, a gentle smile with compassion flowing, lustre of Kaustubha spreading over the garlands and the big pearl necklaces, the Shreevatsa mark, a soft and charming abdomen, golden hued garment, comely well shaped thighs and lotus like tender feet.




O Beloved Lord! Again and again I will concentrate with growing eagerness on all Thy limbs. Then I will fix my mind on Thy lotus like face with a gentle smile. The fully absorbed mind in the Eternal Bliss Conciousness in a non-dual form will not think of anything else. Thus I shall remain steady in the advanced state of communion, by repeated effort.

O Slayer of Mura! As I master meditation on Thee, the eight bodied Sidhdhis - Animaa etc., will indeed come to me jostling one another. Realising that they only cause delay in one's attainment of Thee, I shall not accept them. I long for Thee alone, the Plentitude of Bliss. O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me from all miseries.




O Thou of infinite Glory! Of whom the world is a personification! Thou alone are Brahmaa perceptible. Among letters Thou are 'A'. Among Mantraas Thou are Om. Among kings Thou are Manu and among sages are Bhrigu and also Naarada. Among Asuras Thou are Prahlaad. Thou are the Surabhi celestial cow among the animals and Garuda among the birds. Among serpants Thou are Ananta. Among the rivers Thou are the heavenly Gangaa.

Among persons devoted to the holy men, Thou are Bali, among sacrifices Japayoga, among heroes Arjuna, among devotees Thou are Uddhava. Thou are the strength of the strong and grandeur of the majestic. There is no end to Thy manifested glories. All things brilliant and outstanding are Thee alone. Thou are jiva and Prakriti. There is nothing in this cosmos which is bereft of Thee.




People in the four casts and the four aashramas, who perform their duties, as laid down in the Vedas, according to their station in life, with devotion and dedication to Thee, to them non-attachment sprouts and matures gradually. When they are fully non-attached, they give up these duties and attain the true knowledge of Thee. Which is the experience that they are That Supreme Being of the nature of Existence Conciousness and Bliss, the one indivisible in the divided entities and the cause of all but not caused by anything.

The three paths which lead to Thy attainment, in this world are, knowledge (Gyaana), action (Karma) and devotion (Bhakti). Those who are fully dispassionate towards everything in life, are competent for Gyaana marg. People who are subject to worldly attachments may take the path of Karma and dedicate all their doings to Thee. To those who are neither intensely attached nor intensely dispassionate and also experience joy in thinking of Thee, the path of Bhaakti is prescribed.




In this mortal world, as a result of good deeds, one easily gets knowledge or devotion to Thee. O God! Therefore, those in heaven, or those in hell, desire to be born here only. By good fortune, I have this human body which is like a boat for crossing the ocean of Sansaara, (the world). Making my Guru the pilot of this boat, and Thyself becoming the favourable wind, deign to take me across.

People who are attracted to the path of knowledge (Gyaana Yoga) seeking the non-manifest Brahman, by studying the Vedic revelations and Nyaaya Shaastra's logic, labour hard, and attain the ultimate goal at the end of many life times. Karma Yoga is far fetched from the ultimate goal. Certainly the path of devotion is sweet from the very beginning and quickly leads a devotee to Thee. May this Bhakti grow more and more in me.




Sage Vyaasa decries excessive effort for seeking knowledge alone. Whoever, after learning from the scriptures or from a Guru the truth of Brahma, one who takes refuge with firmness in devotion at Thy feet, to him liberation is at hand. Meditation on Thee is no less difficult , because of the wavering nature of the mind, but can be mastered soon with practice, with Thy grace and with the attractiveness of Thy enchanting form.

O Lord of the Universe! Becoming disinterested in the difficult path of Vedic rituals, I will firmly place my faith in the narrations of Thy stories etc. Even then, if I am not able to give up desires,I will indulge in them with the awareness of their harmfulness and again with determination fixing my mind in Thee, will strengthen my devotion. When Thou do abide in the heart, attachments are soon destroyed.




A Brahmin, who had earned wealth with hard toil once, happened to lose it all. He had acquired discrimination and purity of mind, but was persecuted by the populace. He said that the people, or time, or Karmaa or planets were not the cause of his sorrow. His own mind was the cause, it being a product of the gunas. It super imposes the gunas on the ever free aatman and attributes to it the doership. With this knowledge he peacefully attained to Thee. O Lord! may I have that kind of peace of mind.

King Pururavas (son of Ilaa), long ago was deeply infatuated by Urvashi and enjoyed her company for long. Then he developed total renunciation and asserted that sex enjoyment is trivial and wretched. He became fully devoted to Thee and was free of all attachments and feeling fulfilled he moved about freely as one liberated. O Lord of Guruvaayur! uprooting all my desires, make me the best of Thy devotees and free me of all my diseases.




All entities in this world, knowledge, faith, work, residence, happiness, food etc., being constituted of the three gunas, are of different kinds and different gradations, such as, low, mediocre or high. But entities and activities pertaining to Thee, Thy temples and Thy worship are beyond these three gunas. By resorting to these, I will soon become perfect (free).

O Lord! With my mind fixed in Thee, I will live happily dedicating all my actions to Thee. I will go to the holy places, where Thy devotees go, or where they went in the past. I will maintain an equal minded behaviour towards a robber or a Braahmin and also towards animals. Shedding the defective mental attitude of dishonour, honour, enimity, jealousy etc., I will worship Thee in all beings.




In all the entities, until oneness with Thee does not clearly manifest, I will continue to worship in this way only. By which when the knowledge of oneness suddenly dawns, I will move about with total identification with Thee. O Lord! Once the practice of Bhaagvata Dharma is begun, it can not be totally lost. Therefore. O Lord! set me on the captivating path of devotion.

O Lord! In order to get firmly established in Bhakti Yoga, I need good health and long life. Fortunately, to achieve this also, service at Thy feet is to be done. Wonderful it is that the medicine is milk only. Long ago, Maarkandeya was told by an astrologer that his life span was of twelve years only. He worshipped intensely at Thy feet for one year and when death approached, it was driven away by Thy emissaries.




Always inclined towards worshipping Thee, Maarkandeya was thus endowed with a blessing of living for ever. He continued to do penance on the banks of Pushpabhadraa river and revelled in incomparable bliss for six manvantras. In the seventh Manvantra, the Indra there, tried to seduce him with the help of celestial damsels, soft breeze and Cupid the god of love.They did not succeed, rather they were scorched by the heat generated by the sage's yoga. Who can overcome Thy devotee?

Thou as sage Naaraayana, along with Thy friend Nara went near Maarkandeya, and were repeatedly praised by him with great joy. Thou offered to him various boons, but he did not care for them, being satisfied to his innermost self with devotion to Thee. Then he asked to see Thy Maayaa. Being ignorant of the sorrows caused by Maayaa, he chose this boon out of sheer curiosity.




As soon as Thou left, the clouds were tossed about by unruly winds and torrential rain waters made the waters of the seven seas overflow, submerging the whole world. Maarkandeya wandered in these waters for millions of years. Exhausted, he saw far away, a wonderous Infant, Thee alone, with the body with a blue hue, lying on a banyan leaf, with the toe placed in the lotus mouth.

Maarkandeya's body was full of horripilation and he rushed to touch Thee. He was drawn into Thee by Thy breath. There he saw the expanse of the whole world. Then thrown out by the breath, he was looked at by Thy sidelong glances. In great joy he approached Thee wanting to embrace Thee. Just then, Thy form disappeared and he found himself in his aashram as before.




Lord Shiva, along with Gauri went to Maarkandeya, desirous of seeing Thy devotee. He gave the boons of freedom from old age and death etc., without being asked for, which the sage had also acquired by his penance. In this manner, Lord Shiva was also pleased by the worship of Thee alone. This also clearly shows that Thou are Trinity itself Brahmaa Vishnu and Shiva , and also the inner controller of all.

In the Satyaloka, in three parts, placed one above the other are located the abodes of Brahmaa Vishnu and Shiva. Above all these is the realm of Vaikuntha which is free from the effects of Maayaa and Prakriti, there, in the Causal Waters as also in the house of cowherds, Thou do shine in a pure Sattvic form as Sat Chit Brahma the non dual self. O Lord of Guruvaayur! do save me from all diseases.




It is Brahaman itself, on whose base this universe is manifested, from which this universe became, into which it merges, which itself is the universe, who is transcended from this all, from whose illumination the universe is illumined, whose illumination it is. Again, who is far beyond all description and also from the mind's conception. Whose true nature the gods and sages do not know, what of other lesser beings. To That Krishna, Brahaman itself, salutations.

Clearly here in this world, for its protection, Thou do take birth, activity, name etc., by Thy power of Maayaa, comprising of the Gunaas and Vidyaa and Avidyaa. O Thou of wondeerful nature! O Home of liberation! Though formless, Thou do take on many forms. O Vishnu! Supreme Bliss Infinite! Salutations to Thee.




Thy form is said to be, by the wise, of neither bird or animal or of a human being, a god or a demon, a woman or a man, nor is it substance, function, species or attribute, existent or non existent. By such negations by several Upanishads, what is left over, is with great difficulty and implied references made to be known as the Supreme Bliss that shines. To That Thee, salutations.

Thou do reflect Thyself in Thy Maayaa, and project the Mahat (whole creation), Ahankaar (Ego), the five different Tanmaatraas (sound, touch,form,taste and smell), the group of five elements (fire,earth, space, air and water), and the senses and the mind etc., also. The whole universe is projected like a dream and the articles in the dream. Again withdrawing everything into Thyself with Thy power of Kaal (Time), like the totoise drawing in its legs, an intense darkness is produced. Uneffectedd by this darkness, Thou do shine. To That Thee salutations.




O Lord! Thou being the only one cause of the universe, being in everything and concievable in everything are described as and are spoken of as the Primeval Sound, Karma, Atom, Time and so on. In Vedaant that reality alone is called Purusha, Supreme Being, Pure Conciousness and Aatma, and by whose mere glance causes Maayaa to project the universe with various modifications. O Lord Krishna! salutations to Thee.

Avidyaa, ignorance, which cannot be described as existent or non existent or even both, projects the objective world, just as a rope is projected as a snake. When Avidyaa gets transformed into Vidyaa as a result of God's grace flowing like a stream, coupled with hearing of some statements of the scriptures, it becomes the axe which cuts the forest of the objective world. O Lord! to That Thee salutations.




Even when this world is seen as existing, it is Thy nondual self in Reality, just as there is gold in all ornaments and clay in all earthen pots and vessels. Just as for a dreamer, on waking up, darkness vanishes, a worn out rope is seen clearly. When knowldege dawns, it becomes crystal clear through the total sublation of the objective world into Thyself, their substratum. To That Krishna! salutations.

Fearing whom the sun rises, the fire burns, the wind blows, and Brahmaa and others bring appropriate offerings (perform their functions) at the proper time. By whom alone they are raised to their places at the beginning of creation and later removed. To That Controller of the world! To Thee Krishna! we make prostrations.




Thou do manifest the three worlds comprising of the three gunas. Thou alone are the meaning of the word made up of the three letters (AUM). Thou are one manifestation as the Trinity - Brahmaa Vishnu and Shiva. Thy true nature is sung of by the three Vedas. Thou as pure consciousness are aware of the three states of waking dream and sleep. Thou do take incarnation in the three Yugas, and cover the whole world in three strides. In the three periods of time - past present and future, Thou are unchanged. I always worship Thee by the means of three yogas - Gyaan, Bhakti and Karma.

Eternal, pure, ever awake, shines Thy Being, ever free, desireless, beyond opposites, changeless, the source of manifesting and holding of all values and good qualities, causeless, taintless from ignorance, eminating limitless glory, latent in the hearts of the non attached, luminous with the light of concentrated Supreme Bliss.




O Vishnu! Thy irreversible wheel of time with its twelve spokes(months),and 360 teeth (days), whirling with ferocious speed, cutting the universe every moment , and running forward, may it not torment me, whose only refuge is at Thy feet. O Ocean of Compassion! O Lord of Guruvaayur! save me from my hosts of ailments.




Who can recount the glories of the All Pervading Lord Vishnu or count the sand particles of the universe? The three strides of His feet alone measured the three worlds, and the worlds are full of joy with wealth and prosperity because of the touch of His feet. He alone is the support of the worlds. His supreme abode is dear to me and may I attain it, where Thy devotees enjoy bliss and the honey juice of immortality flows free.

A devotee who offers sacrifices through Yangya worship etc., to Vishnu, the one who existed before the creation, one who created everything, one who is every moment new, who is Lord of all majesties, or a devotee who describes the incarnations of Lord, like that of Krishna, which is the greatest, he alone will be happy and full of renown, and at the end of his life will quickly attain the abode which is to be attained in the end - Thy abode.




O you poets, who sing the praise of the kings women etc., in whatever way you know, sing the praise of the Lord who is clear essence of all the Vedas, narrating His deeds in various incarnations. Understand that the chanting of His names confers limitless happiness, and so chant them whole heartedly. O Lord Vishnu! by chanting the names of Thee The Great, I will attain the knowledge of the Truth.

One should always meditate on the great deeds of Lord Mahaa Vishnu, by which He established righteousness, and by which He helped Indra sometimes as a servant, and some times as a friend, bringing welfare to him and to the whole world. The Lord's supreme state and well illumined Pure Consciousness is experienced by Yogis and Siddhas. Whose greatness great holy men and scholars try to expound by composing many hymns of praise.





Those born and those being born now, have not understood Thy limitless majesty and glory. O Lord! Knowing that the chanting of Thy names is welfare promoting, I will every moment chant Thy names. O Vishnu! I will praise Thee by various different hymns invoking Thee who do reside in the Vaikunthaloka which shines transcending the three worlds.

O Lord of the Universe! At first, at the beginning of the creation water came into existence and held Thee into themselves. O Lord Reclining on the Waters! All the jeevas then were merged and held in Thy being. On Thee the Birthless Lord! There rose one lone lotus from Thy naval with eight petals representing the eight quarters and the golden mountain (Mahaameru) as its pericarp representing all the worlds.




O men! You all do not know that Vishnu is the creator of this world. You also do not know that he resides in a subtle form within you. With your minds covered with the mist of Maayaa, you are infatuated by names and shapes, performing sacrifices with the aim of living a life deeming sense satisfaction the sole meaning of life. Alas! you do not covet Mukunda (Krishna).

O Supreme Being! Thou do have thousands of heads eyes and feet which fill the whole world, yet transcending it all, Thou do reside in the limited cavity of the inner most heart of beings. Thou are everything in the past future and now. Besides, what more, though Thou have entered the body senses etc., Thou alone transcend all this and enjoy the bliss of the liberation nectar.




O Infinite Being! Having taken on the form of the three worlds, Thou do transcend all that. Thou remain the Eternal Pure Knowledge Conciousness. What more, Thy greatness is so great that only a small part of it is seen as encompassing the whole world. The major three fourth part is intense bliss bearing, and shines above and beyond all. To That Thee salutations.

Thy unmanifested formless Being (Nirguna) is very difficult to grasp, whereas Thy form of pure Satva (Saguna) can easily be grasped. This form is clear and is like a wave on the ocean of liberation nectar. It is the most superior dear and lovable, with its attributes and qualities attracting the mind. To That Thy idol form I resort to. O Lord of Guruvaayur! Shri Krishna! save me from all diseases.




In front of me I see a bluish radiance excelling a very thick array of Kalaaya (blue lily) flowers. I am bathed in the nectar of the sight. Then, in the centre of the radiance I see the form of a divine young body enchanting by the budding of youth. He is surrounded by sages like Naarada thrilled with ecstatic bliss, and by a group of beautiful women who are the Upanishads embodied.

I see Thy luxuriant locks of hair dark and curly, thick and very clean, held together in a very beautiful manner, bejewelled and very beautifully tied with a plume of peacock feathers having glistening eyes, encircled by a garland of mandaar flowers. I also see Thy broad smooth forehead with its soft white upright sandal paste mark, like a young moon's line.




O All pervading Lord! Do cast on me, the foresaken one, the glances of Thy pair of eyes which are attractive with brows that are tremulous like gentle waves in the ocean of compassion. Thy eyes which are very lustruous and have rows of beautiful bluish eyelashes. They are shaped like big red lotus petals and have very beautiful pupils. Thy glances cool the worlds.

Thy face is beautiful with a prominent and well shaped nose, Thy cheek area, like an emerald mirror reflects the pair of fish shaped gem studded earrings dangling from the ears, are resplendent. Thy quivering ruby red lips like the bimba fruit, slightly parted reveal Thy beautiful row of teeth, and the very sweet gentle smile over flows with love. O Lord! may that Thy face cleary shine unto me.




Deign to soak my ear passages, with the extremely sweet melodies which cool all the worlds and which are Brahman Itself in the form of sound, which flows out of Thy flute which is placed onThy lotus mouth. The flute is multi coloured by the contact with the finger nails' rays spreading out, the two hands wearing studded shining bangles and red as coral, holding it.

I meditate on Thy handsome neck rendered red by the lustruous rays emmitting from the Kaustubh jewel, Thy chest beautified with the Shreevatsa mark, tremulous and brilliant many pearl and gem necklaces and garlands made from rows of wild multi coloured flowers, with bees hovering on them, spread on Thy chest.




We meditate on Thee, the unguents of five ingredients smeared on whose body attracts the whole world by the spreading of its fragrance. We meditate on Thee whose midriff waist is slender and creeper like, even though it holds all the three worlds within. We meditate on Thee whose body is like a rock of sapphire, and is adorned by a yellow silk cloth which is shining like molten gold and wearing a girdle made of studded gems and with minibells on it, emmitting brilliant rays.

I meditate on Thy two handsome thighs, which are solid soft and charming, stealing Ramaa's heart. Fearing to excite the whole world, definitely, they are always covered with yellow silk cloth. Thy two knees, are like two caskets holding all the desired objects for Thy devotees, and Thy two forelegs are beautifully tapered and fleshy.




I meditate on Thy anklets with their sweet sound, which, as it were, sweetly confirm the excellence of worshipping at Thy feet. Thy incarnation of the tortoise which lifted up the Mandaar mountain at the time of the deluge, Thy forefeet lift up the minds of the people who prostrate at Thy feet. Thy toe nails, of Thy auspicious toes, slightly raised, very red and shining are like the moon light expelling the darkness of the sorrows of Thy devotees. I meditate on them.

O Lord! Among the parts of Thy body, the soles of Thy feet are the most beloved and coveted to the great yogis. The liberated ones reside there. They pour all the desires of their devotees, and are like the sprouts of the celestial tree. O Lord of Guruvaayur! O Lord Krishna! may those feet always rest in my heart. O Ocean of Compassion! destroy all my sorrows and confer a full abundant flow of Supreme Bliss.




O Lord of the Universe! Deign to pardon me for what I have said here, not knowing fully Thy greatness. This hymn consists of more than a thousand verses. May it be the source of Thy abounding grace. It is in two ways Naaraayaaneeyam. May this hymn which describes in accordance with the Vedas, Thy creative actions and Thy sportive incarnations, confer long life, good health and happiness.


